Authors
Thomas E. Billings
Number of Reviews
86

Title
Review for Superstar: The Karen Carpenter Story (1987)
SUPERSTAR - THE KAREN CARPENTER STORY  [*not* the TV movie!]
Director:  Todd Haynes
Written and Produced by: Todd Haynes and Cynthia Schneider
Length:  43 minutes;  color;  documentary
Reviewed by: Thomas E. Billings, Dept. of Statistics,
             University of California, Berkeley
Reviewer contact:  teb@bizet.Berkeley.EDU
     The 1970's were a time of turmoil in America; the Vietnam war and the
accompanying domestic unrest.  The 1970's also saw the rise of feminism and
other new political and religious movements.  In a certain figurative sense,
America was searching for itself, i.e., for new symbols of itself.  Against the
backdrop of all this turmoil, Karen and Richard Carpenter, performing as "The
Carpenters," rose to great popularity with their ever-so-bland, ever-so-smooth,
style of pop music.  The music of  the Carpenters relied heavily on Karen's
unique and very melodic voice [even critics that hated their style praised
Karen's voice!].
     The Carpenters had a squeaky-clean image, in particular Karen, whose image
was that of "Miss Goody-Two-Shoes."  The Carpenters, Karen in particular,
effectively became symbols of/for America at the time (with the induced
pressures and public expectations).  As a symbol of America, Karen was used (and
abused) by the music industry.  The extreme pressures of family, career, public
expectations all contributed to the development of her anorexia nervosa, which
indirectly contributed to her premature death.
     SUPERSTAR - THE KAREN CARPENTER STORY is a unique film.  As the film
opens, Karen's mother discovers Karen, dead, in the closet of the bedroom that
her parents kept for her in their Downey (suburban Los Angeles) home.  This is
one of the few live-action sequences.  The film then shifts in time to the
early 70's, where we see Karen (portrayed by a brunette Barbie doll), a happy
teenager singing along with the radio.  Scenes of the early successes of the
Carpenters (as dramatized by the dolls) are interspersed with newsreel footage
of civil unrest, the bombing of Cambodia, and scenes from popular TV programs
of the time.  As we see the bombs being dropped, we hear the smooth, comforting
singing of Karen Carpenter.  The effect of this is an unreal juxtaposition; you
feel that you are detached from reality, that reality is just a TV show or
movie.  The contrast between the soft music of the Carpenters and the
violence/turmoil of the 70's is jarring.
     Continuing, the film documents Karen's slide into the personal hell of
anorexia nervosa.  We see the severe pressures put on Karen by her brother, and
the smothering control of her mother.  Background information is supplied on
the condition of anorexia nervosa (as is appropriate for a documentary).
Karen's intense inner struggle with food and laxatives (some anorexics take
massive doses of laxatives to purge themselves) is carefully dramatized.
     Towards the end, Karen realizes that she is sick, and reaches out for
help.  This is addressed in a very dramatic scene, where Karen (portrayed by a
doll whose face has been scraped down, then repainted, yielding a grotesque
image) tells Richard that she has anorexia.  The reaction of the Richard doll
is to talk about contractual obligations.  One is left with the impression,
that despite Karen's grotesque "death mask," it is Richard that is the
grotesque one!
     The film is told from Karen's point of view, and it is very sympathetic to
her.  Karen's parents (particularly her mother) and brother are not treated as
sympathetically.  They are portrayed as either "using" or "controlling" Karen,
while her wants and needs go unfulfilled.
     Despite the use of Barbie dolls for actors, or perhaps because of their
use, this film succeeds on many levels.  It is very touching, and one is left
with the feeling that Karen Carpenter's death was a terrible tragedy.  The film
leaves one saddened at her loss.
     The film succeeds on another level (albeit unintended).  Cynics, and
anyone that hates Karen Carpenter (or what she symbolized) can see this film
and laugh at it.  Because of the use of Barbie dolls, there are scenes where
you cannot help but laugh.  Additionally, there are some ironic/humorous
twists: in dramatizing the family struggle caused by Karen's self-starvation,
there are brief flashes to scenes where a female doll (Karen?)  is receiving a
spanking on her bare backside!  Such a scene can be explained as an
illustration of the smothering parental control most anorexics must overcome.
Such a scene might be considered 'kinky' for other reasons (after all, Karen
was an adult).
     Make no mistakes; this film is definitely worth seeing! The reasons for
seeing it are:
  1. thoughtful, moving tribute to a young woman who died tragically
  2. novelty value. How many films have you seen where all the actors
     are Barbie dolls?
  3. sardonic humor (present in the movie, though not intended by its
     creator).
SUPERSTAR - THE KAREN CARPENTER STORY transcends the limitations of Barbie
dolls and presents a very sad story in a very honest fashion.  I give it my
highest recommendation.
Note: this film is not in wide-spread distribution at present.  I have included
the name and address of the distribution company (which is also the production
company).  It is also questionable (due to music rights) whether/when this film
will ever turn up on cable.  I suggest that you encourage film festivals in
your area to screen it.  Alternatively, try to get a theatre in your area to
show it as a "Midnight Movie."  Here in Berkeley, it is shown every Friday
midnight, along with "He May Be Dead, But He's Still Elvis" (a biting satire on
the exploitation of dead stars).  Finally, I should mention that there is NO
connection of any kind between this reviewer and the distribution company.

Title
Review for Wax, or the Discovery of Television Among the Bees (1992)
Synopsis:
A computer programmer and part-time beekeeper who lives in Alamogordo,
New Mexico is introduced to an alternative, electronic reality by his
bees.  The bees are really the souls of the future dead, and communicate
with the beekeeper via "bee television", projected telepathic images.
An inventive and innovative video that includes striking computer
graphics and special video effects.  Although the effects are repetitive
at times, the video should appeal to those with an interest in computer
graphics.  However, it's probably too weird for a general audience.
U.S.A., video, color, 1991, 85 minutes.
Director/Writer: David Blair.
     The video begins with the story of Jacob "Hive" Maker, who went to
Mesopotamia (Iraq) early in this century, and brought "Mesopotamian"
bees to England.  Later he moved to the U.S., and brought along his
bees.  The story then jumps to the present, with Jacob Maker's grandson
living and working in Alamogordo, New Mexico.  The grandson is a
computer programmer, working on flight weapons simulators.  He is
currently working on a helicopter simulator for the U.S. Army.
     In his spare time the grandson, also named Jacob Maker, takes care
of a number of hives of Mesopotamian bees, descendents of the bees his
grandfather brought back from Iraq.  He is mesmerized by the bees.
Slowly they open a communications link, "bee television", to their
world, which is another dimension, an alternate electronic reality.  Set
against a backdrop of missile shots and (beautiful!) computer graphics
from a flight simulator, the bees explain that weapons have souls too.
     Eventually the bees lead Jacob to a secret cave, under the Trinity
Atom Bomb test site in New Mexico.  To the physical eye, it is just a
cave.  But for the bees, it is a major center of their alternate
dimension or reality.  The story continues as Jacob seeks to accomplish
the task the bees have assigned him....
     The plot outline above is only a brief simplification; the complete
plot is rather more complicated.  The story frequently shifts from past
to present to future, from physical reality to the electronic reality of
the bees, and back again.  Despite the frequent shifts, the story
unfolds smoothly.
     I found the video to be enjoyable and interesting, and particularly
appreciated the extensive use of computer graphics and special effects.
The graphics are not as flashy as in TERMINATOR 2, but they are
interesting anyway.  Some of the special video effects are used to
excess, but this does not detract from the video too much.
     Some viewers may be overcome by the total weirdness of the video.
However, it is not a campy weirdness, and appears to be integral to the
story line.  The frequent time shifts may bother a few viewers,
particularly the shifts into the past, the relevancy of which is not
fully realized until the latter part of the video.
     I would recommend the video to people interested in computer
graphics and video art.  May also be of interest to some fans of science
fiction and fantasy.  Not recommended for a general audience.

Title
Review for Ashik Kerib (1988)
Synopsis:
In the distant past in Russia, a poor minstrel roams the countryside, trying to
earn money to pay the bride-price for the woman he loves (she is the daughter
of a rich man).  In his journeys, he must deal with villains, despots, spirits,
and some very strange people.  A very colorful, sophisticated folk tale, done
with great style and considerable humor.
U.S.S.R. (English subtitles), color, 1988, approx. 90 minutes.
Director: Sergei Paradjanov
     This is the latest film by the famous Soviet Director, Sergei Paradjanov.
Paradjanov is famous for his "classic" films THE COLOR OF POMEGRANATES and
SHADOWS OF OUR FORGOTTEN ANCESTORS, and for serving time in prison for the
"crime" of homosexuality [yes, homosexuality is a crime in the Soviet Union].
(Remark: the preceding two lines are statements of fact, not to be interpreted
as opposing or favoring homosexuality).
     The story here concerns Ashik Kerib, a handsome but poor minstrel, who is
in love with the beautiful daughter of a rich man.  The woman is in love with
Ashik, and wants to marry him.  However, when Ashik approaches her father, he
is rebuffed.
     Ashik then leaves his small village to wander the countryside in search of
work.  This begins his strange adventures.  For example, two spirits appear in
human form, declaring themselves to be the protectors of wandering  minstrels.
They lead Ashik to a job, playing his music at a wedding where  everyone is
blind.  Immediately after this, Ashik is led to play at a wedding where
everyone is deaf, dumb, and blind!
     Everywhere he goes, poor Ashik runs into trouble and/or strange people.
He stops at the house of a very rich man who has a harem.  When he plays his
music, the house guards do aerobics to it; also the women in the harem salute
Ashik by firing automatic weapons!  Later Ashik must deal with an evil Sultan
who likes to feed people to his tiger.
     The film is very colorful, as it interfaces medieval paintings with
reenactments of weddings and other rituals.  There is plenty of humor, most of
it done very well.
     It would be nice if I could recommend this to general audiences, but there
are some things that prevent it.  One is the editing, which is very abrupt at
times.  This takes some getting used to; the editing is not as smooth as in
most U.S.  films, but also not as choppy as say, in a typical Hong Kong film.
The second potential problem is the soundtrack, which is largely ethnic music.
The music is actually quite good, except when there are vocals in it.  The
vocals are high-pitched, resembling (but not as bad as) opera.  There were
times when I wanted earplugs!  If you can stand the singing, you will probably
find the film worthwhile.
     Distribution.  Currently being screened at a limited number of art houses
and repertory theaters; it is being shown along with earlier films by Sergei
Paradjanov.
Reviewer:  Thomas E. Billings, Department of Statistics
           University of California, Berkeley
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Ambush, The (1969)
Synopsis:
In Serbia, just after World War II, an idealistic young man joins the
Young Communists.  He works with the secret police, in their campaign to
exterminate all anti-revolutionary elements.  A gritty, realistic and
compelling drama that exposes Communism as a completely corrupt and
murderous system.  It's not surprising that this film was banned by the
Yugoslavian government!
Yugoslavia (English subtitles), black-and-white, 1969, banned by
Yugoslavian government censors, released 1990, 80 minutes.
Director: Zivojin Pavlovic.
     The story centers on Ive, an idealistic and naive young man who
firmly believes in the Communist Party and its ideology.  His initial
association with the Party is as a musician at various functions.
However, his involvement grows, particularly when his friends criticize
him for his girlfriend, whose father is a known bourgeois.
     Ive neglects his schooling to work with the secret police in their
campaign to exterminate the anti-revolutionary elements, the Chetniks,
who are the remnants of the previous ruling class.  He helps set up
ambushes, where the Chetniks can be killed or captured.
     This film was made in 1969, and banned by the Yugoslavian
government after its initial screening.  The film, by portraying
Communism in a very realistic light, severely criticizes it.  In this
film, you clearly see the Communist ideals of social justice.  The
Father of Ive's girlfriend is condemned as a bourgeouis in a kangaroo
trial.  Their "logic" is that you are rich; this proves you stole the
property you now have; therefore it is morally correct for us to throw
you out of your house.  This they do, then descend on his house like a
gang of thieves and vandals, ransacking it.
     The secret police are shown engaging in deplorable behavior in
their campaign of political "justice."  They kill people who are found
with UNNRA food packages (UNNRA = U.N. Refugee Relief Agency), then
trade the food for sex.  They stop people they suspect of anti-
revolutionary activity, and execute them on the spot.  They
"requisition" grain from mills by stealing it at gunpoint.  They try to
ambush the Chetniks, and kill them without giving them a chance to
surrender.  Also, when they return to the village, they lie about their
exploits, portraying themselves as heroes.
     Further, the film also states, clearly but by implication, that
Stalin and Tito are murderers and liars.  Given the mass murder of their
regimes, that is an accurate characterization.  The clear message of the
film is that Communism is rotten to the core, and Communists are either
naive (like Ive), or evil (liars, thieves, murderers).  Simply by
presenting a realistic portrait of the revolution, the film harshly
condemns it.  Given the film's message, it's not surprising that it was
banned by the Yugoslavian government after its initial screenings in
1969.
     The film is in black-and-white and there are no "stars" in it.
However, I strongly recommend seeing it if you have the opportunity.  It
superbly tells a chilling and compelling story, about a corrupt and
murderous social and political system.
Print Source: Centar Film; Borisa Kidrica 71; Belgrade 11000;
Yugoslavia.
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for He May Be Dead But He's Still Elvis (1989)
Reviewed by:    Thomas E. Billings; Dept. of Statistics;
                University of California, Berkeley
Reviewer contact:  teb@bizet.Berkeley.EDU
     This gem of a short film is a biting satire of the music business, and the
exploitation of dead rock stars.  The film begins with a commercial for the new
album recorded by the dead Elvis Presley, a double album that is silent [no
music; remember - he's dead!].  It's titled "Presley Comes Alive," and we are
exhorted to buy, buy, buy now, now, now!  There follows a press conference
where it is announced that, to counteract the drop in sales of Elvis
memorabilia, the promotion company, Elvis Exploitation, Inc., has dug up his
corpse.  The decomposing (blue, zombie-like) corpse of Elvis Presley is then
unceremoniously dumped on a table at the press conference.  The corpse is then
sent around the country on various money-making schemes.  All this happens in
the first 3 minutes of this film!
     There follows more humor in the same vein.  We see scenes from a new movie
starring the dead Elvis, "Necrophilia, Hawaiian-Style."  There's more to the
film than just the above points, and the ending is grotesque, but extremely
funny.  I will not spoil the film by revealing any more details.
     The basic premise of this film is really sick.  It is a low budget film,
and it looks low budget.  The humor is sophomoric and sick at times.  Now
forget what I just said and go see it!  This is an outrageously funny satire;
one of the funniest short films that I have ever seen!

Title
Review for Kalaa, El (1988)
Screened at its U.S. premiere at the San Francisco International Film Festival
(March 19, 1989).
Synopsis:
     In a small village in rural Algeria, the "village idiot" is madly in love
with a married woman.  His voyeurism and antics bring shame on his father, who
guarantees that his son will be married that same day, or his four wives will
be repudiated.  An interesting and very witty story, with great sarcastic
humor.
Algeria (Arabic with English subtitles), 1988, color, 95 minutes.
Director/Screenplay: Mohamed Chouikh
Producer: Mohamed Tahar Harhoura
Print Source: K-Z Films (New York)
     Enter the world of El Kalaa, a small village in rural Algeria, where the
men and women live in separate (and unequal) worlds.  Here polygamy and wife
beating are common, and women are owned by men.
     The events of the film take place in a single day in El Kalaa, and center
around Kaddour, the adopted son of a town merchant.  Kaddour is very simple
minded, i.e., he's the village idiot (but not a Monty Python style village
idiot).  Kaddour is madly in love with one of the wives of the town cobbler.
He starts his day by waiting outside her home to catch a glimpse of her; 
however he is discovered and chased away.
     The woman's husband reports the event to Kaddour's father, who is very
angry.  Later, Kaddour visits a soothsayer (who turns out to be very funny) for
help in winning the woman he wants by magic.  Kaddour must perform certain
tasks and acquire certain things, including getting a lock of the woman's hair.
After he takes a lock of her hair (by force), an angry mob of men (led by the
woman's husband) goes to Kaddour's home, demanding he be punished.  Kaddour's
father is able to calm the situation, but only by promising that his son will
be married off that day or else he will repudiate (divorce) his four wives!
     The remainder of the story deals with Kaddour's marriage, and the unique
way in which his father fulfills his promise that his son will be married that
same day.
     Although the film takes place within a cultural framework most of us are
not familiar with, it deals with a universal topic: the relationship between
men and women.  The story is told in an interesting manner, and with very witty
dialogue and sarcastic humor.  For example, in an argument between some women
about their place in society, one woman dryly observes that "A woman's paradise
is under a man's foot."
     Note that men are not treated very kindly in this film.  They are depicted
as voyeurs, polygamists, wife beaters, thieves, and just plain silly.  Women
are depicted as slaves, as property of the men.  Male chauvinists probably
won't like this film!  The interesting thing is the treatment of Kaddour, the
main character.  Initially he is rather odious: a voyeur and other bad things.
As the film progresses, you start feeling sorry for him, until you eventually
sympathize with him, as he is, in a certain sense, a victim of the static
society he lives in.
     This film provides an interesting look into a static, patriarchal society.
However, it does so with class and humor, and a very interesting story as well.
     Overall evaluation: very good to excellent; worth seeing.
Reviewer:  Thomas E. Billings;  Department of Statistics
           University of California, Berkeley
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Philosoph, Der (1989)
Synopsis:
A shy, clumsy, naive and reclusive intellectual, a philosopher, meets three
gorgeous, worldly women.  He falls in love with one of them, and moves into an
apartment with them.  Very funny and witty at times, corny at other times.  An
amusing film, but nothing special.
West Germany (English subtitles), color, 1988, 84 minutes.
Director/Writer: Rudolf Thome.
     The plot of this film is rather simple.  Georg Hermes is a reclusive
intellectual who lives in a small, shabby apartment.  His first book, a 
philosophical analysis of some short remnant by Heraclitus, has just been 
published.  He is to give a reading from the book, and he needs a new suit.
Off  he goes to a fancy men's store, which happens to be owned by three
gorgeous, worldly, and very sexy women.
     The women like this clumsy, innocent intellectual.  Georg falls in love
with one of the women, Franziska.  Soon he moves into the large, beautiful
apartment shared by the women, where they wait on him and spend their time in
sex.  The story continues with the philosophical difficulties Georg faces; he
loves all three women, but feels that he should be faithful to Franziska.
     The humor in this film is very witty, something that is rather rare.  It
is often charming, but is also corny at times.  The film is sort of a 
sophisticated version of those teenage "hormone movies", where a shy teenager
struggles to lose his virginity.  The difference here is the age and maturity
level of the main characters; here it is a shy 30-year old intellectual who
loses his virginity, to a beautiful and worldly woman.
     This has the appearance of being a (relatively) low-budget film.  There is
virtually no background music.  The acting is adequate, although special
mention should be made of the superb performance given by Johannes Herrschmann
as Georg Hermes.  Georg is truly the clumsiest, most naive nerd imaginable.
     The plot is rather thin, and the story really drags at times (there are
sections of the film that contain little humor).  This, plus the low production
values, reduces the overall quality of the film.  Overall, rate it as good, but
not a very good.
Distribution.  Part of "New Cinema from West Germany", a collection of recent
German films, being presented in conjunction with The Museum of Modern Art, New
York, and the Export Union des Deutschen Films, Munich [print source].
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Winds of Change (1978) (TV)
Director: Ivo Dvorak
Sweden (Swedish w/English subtitles); 1975;  85 minutes
Reviewed by: Thomas E. Billings; Department of Statistics
             University of California, Berkeley
Reviewer contact: teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU
     This film is an adaptation of the story by Franz Kafka.  The film centers
on Gregor, a young man who goes to bed one night, only to discover the next
morning that a "metamorphosis" has occurred, and he has turned into a giant
cockroach!  The term "giant" cockroach here refers to a cockroach that is
roughly the size of a man!
     The metamorphosis of Gregor into a cockroach occurs at the beginning of
the film; the remainder of the story/film centers on how Gregor and his family
cope with this unusual event.  Through flashbacks we learn about Gregor's life
before the "metamorphosis."  We learn that Gregor was a timid salesman for a
fabric company, a devoted son who supports his parents and sister.  The thoughts
of Gregor/the cockroach are told via narration.
     The unique situation facing Gregor, as he begins his new life as a
cockroach, coupled with his bittersweet memories of the past, provide ample
opportunities for sarcastic humor and social comment.  An example of this is a
flashback in Gregor's memory to when he was in a group of salesmen being
threatened of the dangers of embezzlement against the firm.  The head clerk
calmly says that embezzlement is the worst crime of all, "a crime against the
firm ... worse than fornication ... worse than intercourse with cows ...."
Later in the film, there is an incident when Gregor the cockroach gets out of
his room while the furniture is being removed.  His father throws an apple at
him to get him back into the room.  However it turns out that the apple
cripples him!  Because of this, he is no longer locked in his room - the door
to his room is left open.  This so pleases Gregor, who is hungry for human
contact, that he delivers a poetic, poignant soliloquy in praise of the apple
that is rotting in his back!  [After all, no one dares remove the apple.]
     The flashbacks in the film, and current scenes involving only Gregor's
family are in full color.  Most of the scenes involving only the cockroach are
in what appears to be tinted black & white or color filtered to be nearly black
and white.  The cockroach and "cockroach effects" are OK, but not up to current
standards of special effects.  I would describe the effects as better than the
"guy in a rubber suit" (a la Dr. Who or Japanese monster flicks) genre, but not
as good as ALIEN or ROBOCOP.
     There are many things to like in this film.  The sarcastic social wit it
expresses is very funny at times.  It is a surrealistic story of alienation,
rejection, and despair.  If my memory is correct, it is a relatively accurate
adaptation of the original story by Kafka [apologies if I'm wrong - it has been
about 18 years since I read the story].  Finally, if my information is correct,
it is the only film version available.
     However, the story unfolds at a very slow pace.  It is essentially a
psychological story, with very little "action."  The story is interesting, but
far from "gripping."  Accordingly, I recommend the film only to fans of the
original story, and, of course, to anyone that loves cockroaches.  Overall
evaluation of the film: fair.

Title
Review for Zard-e Ghanari (1988)
Synopsis:
In Iran in 1972, a thrifty civil servant and his wife buy a house in the
Tehran suburb of Hertabad.  The very first night, they catch a thief
brazenly stealing their goods.  The house owner then tries to have the
thief arrested; he takes the thief to several different police
agencies, encountering major bureaucratic obstacles the entire way.  A
nice satire on bureaucracy and human nature.
Iran (English subtitles), color, 1988, 100 minutes.
Director:  Rakshan Bani-etemad
     Mr. Halimi is a thrifty and proud civil servant.  He saved for 8
years to have the money to purchase his own house; he even deferred
having children to save money to buy a house, a tactic his wife strongly
objected to.  Finally he achieves his goal, and buys a house in the
Tehran suburb of Hertabad, known as "Chaos City."
     The first night in his new home, he awakens to find a thief openly
stealing his possessions.  He shouts an alarm, the neighbors come and
the thief surrenders without incident.  The next morning Mr. Halimi and
his neighbor take the thief to the police station, on an odyssey to find
justice.
     However, justice is not to be found.  They go to the regular
police, only to be sent to another police agency (the "gendarmerie" --
federal or military police?) because "Chaos City" is not within the
boundaries of their jurisdiction.  After being turned down at yet
another police district, Mr. Halimi finally ends up at the Ministry of
Justice.  The story continues with Mr. Halimi stubbornly trying to get
justice from the intransigent bureaucracy of the Ministry of Justice!
     This movie provides some interesting insights into human nature,
and our attitudes towards laws and those who break the laws.  Mr. Halimi
is extremely stubborn and has the soul of a bureaucrat.  His reaction to
the unresponsive, inept police bureaucracy is quite humorous, but in a
subtle way.  As the film progresses, his temper slowly approaches the
boiling point.
     On the other hand, the thief is blase about the whole matter.  He
behaves as if he has been through it all before.  He is also an
opportunist, stealing from people they encounter in their journey
through the bureaucracy.  This latter point upsets Mr. Halimi a great
deal; he is even more upset when the thief offers him a new job, as his
partner in crime!
     Although the film is a nice satire of bureaucracy and also makes
one think about the foibles of human nature, it might not appeal to a
wide audience.  The film has an extremely slow pace; some viewers may
find the first half of the film to be boring.  There are rewards for
patience though, for the second half is interesting (perhaps the word
"cute" would be appropriate).  The humor is generally low-key and 
subtle.  If you appreciate sophisticated satire, the film is certainly 
worth considering.
Distribution.  Part of a film series, "Iranian Film Now," coordinated by
The Film Center, Chicago on behalf of the Farabi Cinema Foundation.
Screened at the Pacific Film Archive,  University of California,
Berkeley.  This film may be available on video, if you can find a source
for Iranian videos.
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Moine et la sorcičre, Le (1987)
Synopsis:
     A traveling Dominican friar visits a village in medieval France,
searching for heretics.  He encounters an herbalist, a solitary woman that he
suspects may be a sorceress.  A story of religious zeal and personal guilt.
France (French with English subtitles), color, 1987, 97 minutes.
Director: Suzanne Schiffman
Producers: Pamela Berger, Annie Leibovici, George Reinhart
Principal cast: Tcheky Karyo, Christine Boisson, Jean Garnet
     The plot involves an aggressive, zealous Dominican friar who visits a
remote rural village in medieval France, searching for heretics.  The heretics
must be found and converted -- or executed by burning.  The friar is driven
both by his zeal and by his guilty conscience, for he has some dark secrets of
his own to hide.
     He encounters a "forest woman," a young herbalist who lives in the woods,
gathering herbs and plant medicines.  Her solitary ways and personal detachment
seem very strange to the friar, and she becomes the target of his blind,
hateful wrath.
     This film is well made, with good acting, photography, and period
"atmosphere."  The only technical problem is with the costumes.  The film
depicts peasants working in the fields in the middle ages.  However, everyone
in the film is dressed in clean, neat clothing.  (Just try to work in a field
and stay clean!).  Fortunately, this does not detract from the film very much.
     The last half-hour or so of the film is very interesting and suspenseful.
However, you have to sit thru the first hour to get there, and the first hour
is very slow-moving as it builds toward the finale.  I suspect that many
viewers will find the first hour to be boring.
     As an overall evaluation, I would only rate the film as "fair," because of
the very slow pace of the first hour.  If you are interested in the subject
matter (religious zealotry in the Middle Ages), it is worth considering.
Reviewer:  Thomas E. Billings, Department of Statistics
           University of California, Berkeley
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Fábula de la Bella Palomera (1988)
Synopsis:
A wealthy, powerful, and very vain man meets and falls in love with a beautiful
woman who raises pigeons.  The fact that she is married does not deter him, and
he sets out to win her, at any cost.  Very slow-paced, but should appeal to
fans of romance films.
Brazil (English subtitles), color, 1988, 73 minutes.
Director: Ruy Guerra
     Set in 1892 in a small town in the Caribbean, this is the story of Don
Orestes, a wealthy, powerful, and vain man.  Don Orestes is middle aged (though
he still lives with his mother), owns a rum brewery, and spends a lot of time
looking at his reflection in the mirror.
     Don Orestes is a man that is used to getting what he wants, whether it is
an object, or a person.  He has a continuing sexual relationship with his
friend's wife.  One day he meets Fulvia, a stunningly beautiful young woman who
raises pigeons.
     Complications arise; Fulvia is happily married, and has a young child.
She gives Don Orestes a homing pigeon, as thanks for him helping her when they
first meet.  Don Orestes sends her a romantic note via the homing pigeon.  He
continues to send her notes, which she ignores.  This makes Don Orestes
unhappy, and he is ready to do whatever is necessary to win her.  The story
continues with his new efforts to win her, and the consequences thereof.
     This is a very well made film, and the contrast between Don Orestes (with
his slick, black hair) and Fulvia, in white dresses with white pigeons, is
quite striking.  However, it does have an extremely slow pace, which will deter
some viewers.  The ending is very "interesting," though obviously details are
not given to avoid spoilers.
     The slow pace of the film prevents me from recommending it to a general
audience.  However, fans of romance films will probably like it and should give
it consideration.
Distribution.  Currently being screened at some art houses and repertory
theaters in the U.S., it is part of a set of films being marketed under the
title "Dangerous Loves."  These films, originally made for Spanish television,
are based (sometimes loosely) on stories by Gabriel Garcia Marquez.
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Drachenfutter (1987)
Synopsis:
In modern West Germany, a young man from Pakistan, a "gastarbeiter" or guest
worker, tries to gain legal residence.  He eventually gets an illegal job in a
Chinese restaurant.  Later he and a Chinese waiter from the restaurant try to
open their own restaurant.  A human interest story detailing the difficulties
faced by guest workers in Germany; a good (but not great) film.
West Germany (English subtitles), black-and-white, 1988, 75 minutes.
Director/Writer:  Jan Schutte
     The film is centered on Shezad, a personable young man from Pakistan, who
is in Hamburg, West Germany, trying to gain legal residence via political
asylum.  He is receiving welfare while his application is being processed.  He
lives with his friend Rashid, also from Pakistan and also applying for 
political asylum.  They live in a seedy "welfare hotel," with immigrants and
guest workers from other third world countries.
     Eventually, with the help of a con man, Shezad gets an illegal job at a
second-rate Chinese restaurant.  The restaurant is owned by a Chinese man; the
staff includes a Chinese waiter, Shezad and two other guest workers for kitchen
help, and a tyrannical German cook.  The cook has a very high opinion of
himself and his cooking, and is very critical of his kitchen staff; he
frequently refers to them as "wops."
     Shezad and the Chinese waiter, Xiao, become friends.  They share a common
dream - to open their own restaurant.  Xiao can satisfy the all the regulations
necessary to open a restaurant under the German Restaurant Law, save one - the
requirement of 5000 marks capital.  Shezad and Xiao team up to pursue their
dream of owning a restaurant, and the story continues from there.
     This film appears to have been done on a low-budget, and is mostly a human
relations study.  It principally deals with the aspirations of third- world
immigrants and guest workers in West Germany.  These immigrants are  depicted
as forming a lower (economic) class, with limited interaction with German
society; a society that is indifferent and sometimes hostile to them.
     The major attraction of the film is the characters; as the film progresses
you begin to identify with the main characters and understand the difficult
situation they face.  Gaining legal residence in West Germany is  difficult;
many apply but few are chosen.
     Overall, this is a good film (it has won many awards at film festivals all
over the world).  However, it has a slow pace and is oriented towards human
relations; it is not an "action" film.
Print Source: New Yorker Films; no information available on release plans.
Reviewer:  Thomas E. Billings, Department of Statistics
           University of California, Berkeley
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Die xue jie tou (1990)
Synopsis:
Three young street punks flee Hong Kong in 1967, to avoid arrest.  They
go to Vietnam (Saigon), where they plan on becoming "big-time"
smugglers.  Instead, they become petty criminals, until they steal a
gold shipment and are chased by the South Vietnamese Army, the criminals
they stole the gold from, and the Vietcong!  A male "buddy" film, loaded
with the shootouts and extreme violence that characterize John Woo's
films.
Hong Kong (English subtitles), color, 1990, 125 minutes.
Producer/Director/Editor: John Woo
     This is the latest film from Hong Kong's John Woo, whose films
include the stylish THE KILLER, and the film series A BETTER TOMORROW.
Like these films, BULLET IN THE HEAD is a psychological crime story,
loaded with hyper-kinetic mayhem and violence.  The major difference is
that the current film is set in Vietnam during the war, resulting in a
cross between a "gangster film" and a "war film."
     The story concerns three young street hoodlums in 1967 Hong Kong.
Together, they are a small gang, warring against other, larger gangs.
As a result of battling with another gang, they are wanted by the
police.  To escape arrest, and to start over in life, they go to Saigon,
with dreams of becoming rich smugglers.
     In Saigon things don't go as planned.  Instead of becoming big
smugglers, they end up as small-time hoodlums and thieves.  They get
involved with a beautiful singer from Hong Kong, who is being held
captive (and sold as a prostitute) by the owner of a night-club.  They
befriend a local gunman, who is also in love with the singer, and who
has worked for the night club owner.
     Together with the local gunman, they raid the night club in a
massive shootout (using dynamite, machine guns, shotguns, etc.) to free
the singer and steal a gold shipment from the nightclub owner.  They get
the gold, but must then try to keep it, and somehow stay alive, as they
are chased by the South Vietnamese Army, the criminals they stole the
gold from, and the Vietcong as well.
     The major themes of the film are the friendships between the young
hoodlums, and the loosely defined code of honor they observe.  As in THE
KILLER, these themes are explored against a backdrop of violence.
However, where THE KILLER was limited to small-arms fire, the current
film has the Vietnam war as its background, and the violence includes
high explosives, bazookas, mortars, and helicopter gunships.  Although
the scale of violence has increased, it is also rather impersonal and
mechanical.
     Taken in its entirety, the film does make an interesting contrast
between the small-scale violence of the criminals, and the large-scale
violence of the war.  However, this topic is not directly addressed, as
the primary focus of the film is on the male bonding and relationships
between the criminals.
     Comparing BULLET IN THE HEAD to THE KILLER, John Woo's previous
film, I prefer THE KILLER.  Reasons: 1) the plot of THE KILLER is much
tighter, as it deals with only two major relationships.  BULLET has a
much looser, more diffused plot.  2) Chow Yun Fat, the great actor and
Hong Kong "superstar" who had the lead role in THE KILLER, is not in
BULLET.  His presence is indeed missed!  Also, because of the difference
in scale of violence (war versus criminal gunfights), the viewer may
react to the films differently.  Since much of the violence in BULLET is
mechanized and impersonal, the viewer may not react as strongly as to
the personal violence of THE KILLER.  Some viewers may like the film
more (or less) because of that.
     Because of the extreme violence, I cannot recommend the film to a
general audience.  However, if you like war movies, or you enjoyed the
earlier films of John Woo, it is worth considering.
Distribution: now in its first U.S. theatrical release.  Currently
(7/30) showing in San Francisco at the Roxie Cinema.

Title
Review for Nikita (1990)
Synopsis:
Nikita, a violent young woman with a drug problem, is sent to prison.
There she is recruited by an unnamed French intelligence agency, and
given a new life, and a new job -- as an assassin for the (French)
government!  A violent drama that varies from unbelievable to gripping.
Overall, a very good movie.
France (English subtitles), color, 1990, approx. 118 minutes.
Director/Writer:  Luc Besson
     Nikita is a 19-year old woman with serious problems.  She is a
junkie and a thief.  One day she and her friends are robbing a drugstore
to get drugs.  Things go wrong; the police arrive and a bloody shootout
follows.  The ultimate result of this is that Nikita ends up in prison,
serving a life sentence.
     Nikita is deliberately given a drug "overdose" by prison officials
and she officially "dies."  Nikita awakens from her "death" to find she
is being held by French Intelligence officials.  She has a choice: work
for the government as an assassin, or go back to her grave -- this time
for good.  This begins Nikita's new life, working for the government.
After a lengthy training period, the story continues as Nikita is
returned to the outside world to begin her work as a killer; but is she
actually ready for life on the outside again?  Can she have a personal
life, while working as an assassin?
     Given the storyline of the film, I was concerned that it might turn
into a "woman exploited by big, bad guys" story.  Although you do have
some sympathy for Nikita by the end of the picture, you won't forget her
depiction from the first part of the picture: a hateful, drug-addicted,
young woman who is prone to acts of uncontrollable, extreme violence,
and who kills without hesitation.  The film does not glamorize, or 
victimize Nikita.  Instead, Nikita is the "victim" of her own violent
actions, and her own wrong choices in life.
     The production values of the film are high, and some of the acting
is very good.  The actress who portrays Nikita (Anne Parillaud) is
excellent.  However, some of the things that happen in the film seem
rather unbelievable.  For example, the way some of the covert activities
are accomplished is dubious; one would think that an assassination for
political purposes would be thoroughly planned (to avoid risk of
discovery) and would not have any last-minute uncertainties.  These
complaints are minor, however, and do not distract from the action or
enjoyment of the film.
     Overall, I thought the film was very good (certainly worth
considering), because of its interesting story line and the fact that 
it does not glamorize Nikita.  One caution: the film is very violent.
Distribution.  Scheduled to open Friday, 4/5, in San Francisco (AMC
Kabuki 8 Cinema); in its first U.S. release.  U.S. distributor: The
Samuel Goldwyn Company.
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Mirch masala (1985)
Synopsis:
In a rural village in colonial India, the tax collector, an evil, petty tyrant,
lusts after the town beauty.  She hides in the local spice factory, which
becomes a besieged fortress.  The men of the town are willing to give her to
the tax collector; only the women dare to resist!  An interesting story of
sexual and political oppression.
India (English subtitles), color, 1986, approx. 100 minutes.
Director: Ketan Mehta
     The time is 1940 (approximately); India is still under British colonial
rule and Gandhi is alive and active in politics.  To collect taxes, the British
use a system of "subedars" or tax collectors.  The subedars visit villages,
meet with the village chiefs, and negotiate the taxes to be paid.  The village
chiefs then assess each family in the village a portion of the taxes.
     The system of subedars was ripe for abuse.  The subedar was generally
accompanied by groups of soldiers, and had the power to collect taxes by force.
Sometimes the soldiers would engage in looting and other hostile acts.  The
split of the taxes collected was: 50% for the British colonial government, 45%
for the local feudal lord (usually a Maharajah), and 5% for the subedar.  Thus
the subedar had direct financial incentive to extract as much tax as possible
from the villages.
     This film depicts the events in a small rural village that occur when the
subedar visits and demands more than the usual tax payments.  Here the subedar
is a young man with a handlebar mustache and a fancy phonograph which he uses
to amaze the villagers.  The village throws a "party" of sorts, at which all
the women of the village dance.  Here the subedar decides which women he wants
to sleep with.
     Later that night one of the women is brought to his tent.  He is upset; he
wanted a different woman, Sonbai, who happens to be married (her husband is
away, working for the railroads).  The next day he sees her, and approaches her
and makes advances.  She refuses his advances and even slaps him.  This is an
insult to his honor, for he is a man, powerful, and of high caste; she is a
woman, low caste, with "no husband" and "barren" (no children).  He orders his
soldiers to capture her; she flees and hides in a spice factory.
     At the spice factory, she finds an ally, the guard, an old man with a
shotgun and a strong sense of morals.  He is the only person willing to defend
Sonbai!  The factory becomes a kind of fortress, surrounded by soldiers 
outside, and Sonbai and the factory workers (all female) inside.  This causes a
crisis in the village, for the subedar is demanding that Sonbai be turned over
to him.  It is an affront to the sexual honor of the village.
     Eventually the men of the village give in, and agree to turn her over.
However, Sonbai refuses.  This leaves Sonbai and the women of the village to
resist the subedar alone, and the story continues from there.
     This film is very well made, and, though slow moving at times, will hold
your interest well.  Like many Indian films, it does have singing and dancing
in it, but it all takes place within the context of the story and is not
"grafted in" or "gratuitous" as it is in so many Indian films.
     The biggest criticism that I would make of the film is that the handling
of the social message (sexual and political oppression) is self-conscious at
times and reduces the entertainment level of the film.  For example, there is a
subplot about the village chief neglecting and beating his wife.  This subplot
adds little to the main story.  However, despite this, it is a very good film
and is worth seeing.
Distribution.  Currently showing at a limited number of theaters in the U.S.;
first U.S. theatrical release is in progress.
Reviewer:  Thomas E. Billings, Department of Statistics
           University of California, Berkeley
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Europa (1991)
Synopsis:
A few months after the end of World War II, an idealistic young American
returns to his native Germany.  There he takes a job as a sleeping car
conductor on the reconstructed Zentropa railway line.  He gets involved
with a beautiful woman, pro-Nazi terrorists, and U.S. occupation
forces.  A stylish fantasy that is interesting, but of only average
quality.
     The story centers on Leopold Kessler, an idealistic young American
of German origin, who returns to Germany right after the end of World
War II (late 1945); his return is something of a goodwill gesture.
Thanks to the influence of his uncle, he gets a job as a sleeping car
conductor on the recently reconstructed railway line, owned by the
Zentropa Corporation.  In the course of his job, he eventually gets
involved with a beautiful woman, the head of the Zentropa Corporation,
pro-Nazi terrorists (referred to as "werewolves" in the film), and U.S.
occupation force authorities.
     The above plot description is deliberately vague, to avoid
spoilers, and because the plot develops rather slowly in the first half
of the film.  The film is very stylish -- in fact, the stylishness gets
in the way at times.  Most of the film is in black-and-white, with a few
scenes in color and some scenes that are a mixture of color and
black-and-white.  Part of the dialog is in English, part is in German
(with subtitles in the German portions).
     The film is presented as a sort of dream, with a narrator voicing
over scenes to describe the character's emotions or thoughts at times.
Back-projection is used (not very well, I might add) to superimpose
scenes, particularly when the narrator calls for a scene change.
Although the narrator does provide important information at times, I
felt that the film might have been better if there was no narration.
The film develops slowly in the first half, however the pace gets
frantic in the last half.  There is some humor in the film, but not very
much.
     To summarize, I would describe the film as a stylish fantasy, that
is of only mediocre quality.  A newspaper review (San Francisco
Chronicle, 4/24/92) described the film as "think of BLADE RUNNER crossed
with BRAZIL".  The preceding quote is so marketable that I wouldn't be
surprised if the U.S. distributor (Miramax Films) uses it in their
advertising when the film is released later this year.  After seeing the
film, I would counter the quote by saying that it is technically correct
in some ways.  However, if you go to this film expecting a film of the
quality of BRAZIL or BLADE RUNNER, I suspect that you will be very
disappointed!
     The comparison to BLADE RUNNER comes from the post-apocalyptic
state of Germany after World War II, which is comparable to the vision
of Los Angeles presented in BLADE RUNNER.  Comparisons to BRAZIL can be
made because of the authoritarian bureaucracy present everywhere, and
perhaps to the atmosphere of the film (the latter point being
subjective).  Instead of these comparisons, I would offer a different
comparison.  Because the film is mostly in black-and-white, and presents
post-war Germany as a world of its own, comparisons to the work of
Canada's Guy Maddin are reasonable.  Maddin's films are in
black-and-white, and present worlds that are quite different from our
own; his films include TALES FROM THE GIMLI HOSPITAL and ARCHANGEL.  So
I would say that ZENTROPA is what you might get if Guy Maddin did a
conventional film.
     There is one other piece of information that I want to pass on.
This film is/was released in Europe under the name EUROPA.  Do not
confuse ZENTROPA with a recent German film released in the U.S. under
the name EUROPA, EUROPA -- they are two different films!
U.S. Distribution: currently on the film festival circuit. The U.S.
distributor is Miramax Films, and general theatrical release is
planned for sometime later this year.

Title
Review for Yoru no tsuzumi (1958)
Synopsis:
In 1706 Japan, a samurai returns home after a year of work in Edo (old
Tokyo) to rumors that his young wife committed adultery in his absence.
This is very serious, for he loves his wife very much, and the standard
penalty for adultery is death!  Very good historical drama.
Japan (English subtitles), black-and-white, 1958, 95 minutes.
Director: Tadashi Imai.
Based on a (puppet) play by Monzaemon Chikamatsu (written in the early
1700's).
     Hikokuro is a samurai who works for the government in Edo.  He must
spend every other year in Edo; this is a real hardship for him, for he
loves his young, beautiful wife very much.  One year he returns home to
hear whispered rumors about his wife, Tane.  He attends a family
meeting; they are very concerned about the rumors, for they disgrace the
family and could give the clan leader an excuse to seize their land
holdings.
     After the meeting, he learns new information about his wife's
activities which is deeply troubling.  The story continues as he
confronts the man who originated the rumors, a fellow samurai....
     This is one of those historical samurai dramas that are quite
common in Japan.  It's certainly not the best of the samurai films, but
it is well made and has an interesting story.  The direct message of the
film addresses husband/wife relationships, specifically the issues of
fidelity and truthfulness.  Indirectly, the film illustrates the low
status of women in feudal Japan, and the cruelty of feudalism.  The film
shows how hard it is for a husband to protect his wife when "the system"
(in this case, the family, backed by tradition and the clan leadership)
calls for her execution.
     The acting is excellent, and production values high.  The story
moves quickly and smoothly.  The story begins as Hikokuro is on the way
home from Edo; extensive flashbacks are used to tell the story of Tane
while her husband was away.  The flashbacks are neatly integrated into
the story line.
     An interesting side note on the film - the puppet play on which the
film is based, was based on an actual incident.  This is a very good
samurai historical drama, with an interesting story.  It's worth seeing
if you have an opportunity.
Distribution: Screened at the Pacific Film Archive in Berkeley, CA.  The
print was from the Archive's collection of Japanese films.  The owner of
the film copyright is Films Inc.
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Tabataba (1988)
Screened at its U.S. premiere at the San Francisco International Film Festival
(March 16, 1989).
Synopsis:
     A dramatization of the 1947 rebellion against French rule in Madagascar,
as experienced in a small village.  Though slow-moving at times, this is a
very interesting film.
Madagascar/France (Malagasy with English subtitles), 1988, color, 84 minutes.
Director: Raymond Rajaonarivelo
Producer: Jacques Le Glou
Screenplay: Raymond Rajaonarivelo, Robert Archer
Print Source: Les Films du Volcan
     If I told you that this film was shot in a remote village in the southern
part of Madagascar, that the cast was largely composed of local residents with
no acting experience, and that it is the first feature film by its director,
you would probably expect it to be boring and/or amateurish.  All the points
mentioned above are true, however the film is relatively well-made and is quite
interesting!  Speaking of preconceived ideas, I was concerned before seeing the
film that it would be full of leftist propaganda and cliches.  Fortunately that
is not the case either!
     What the film does do is dramatize the events of the March 1947 Malagasy
rebellion, as experienced in the lives of the members of a remote village in
the southern region of Madagascar.  The basic story is as follows.  A stranger
from an outlawed political party visits the village, to encourage the residents
to fight for independence against the French.  The villagers fall into two
factions -- those wanting to fight, and those who seek independence by
non-violent means.  Later, a French official visits the village so the
residents can vote for their representatives in Paris.  The people refuse to
vote, and the schoolteacher (who refused to encourage the villagers to vote) is
arrested as a subversive.
     The arrest of the teacher galvanizes the villagers, and the men of the
village go out, armed only with spears carved in the shape of guns, to rescue
the teacher and join the resistance against the French.  The remainder of the
story concerns the attempt to rescue the teacher, and retaliation by the French
(who used an army of Senegalese mercenaries, the Vazaha) against the villagers.
     The film seems a bit downbeat as one of the main points it makes is that
the 1947 rebellion was futile.  An army of men equipped only with spears is
useless against an army of trained mercenaries equipped with automatic weapons.
(In the 1947 rebellion, over 100,000 people died.  Madagascar eventually gained
independence in 1960.)  However, even in defeat, the Malagasy people maintain
their dignity and self-respect.
     Another important thing the film does is put a human face on the struggle
for independence.  The people fighting for independence are commoners, everyday
citizens.  The only way to win independence is through sacrifice and struggle.
     There is one aspect of the film that will puzzle Americans.  At several
points in the film, there are references to the fact that the Malagasy people
believed that America would intervene on their behalf and send weapons.  This
was due to two things.  First, the Malagasy heard that America had "saved"
France in 1945 (liberation of France in World War II) and they thought that
America was going to "save" the entire world, including Madagascar.
Additionally, an American sea captain had given (in early 1947) a pistol as a
gift to a native on the west coast of Madagascar, and this caused many rumors
that America was going to help the Malagasy.
     The information above concerning the belief of the Malagasy people that
America would help them is not explained in the film.  As this was the U.S.
premiere, the film's director was in attendance, and chaired a discussion
afterwards where this information was brought out.
     The only possible drawback to the film is its pacing, which may seem slow
to some.  Although slow at times, it held my interest.  Even some of the "slow
parts" are interesting as they illustrate life in rural Madagascar.
Overall evaluation: very good, consider seeing it.
P.S.  Presentation of this film at the San Francisco International Film
Festival was sponsored by the Bravo Cable Network.  This suggests that the film
may eventually appear on the Bravo cable channel.  If it does, be sure to watch
it -- the film is definitely worth seeing.
Reviewer: Thomas E. Billings; Department of Statistics
          University of California, Berkeley
Reviewer contact: teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for 'A' gai waak juk jaap (1987)
Screened at the San Francisco International Film Festival (March 15, 1989).
Synopsis:
     In turn-of-the-century Hong Kong, an honest policeman does battle with
corrupt police, gangsters, pirates, and spies.  An action/comedy that moves at
warp speed, with spectacular stunts and slapstick humor.  Features Hong Kong
superstar Jackie Chan.
Hong Kong (Cantonese with English subtitles), 1987, color, 101 minutes.
Director: Jackie Chan
Producer: Leonard Ho
Screenplay: Jackie Chan, Edward Tang
Principal cast: Jackie Chan, Maggie Cheung, Carina Lau, David Lam
Print Source: Golden Harvest Ltd.
     Producer, writer, director, actor, stuntman, and occasionally a singer,
Jackie Chan is the most popular star in Hong Kong, and one can easily see why
from viewing this film.  Here he plays Dragon Ma, an honest, diligent policeman
in a corrupt, crime-infested district in Hong Kong at the turn of the century.
     Dragon Ma battles against wholesale police corruption (the senior officer
in his new district is on the take), gangsters who run brothels and opium dens,
dispossessed pirates (leftovers from the 1984 film, PROJECT A), spies, and even
a few revolutionaries.  The action is fast and furious -- don't blink, you might
miss something!
     The basic plot is that Dragon Ma takes over a district from another
officer (who is very crooked) and must clean up the police corruption and the
gangsters.  Along the way he is accidentally framed (for theft of a diamond
bracelet) by revolutionaries who bungle a robbery attempt.  Dragon must clear
his name by unscrambling the mess and finding the missing jewels.  As he does
this, he tangles with pirates (who want to kill him for revenge), spies who are
chasing the revolutionaries, and corrupt policemen out to kill him.
     There's plenty of humor, both slapstick and more subtle types, along the
way.  He has a way of getting into trouble, which usually leads to furiously
fast kung-fu fights, followed by wild chases with breathtaking stunts.  Rest
assured that this is *not* some cheap kung-fu trash movie of the kind you might
see on late-night TV!  In fact, the kung-fu here is usually pretty funny!
     The stunts are incredible.  In this film, Jackie: runs across a single
thin pole of bamboo (unsupported) that is stretched between two tall buildings,
walks down the side of a building as it collapses, jumps on a very tall ladder
that is leaning against one building, and pivots it in mid-flight so that it
lands against the building next to it, slides down a six-story ladder, etc.
One important point: Jackie does all of his own stunt work, no stunt doubles!
In fact, the closing credits of the film show outtakes of the stunts, where you
can see that he really does get hurt sometimes in doing the stunts!
     Next to this, other action and adventure films are pretty tame.  Caution:
exposure to Jackie Chan films can be habit forming.  Should be viewed only by
persons who go to the movies to enjoy themselves.  [Note: I have only one
complaint about the movie.  The action and dialogue go so fast, that it is hard
to keep up with the subtitles!  However, this does not prevent enjoyment of the
film.]
     Overall evaluation: excellent; definitely worth seeing.
Reviewer: Thomas E. Billings; Department of Statistics
          University of California, Berkeley
Reviewer contact: teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Meet the Hollowheads (1988)
Synopsis:
Set in a bizarre, cartoonish world filled with tubes and pipes of all kinds,
this is the story of Henry Hollowhead, a meek man who brings his tyrant boss
home for dinner one evening.  A weird, outrageous, very campy film, gross and
even sick at times, but very, very funny!  A probable hit as a midnight and/or
cult film.
     This is the feature film debut of Director Tom Burman, and this film makes
a very impressive debut indeed!  It's not easy to characterize, but let me try:
take 2 parts of "The Jetsons," 1 part "Leave it to Beaver," and add 1 part of a
human version of Godzilla.  Add special effects, imaginative set design, and
plenty of very sick humor.
     The plot concerns one evening in the life of the Hollowheads, when Henry's
boss, an evil lecherous tyrant, invites himself over for dinner.  As it turns
out, Henry, and particularly his cruel, evil boss, get far more than they
expected!
     One of the nice features of this film is that it creates a whole new world
through the "magic" of film.  It is a world where everything involves pipes or
tubes; even the character's dialogue is loaded with references to pipes and
tubes.  The set design is original, imaginative, and cartoonish.
     The world of the Hollowheads is populated with strange creatures and 
people.  The Hollowheads have a pet that resembles a cross between a dog and a
person.  This pet is infested with large beetles, which the children pry off
and use as ammunition in a sling-shot device (making a bloody mess).  They keep
a large, one-eyed, multi-tentacled monster in an aquarium in their living room.
At times, they chop off a tentacle and eat it (along with servings of green
slime and blue powder; yum!).  Needless to say, the dietary habits of the
Hollowheads will offend squeamish viewers.
     The dialogue is witty and quite funny at times.  One quote that could
become famous: "Just say no to butt polish!"  (In the world of the Hollwheads,
"butt polish" is some sort of aphrodisiac drug).
     Although funny and enjoyable, the film starts to drag at the hour mark.
However, keep watching, for the last 20 minutes are pure insanity, and
extremely funny (though gross at times).  Overall, this is film is very good to
excellent; recommended to all but the squeamish!
Distribution.  Screened once only, at the Mill Valley Film Festival (Marin
County, Calif.).  Print Source: Moviestore Entertainment; no additional
information available on release plans.
Reviewer:  Thomas E. Billings, Department of Statistics
           University of California, Berkeley
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Johanna D'Arc of Mongolia (1988)
Synopsis:
Seven Western women are travelling on the Trans-Siberian railroad when
their train is hijacked by (female) Mongolian warriors.  The Western
women are taken as hostages and kept in a Mongolian village.  Although
the premise of the film is interesting, it is not an adventure story.
Instead it is more of a travelogue and culture study, and is fairly 
boring.
West Germany (English subtitles), color, 1989, 165 minutes.
Director/Writer:  Ulrike Ottinger
     The plot of the film is relatively low-key.  It begins on the
Trans-Siberian railroad, where four travellers, all women, meet and get
acquainted.  Two are middle-aged -- an English anthropologist, and a
German schoolteacher.  Two are young -- an American actress, and
Johanna, a young woman who is travelling light (backpack only).  The
women meet an amusing American man, an effeminate Yiddish opera singer
who is a glutton, and describes his meals using extremely beautiful,
poetic language.  Also on board is a singing group, the Kalinka
sisters.
     While crossing Mongolia, the train is stopped by a group of female
Mongolian warriors.  The Western women (the 4 travellers, plus the 3
Kalinka sisters), are taken as hostages, and moved to an (all-female)
Mongolian village.  The story continues with the cultural confrontations
that result when the Westerners experience Mongolian culture and 
traditions.
     I saw this movie because a brief review of it (published in a film
festival program guide) described it as a "lesbian LAWRENCE OF ARABIA".
Because of this comparison, I expected the film to be an epic adventure,
with a big budget.  The reality is that the film is a very low-budget
travelogue.  The film has a very thin plot that serves as filler between
scenes of traditional Mongolian culture and the countryside.
     The primary focus of the film is cultural interaction.  A pamphlet
available in the theater lobby included an interview with the Director,
and in the interview she specifically states that the focus of the film
is not "exotica" (i.e., Mongolia as an "exotic" culture), but the
interaction of cultures that are substantially different.  (I would
prefer to quote the interview directly, but have lost the pamphlet.)
The comparison of the film to LAWRENCE OF ARABIA may be reasonable or
not, depending on what you consider LAWRENCE to be -- an adventure
film, a travelogue, or a film on cultural interaction.  (The very low
budget and low production values of JOHANNA are not even close to the
high standards of LAWRENCE).
     The film does provide a view into Mongolia, an isolated country
that is rarely visited by Westerners.  However, in order to experience
the travelogue "portion", one must endure roughly 1.5 hours of slow,
weak plot development.  (At 2 hrs 45 min, the movie is much too long.)
Because of the weak (nearly non-existent) plot I would not recommend the
film to a general audience.  Those with a strong interest in Mongolia
might find the film worthy of consideration.
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for West Is West (1987)
Synopsis:
A young man from Bombay arrives in San Francisco, hoping to gain admission to
college.  However, his sponsor has left the U.S., and the Immigration and
Naturalization Service thinks he is a Sikh terrorist.  He has only 24 hours to
get married to a U.S. citizen -- or be deported.  Naturally, he asks the only
American woman he has met -- a thoroughly obnoxious punkette!  A comedy/drama
of culture shock.
Director/Writer/Film Editor: David Rathod
Producer: Cristi Janaki Rathod
Principal cast: Ashutosh Gowariker, Heidi Carpenter, Pearl Padamsee
     The film is the story of Vikram, a nerdish young man from Bombay, who
comes to San Francisco in anticipation that he will be admitted to U.C.
Berkeley.  As things turn out, his sponsor has left the U.S. for an indefinite
period (returned to India).  Vikram goes to one of the city's better hotels,
only to find that a single room costs $175/night, rather more than he can
afford.
     He eventually ends up in a seedy hotel in the Tenderloin district (perhaps
the city's worst neighborhood).  The hotel is owned by one Mrs. Shah, a
spirited ("salty" or "seedy" might be more accurate) immigrant from India.  She
gives Vikram a menial job, and he begins to explore America.
     In his explorations, Vikram visits a supermarket, and develops a taste for
junk food.  He meets Sue, an obnoxious redheaded punkette, when she shows up at
the hotel with a punk rock band and some groupies, trying to rent a single room
for a "party."  Later he runs into her at the movie theater where she works.
Sue then introduces Vikram to the San Francisco punk scene.
     Vikram is soon visited by a zealous agent of the INS, the Immigration and 
Naturalization Service.  It seems that the INS thinks he might be a terrorist,
and they want him out of the country.  Mrs. Shah seizes the opportunity to
offer to sponsor Vikram in the U.S., if only he will marry her niece.  In an
act of desperation, Vikram asks the only U.S. citizen he knows, the thoroughly
vile Sue, to marry him, and the story continues from there.
     This is the first feature film by its director, David Rathod, and it shows
at times.  Additionally, of the 3 principal cast members, only one has
extensive acting experience, and this is apparent also.  It's really not a bad
movie; perhaps the best description would be "weak."
     The film is weak in the following sense.  It is advertised as a comedy,
yet there is very little humor or comedy in the film.  As a drama, it fares
better, although it has a rather slow pace (obviously it's not an "action
film").  The culture shock angle is used extensively in the film, but it is not
handled very well -- it generates very few laughs.
Reviewer:  Thomas E. Billings, Department of Statistics
           University of California, Berkeley
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Tales from the Gimli Hospital (1988)
Synopsis:
Set in the distant past in Gimli, an imaginary Icelandic fishing village, this
is the story of "Einar the Lonely," a fisherman who gets sick in an epidemic
and must stay in a very strange hospital to recover.  Very similar to
ERASERHEAD in style; destined to become a cult film.
Canada, black-and-white, 1988, 66 minutes.
Director/Writer: Guy Maddin
     The story begins in modern Gimli.  Two children visit their mother, who is
very sick, in the hospital.  It turns out that the mother spends her time in
the hospital listening to strange electronic music.  Since the mother is
indisposed, the nurse takes the children aside and tells them the story of
"Einar the Lonely," which we viewers see as a reenactment.
     As the story of Einar begins, we see vignettes of life in Gimli, where
people wash their faces with straw, and squeeze oil from live fish, after which
the fish oil is used as hair cream.  (As you can tell, Gimli is a very strange
place!)  One day Einar gets sick; an epidemic is sweeping Gimli.  He is then
admitted to the hospital.  Continuing with the strangeness, we see the hospital
treatments for the epidemic: rubbing dead seagulls over the sores, and ritual
bloodlettings done with the point of a large sickle.
     Einar slowly recovers, and tries to make friends with the voluptuous
nurses in the hospital.  He makes friends with the man in the bed next to his,
and the very strange story of this man is told in flashbacks.  As it turns out,
Einar has, through his gross perversion, committed a great wrong against this
man.  This is revealed, and the story continues from there.
     The style of this film is very similar to the cult film ERASERHEAD.  It
was filmed in black and white (mostly black), and appears to have been done on
a very low budget.  The photography ranges from soft focus scenes reminiscent
of the very best black-and-white films of the 1930s and 1940s, to blurry scenes
that look like somebody's home movie.  Despite the low budget, the Director
succeeds in creating a whole new world (the hospital in Gimli), just as David
Lynch succeeded in doing in ERASERHEAD.  The Director of this film, Guy Maddin,
shows considerable imagination here - though it is a very warped imagination.
     There is plenty of humor in the film, and of course it is a very warped
kind of humor.  Most of the humor is derived from the strange customs and the
way things are done in Gimli.  This film is much funnier than ERASERHEAD (to be
fair, I should point out that ERASERHEAD is not a comedy), and is, in my
opinion, a better film.
     There is one aspect of this film that deserves comment: it is an
independent production.  Many imaginative and interesting films are made
independently.  The problem is that they have a hard time getting screened.
You may have to search out independent films, as they get limited distribution
and marketing, but you may find the search to be worthwhile.
     Overall, I would not recommend this film to a general audience, as it is
simply too weird.  However, I strongly recommend it to anyone that liked
ERASERHEAD, for this film is the better of the two!
Distribution.  Being screened at a limited number of theaters in the U.S.; in
the San Francisco area, it is shown weekly at one theater as a  midnight film.
Reviewer:  Thomas E. Billings, Department of Statistics
           University of California, Berkeley
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Delicatessen (1991)
Synopsis:
At a time when food is scarce and cannibalism rampant, a butcher obtains
meat to sell by hiring handymen and then, when the time is right,
chopping them up.  His daughter falls in love with the latest handyman,
an unemployed circus clown and vegetarian, and tries to save him.  Sick,
demented, warped, and, of course, outrageously funny!  More a black
comedy than a horror film; will appeal to fans of EATING RAOUL.
France (English subtitles), color, 1991, 97 minutes.
Directors:  Jean-Pierre Jeunet, Marc Caro.
     Let me begin by saying that although the subject of the film is
cannibalism, there is very little blood or gore in the film.  Some, but
certainly not all, of the violence in the film is implied.  The (human)
"meat" that the butcher sells is packaged in opaque, paper packages; it
is all very sanitized.  However, if the film's visuals don't gross you
out, the film's very sick humor may!
     The film takes place at some undetermined time in the future, when
food is scarce.  Although it is not explicitly stated, it appears there
was a war that stopped food production.  Grain is so scarce it is used
as money, and cannibalism is rampant.  A butcher owns a small apartment
block; he routinely runs an ad in a newspaper for a maintenance worker.
The butcher's practice is to hire a new maintenance worker, then kill
him and sell the meat to the residents of the apartment building, who
are all cannibals.
     The butcher hires a new maintenance worker, an unemployed circus
clown (and vegetarian) named Stanley.  Soon Stanley meets the butcher's
daughter, and love blossoms.  The butcher's daughter tries to convince
her father to spare Stanley from the chopping block, but her father
refuses.  Distraught and desperate to save her beloved, the butcher's
daughter seeks help from the Troglodytes, an underground (literally)
vegetarian group that tries to rescue people from cannibals....
     Although this is one of the sickest films I have seen in some time,
it is also very, very funny.  The emphasis of the film is on black humor
rather than gore or blood.  Perhaps the best comparison film is EATING
RAOUL, another warped comedy about cannibalism.  Although many viewers
will appreciate and enjoy the film's warped humor, others may find it to
be in very poor taste!
     The film is well-made and conforms to high production standards.
The art design is excellent and contributes substantially to the strange
atmosphere of the film.  The writing is truly excellent, with plenty of
dry, sarcastic, very sick humor to delight (or offend) the viewer.
     One of the film's weak points is the Troglodytes, a weird gang that
live in the city's sewer system.  The film never makes it clear exactly
what they are; it is suggested that they are vegetarians rescuing people
from cannibals.  However, they are portrayed as a bizarre and totally
incompetent cult (one could claim that the cannibals are shown in a
better light in the film).  Certainly their weirdness is funny at times,
though I felt they added little to the film.
     I would recommend the film to fans of EATING RAOUL, and to those
that enjoy black humor that is truly warped.  Sensitive, easily offended
people should avoid the film as you probably won't enjoy its humor.
Distribution/Print Source: Currently on the festival circuit, i.e.,
showing only at film festivals.  The U.S. distributor is Miramax Films,
so it will be released in the U.S. in the future (no info. on timing).

Title
Review for Bakenbardy (1990)
Synopsis:
A medium-sized Soviet city is plagued by a youth gang that resembles
Western punks.  A traditionalist organizes another group, the Alexander
Pushkin Appreciation Society, to combat the punks.  A satire of Soviet
society and the effects of Perestroika; this film resembles a movie
version of a Monty Python historical sketch.  Outrageously funny!
U.S.S.R. (English subtitles), color, 1990, 100 minutes.
Director: Yuri Mamin.
     The time is the present.  A medium-sized Soviet city is plagued by
a gang of college-aged youth, the Capellas.  They look and act like
Western punks; they hold wild parties in a disco, their women expose
their bare breasts in public, and they engage in other types of openly
decadent behavior.  They are opposed by another gang, the Bashers, who
are rednecks and body builders.
     Into this social turmoil come two young men, dressed in rather
formal clothes: black dress pants, white shirts, black capes, hats, and
canes.  They worship Alexander Pushkin, a Russian literary figure who
lived around 1800.  They despise the decadence of the Capellas, and
organize the Bashers into a Pushkin gang, dressing them in the "uniform"
they wear, i.e.  they all dress like Pushkin.  They train in the use of
the cane as a martial art, in a hilarious scene reminiscent of those
group calisthenics scenes that are obligatory in a kung fu movie.
     One night the Pushkin gang attacks the Capellas and runs them out
of town.  This pleases the city's residents very much.  The story
continues as the gang is certified as an official youth organization.
They grow in membership and power, and evolve into a para-military
organization....
     This film is a nice satire of current trends in Soviet society.
The Pushkin cult is clearly a cult of personality, similar to the
personality cults the Soviet government has forced on its citizens in
the past.  This point is underscored when the cult members go around
town, taking down the large, red government banners (with their stupid
socialist slogans), replacing them with large white banners with
quotations from Pushkin.
     As the Pushkin cult grows, from a small gang, to an official youth
organization, to a large organization with a merchandising wing, it
becomes increasingly more militaristic and totalitarian.  The growth of
the cult is an example of one of the dangers of increasing freedom in
the USSR, namely that new forms of totalitarianism may arise to take the
place of the old totalitarianism of Communism.  Indeed, by presenting a
totalitarian organization based on an 1800's literary figure, the film
suggests that the roots of totalitarianism are old and firmly
established in Soviet society and the Soviet psyche.  Reportedly, the
film has had only limited screenings in the USSR, probably as a result
of the fact that it links personality cults with the emergence of new
forms of totalitarianism.
     Although the work has clear political overtones and an important
message, you do not need to appreciate that to enjoy the movie.  The
idea that literary figures form the basis for large, totalitarian
personality cults is so silly that the film is really very funny.  Also,
the film doesn't take itself very seriously, as it is intended to be a
satire.  The silliness makes the film resemble a movie-length version of
a Monty Python style historical sketch.
     Because of the great humor in the film, I recommend it to a general
audience; strongly recommended to fans of satire and Monty-Python-style
humor.
Print Source: Lenfilm/Golos; 10 Kirovsky Prospekt; Leningrad, USSR.
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for I skugga Hrafnsins (1988)
Synopsis:
A dispute between two clans in ancient Iceland threatens to turn into a
war.  Will a marriage stop the fighting, or will the corrupt Bishop
prevail?  A drama of trust, love, power, and revenge, based on the
legend of Tristan and Isolde.  Very good, although it is slow-moving at
times.
Iceland/Sweden (English subtitles), color, 1988, 118 minutes.
Director/Writer:  Hrafn Gunnlaugsson
     The story is set in Iceland, in the year 1077.  Christianity has
replaced the old Norse religions, and the Church is, besides the clan,
the major power in society.  Trausti (Icelandic for Tristan) returns
home after studying theology in Norway to find himself caught in the
middle of a clan struggle over rights to a beached whale.  Trausti's
clan found the whale, but it was beached in an area belonging to the
other clan.
     A battle ensues, and the leader of the opposing clan is killed in
the fight.  Isolde, the beautiful daughter of the slain clan leader, is
taken prisoner in the battle.  Inasmuch as Isolde believes that Trausti
killed her father, she is determined to get revenge.  The fighting is
reported to the Church, and the local Bishop gets involved.
     The Bishop turns out to be very corrupt and devious.  Trausti
manages to convince Isolde of his innocence; they plan to marry to stop
the fighting.  The Bishop opposes this, for he wanted his son to marry
Isolde, thereby increasing his power base.  The story continues with
preparations for the wedding as the Bishop considers various evil
schemes.
     This film presents a dramatic study in the use and abuse of power
(clan dispute, actions of the Bishop), revenge and love (the
relationship between Trausti and Isolde) and, most of all, trust.
Trausti often trusted people.  Sometimes his trust was justified,
sometimes not, with resultant tragic consequences.
     From a technical viewpoint, the film is only average.  It appears
to have a modest budget (no lavish sets, small cast), and the acting is
average.  The photography is good, although the "star" is sometimes the
spectacular landscape of Iceland!  Further, the film really drags in the
middle.
     What makes the film very good, instead of just average, is the
message it conveys, and the final (exciting, shocking) 30 minutes.  As I
was watching it, I was ready to write the film off as mediocre, when it
suddenly got very dramatic and interesting.  Patience has its rewards!
Distribution.  Not in general U.S. release at the present time.  Most
likely places to see it are film festivals, societies, or archives.
Print Source: Jupiter Distribution, Inc., 8670 Wilshire Blvd., Beverly
Hills, California 90211.
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Aab, baad, khaak (1989)
Synopsis:
A young teenager returns home after an absence to find his village in
Iran deserted because of an incredibly severe drought.  He begins a
search to find his family, traveling through an amazingly bleak and
desolate landscape.   Primarily an essay on the issue of humans vs.
nature, the film is of interest for technical and cultural reasons.
Iran (English subtitles), color, 1985 (released 1989), 75 minutes.
Director/Writer:  Amir Naderi
     How would you like to spend an hour or so in a fierce sandstorm, in
a dried-out lake, in the bleak, desolate landscape of the desert at the
border between Iran and Afghanistan?  That's pretty much what this movie
is.
     A young man, in his early teens, returns to his village after a two
year absence, to rejoin his family.  He was away working and earning
money.  When he reaches his home village, he finds it deserted except
for one man.  He tells the teenager that everyone has left, to escape
the drought.  The young man then begins a search, over a bleak, ravaged
landscape, to try to find his family among the groups of wandering
refugees.
     As his search progresses, he meets other people and has some
unusual experiences.  However, the primary focus, in story and
(stunning) photography, is on the extreme struggle required to survive
in the drought-ravaged area.  In the area, water=life, and the teenager
must also find it to survive.
     The film is worthwhile for its excellent photography of an
unbelievably bleak, harsh landscape, and for the view it provides into
another culture.  As a visual essay on the subject of humans vs.
nature, it is very good.  However, many viewers will likely find it
boring, for it has a slow pace and there is little action or special
effects.  Some viewers may be offended by one scene that shows dogs
tearing apart the carcass of a dead cow.
     Although I would not recommend the film to a general audience, the
film may appeal to people interested in the region, its culture, and the
topic of humans vs. nature.
Distribution.  Part of a film series, "Iranian Film Now", coordinated by
The Film Center, Chicago on behalf of the Farabi Cinema Foundation.
Screened at the Pacific Film Archive, University of California,
Berkeley.  This film may be available on video, if you can find a source
for Iranian videos.
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Beirut: The Last Home Movie (1987)
Director:  Jennifer Fox.
Documentary;  USA, 1987, color, 123 minutes.
Released by: Circle Releasing Corp.
     This documentary tells the story of a woman, Gaby Bustros, who returned to
her home in Beirut in 1981 after spending 15 years in the US, and who decides
to stay in Beirut despite the ongoing civil war.  The Bustros family consists
of Gaby and her two older sisters (all in their thirties), her younger brother
(in his twenties), and her mother.  The family lives in a very large and
luxurious mansion located in the Ashrafiya neighborhood of Beirut, scene of
some of the most vicious fighting of the Lebanese civil war.
     The first half of the film centers on how the family manages to live
nearly normal lives, despite the violent war raging around them.  The family
essentially ignores the fact that artillery shells have landed in their garden,
blowing up trees and killing a soldier from the local militia.  When the
shelling gets really fierce, they close all the window shutters and throw small
neighborhood parties while the rockets and artillery explode around them!  Many
of the interviews in the film have as background noise the gunfire of the war,
which seems to never end.  The considerable wealth of the Bustros family is a
sharp contrast to the chaos and destruction that surrounds them.
     A point of considerable discussion in the film is the fact that the family
could sell their home at a substantial profit, and move to a safer area (Paris,
New York, etc.).  However, Gaby's oldest sister refuses to consider the idea
and insists on staying.  The film suggests that her reluctance to move may be
because she finds the war to be "exciting."  A more pedestrian & also more
plausible explanation is that she has an emotional attachment to the house.
Unfortunately, the film does not explore this possibility.
     In the middle of the film, there is an interesting conversation with two
male friends of the family, which takes place on a sailboat in Beirut harbor.
One friend blames the war on the laziness of the Lebanese & their unwillingness
to protect their freedom.  The other friend claims that war has become a way of
life for the Lebanese!
     Although the first half of the movie provides an interesting look at life
in a war zone from a woman's perspective, the last half of the film is a real
disappointment.  The film moves into a study of the (failed) love lives of the
sisters, their feelings for their late father, and the upcoming wedding of
Gaby's brother.  In other words, the film degenerates into something resembling
a (very boring) soap opera!  The only high point of the second half is the
spectacular and, yes, beautiful, footage of nighttime artillery & rocket
battles in Beirut, and the warm glow of the city as it burns afterward.
     I went to see this film because I have some first-hand knowledge of
Beirut, having visited the city three times.  [My last visit was unscheduled; I
was flying standby from New Delhi to Rome, and was offloaded in Beirut at a
time when there was active fighting.  I had the "privilege" of experiencing the
civil war first hand.  Moral of story: if you fly standby, don't fly through
Beirut!]  Also, the local film critics praised the film highly.  I was deeply
disappointed by the film, and regard it as a rather boring soap opera style
documentary.  Overall evaluation: poor; recommend you avoid it.
P.S.  The Boston PBS station, WGBH, provided some of the funding for this film.
This suggests that the film may soon appear on PBS television stations.  If you
are a supporter of your local PBS station, you might consider sending their
programming department a note, suggesting that they not waste any of their
(limited) programming budget on this boring film!
Reviewer: Thomas E. Billings; Department of Statistics
University of California, Berkeley
Reviewer contact: teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Portaborse, Il (1991)
Synopsis:
A high-school teacher who ghost-writes novels, is hired as a
speechwriter and advisor to an ambitious government Minister in present
day Italy.  When the Minister runs for higher office, the teacher is
directly involved in the campaign.  As the campaign progresses, he
begins to learn how corrupt the political system, and his boss, are!  A
lighthearted social and political satire that doesn't insult your
intelligence; above average.
Italy (English subtitles), color, 1991, 95 minutes.
Director: Daniele Luchetti
     First, there is a potential "identification" issue to clarify.  The
Italian title of the film is IL PORTABORSE, which is translated
literally in the subtitle as BROWN NOSE.  However, the film was listed
in the San Francisco International Film Festival program guide as THE
YES MAN.  Apparently it will be released in the U.S. under the title
THE YES MAN; however I have no "official" confirmation of that.
     The story centers on a middle-aged high-school classics teacher,
who moonlights as a ghost writer of novels.  His girlfriend is also a
teacher, who lives some distance away.  The teacher lives in the old
family estate, which is crumbling and in need of expensive repairs.
     One day the teacher is offered a job as speech-writer and public
relations aide to Cesare Botero, an important government Minister.  He
accepts the offer, and moves to Rome to begin his duties.  When Botero
runs for higher office, the teacher becomes deeply involved in the
campaign, and politics in general.
     Although things are strange and interesting at first, the teacher
slowly learns that things are not what they appear to be in politics.
He slowly learns of the substantial corruption in politics: vote buying,
vote fraud, influence peddling, conflict of interest, and so on.  As the
story progresse, the teacher has second thoughts about his new career...
     This is a relatively light-hearted look at politics, and
politicians in general.  The plot is realistic, and the writers resisted
the urge to make it mean-spirited (in today's political climate, it
would be easy to be mean-spirited).  Although the film is set in Italy,
where it has apparently created considerable controversy, the view of
politics it provides is more universal.  To make comparisons with the
U.S., I would describe the government Minister Cesare Botero as a
politician who does many of the things Clinton has been accused of
(adultery, influence peddling, conflict of interest), but whose image
and rhetoric are both vague and populist, ala Jerry Brown.
     This film is relatively intelligent; the plot and dialog are
realistic.  The production values are high, and the acting nicely
understated.  The actor who plays the teacher (sorry, don't know his
name) reminded me of Dudley Moore (in his better days).  The result is a
sophisticated satire of politics and, indirectly, social values.  If you
enjoy low-key political satire, the film is certainly worth seeing.
U.S. Distribution: currently on the film festival circuit.  Print
source is: Titanus Distribuzione, 19 Largo Chigi, 00187 Rome, Italy.  No
confirmed information available on future U.S. theatrical release.

Title
Review for Seńor muy viejo con unas alas enormes, Un (1988)
Synopsis:
A mute winged man (an angel, perhaps?)  is discovered by a poor couple in the
Caribbean.  They put him in their chicken coop.  Word spreads and soon their
house is a major tourist stop, visited by crowds of pilgrims and curiosity
seekers, and surrounded by a constant carnival.  An interesting film, but 
nothing special.
Cuba/Italy/Spain (English subtitles), color, 1988, 90 minutes.
Director: Fernando Birri
     One night, during a heavy rainstorm, an old man washes ashore in front of
the home of Pelayo and Elisena, a very poor couple living in the Caribbean
(possibly Cuba).  The man is very old, weak, mute, and has very large wings!
Could he be an angel?
     They put him in their fenced-in chicken coop.  Word quickly spreads that
he is an angel, and crowds of curiosity seekers and religious pilgrims appear.
The local priest comes by to denounce him as a fraud, but nobody pays 
attention.  Pelayo and Elisena realize that there's money in this for them, and
begin to charge admission.
     Shortly thereafter they learn that the "angel" might be a mere mortal.
However, they cover it up, as they don't want to lose their new business.  An
amusement park/carnival develops in their neighborhood, serving the crowds that
come to see the angel.  This attracts hucksters and other shady types.  Pelayo
and Elisena must deal with the changes this brings in their life, and the story
continues from there.
     This film provides some interesting insights into human nature, though the
insights are often cruel.  The angel is alternately adored and abused by the
crowds.  A blind woman enters the chicken coop, singing in a high pitched
voice, and demanding a miracle (not asking, demanding).  She doesn't specify
the miracle she wants.  When a miracle is not immediately delivered, she starts
to beat the angel with her cane!  This angers the angel (who has some powers),
and he gives her a miracle: he changes her voice to a deep, man's voice!  Well,
she gets her miracle after all!  Additional insights are provided by the
priest's bumbling efforts to discredit the angel, and by the hucksters that
appear to make money off the crowds visiting the angel.
     Although the film is relatively interesting, and is well made with high
production values, I should warn you that the story develops at a slow pace.
Additionally, the film seems to be edited for television (it was originally
made for Spanish television).
     Although the film is interesting, its slow pace and unusual subject
prevent me from recommending it to a general audience.  Those with an interest
in human relations films should give it consideration.
Distribution.  Currently being screened at some art houses and repertory
theaters in the U.S., it is part of a set of films being marketed under the
title "Dangerous Loves."  These films, originally made for Spanish television,
are based (sometimes loosely) on stories by Gabriel Garcia Marquez.
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Sanshô dayű (1954)
Synopsis:
In 9th century Japan, a district governor is sent into exile.  His
family is later kidnapped and sold into slavery.  After many years in
slavery, the son escapes to search for his father, and seeks revenge on
the cruel bailiff who held him in slavery.  An epic drama, with a strong
anti-slavery message.
Japan (English subtitles), black-and-white, 1954, 125 minutes.
Director: Kenji Mizoguchi.
     The story begins with the exile of the governor of Tango district.
He is being exiled because he didn't follow orders; orders that he
believed were too harsh and harmful to the peasants.  A few years later
his wife and family are on their way to visit him.  However, they are
kidnapped and sold into slavery.  The mother is sold to a brothel on a
distant island, and the children are sold to the estate of Sansho, the
local bailiff.
     The estate Sansho manages is very large, with many slaves, who are
controlled via brute force and extreme cruelty.  Years pass, and the
children (brother and sister) grow up as slaves.  The boy grows into a
strong young man, favored by the bailiff for his hard work and devotion.
One day an opportunity arises to escape.  The son takes advantage of the
opportunity, and goes to the Prime Minister's residence, seeking justice
and information on his father...
     This film is considered by some to be one of the classics of world
cinema.  It has also been compared to the classic Greek tragedies.  Now
that I have had an opportunity to see it, I can report that these are
accurate and reasonable assessments of the film.  This is a very good
film indeed.  The story line is very compact, and is written very well.
The production values are very high, and the acting is excellent.
     The story is quite interesting, and the film has a number of good
messages.  One of these is loyalty, as the little boy learns his
father's philosophy, rejects it when he is a young adult, then reaffirms
the philosophy when he realizes the cruelty of his situation.  However,
the principal message is anti-slavery, which is the driving force in the
story.  Sansho is a very cruel bailiff, though he won't kill slaves
(they are too valuable); instead he has them branded and beaten.
     This film is indeed a classic, and I recommend it to a general
audience.  It's worth seeing if you have the opportunity.
Distribution: Screened at the Pacific Film Archive in Berkeley, CA.  The
print was from the Archive's collection of Japanese films.  The owner of
the film copyright is Films Inc.
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Die xue shuang xiong (1989)
Synopsis:
A professional killer accidentally blinds a young woman in a shootout.
Driven by guilt and financial need, he accepts a last job; to kill the
head of a large drug syndicate!  Further complications: the last job is
a double-cross, and his employers try to have him killed.  A
psychological view of the killer and the policeman who stalks him,
interspersed with outrageously violent shootouts and black humor.
     The film centers on Jeffrey, a skilled hit man or professional
killer.  During a wild shootout in a bar, a beautiful young woman (a
singer in the bar), is blinded by powder burns from his gun.  He
befriends her, and falls in love with her.  She needs a cornea
transplant, and cannot afford one.  So, driven by guilt and the need to
finance her operation, he accepts what he plans to be his last job: to
kill the head of an international drug syndicate!
     The last job is completed, then he is double-crossed.  The people
who hired him try to kill him (in further wild shootouts).  Meanwhile, a
police inspector is closing in on Jeffrey.  The story continues as
Jeffrey sets out to kill the man who double-crossed him....
     The Director, John Woo, is perhaps best known for the film series A
BETTER TOMORROW.  The current film is a very stylish "gangster film,"
but it is not like most other gangster films.  Instead, due to the wild
shootouts, it might be compared to a Western, particularly the very
violent Italian Westerns of the 1970's (e.g., Sergio Leone's films).
     The film centers on emotions: Jeffrey's guilt and love for Jenny,
the woman he blinded; the police inspector's obsession and hatred for
Jeffrey which turns to admiration and respect as the film progresses;
Jeffrey's friendship with another killer, and the "gangster code of
ethics" they follow.  However, all the psychological intricacies of the
very complex characters in the film are overwhelmed by the violence in
the film, which is a virtual bloodbath.
     The shootouts in this film are so wild, so outrageous, that it is
reasonable to describe them as a "ballet of violence."  They are pure
violence elevated to the level of an art form!  They also reflect real
technical brilliance in special effects and (fight) choreography.
Initially, you might marvel at the artistic and technical skill they
reflect.  However, they are so overdone (and there are so many shootouts
in the film), that you soon become numb to it all.
     The relationship between Jeffrey and the police inspector chasing
him is quite complex.  There is a hilarious scene where the inspector
confronts Jeffrey in Jenny's apartment; Jeffrey and the police inspector
stand face to face, at arm's length, pointing pistols at each other's
face!  Jenny, being blind, is unaware of the confrontation and makes tea
and exchanges social pleasantries with the men, as they maneuver in a
deadly game.  However, as the film progresses, they become friends, as
the policeman admires Jeffrey's devotion to Jenny.
     Because of the extreme violence of the film, I would not recommend
it to a general audience.  However, fans of gangster films and violent
Westerns may find its wild shootouts and black humor to their liking.
Distribution: in limited theatrical release; currently showing (4/27)
in San Francisco.
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Zan Boko (1988)
     The 32nd San Francisco International Film Festival took place from March
7-19, 1989.  Approximately 80-90 films were screened, about half of which were
U.S. premieres.  Most of the films shown were from countries other than the
U.S.  Films were shown at three different locations, two in San Francisco, and
one in Berkeley.
     The Festival was heavily advertised in the local press, particularly the
free newspapers catering to the arts/entertainment market.  Getting tickets was
relatively easy, provided you didn't wait too long (many film screenings sold
out).  Tickets were available by mail-order (early orders), at the box offices
once screenings began, and from various ticketing agencies.
     Besides organizing the annual festival, the San Francisco International
Film Festival organization also serves as a year-round film society, providing
special screenings and sneak previews of many major films.  Most large cities
have a "film society" and/or a film festival and I would encourage you to
investigate the services they provide.
     The following sections provide mini-reviews of 3 films from the Festival
that I did not do full reviews of, ranking of films seen, comments on Festival
films I wanted to see but couldn't, and comments on Festival awards.
1. Synopsis/reviews of other (previously unreviewed) films screened at the
Festival
ROUGE (Hong Kong, 1987).  In 1930's Hong Kong, a prostitute and her lover
commit suicide together, preferring to be together in hell rather than be
separated by his disapproving parents.  After waiting 50 years for him to
arrive in the after-life, she returns to modern Hong Kong as a ghost to search
for him.  In her search she is aided by a modern day couple.  The premise is
interesting but the overall result is mediocre.  The film spends too much time
in flashbacks to the past, whereas the events in the present are the most
interesting.
ZAN BOKO (Burkina Faso ["Upper Volta"], 1988).  The land of a poor farmer is
taken from him by his rich neighbor, who wants it for a swimming pool.  A story
of government corruption and censorship in an African setting.  The problem
with the film is its incredibly slow pace, which will bore most viewers.  Fans
of African films might like it, though.
IT'S HAPPENING TOMORROW (Italy, 1988).  Two cowboys bungle a robbery, after
which they are framed for a much larger theft.  They are pursued by mercenaries
turned bounty hunters.  In their flight they encounter kidnappers, royalty, and
some very strange people.  An offbeat, frequently funny film that is rather
uneven in style and pace.  "Good" but not a "very good" rating.  Some of their
adventures are reminiscent of the fiction of Jules Verne.
2. Rankings of films seen, with comments as appropriate.
EARTH GIRLS ARE EASY.  The best film in the festival; 100% camp humor, 100%
pure fun.  Theatrical release begins mid-May.
PROJECT A II.  Action/comedy that moves at warp speed.
THE CITADEL.  A look at life in a small Algerian village that is very
interesting and very witty.
HARD TIMES.  Minimalist approach to Charles Dicken's work; very well done.
EVENING BELL.  Very tense war drama; will certainly hold your attention!
THE CANNIBALS.  Opera stars go cannibal!  Grand opera was never like this.  A
savagely funny spoof.
TABATABA.  Deals with the 1947 Malagasy rebellion.  Very interesting.
THE VOYAGE BEYOND.  Deals with suttee (ritual suicide of widows).  Slow moving
but interesting, a very complex story.
FAR FROM WAR.  Melodrama about the conflict between the generations in the
"new" China.  Stunning landscape photography.
IT'S HAPPENING TOMORROW.  The film is captivating for the first half, then it
falls on its face.
ROUGE.  Different editing and more time spent in the present could change this
from a mediocre to a very good film.
ZAN BOKO.  Good message, but told in a way that will bore most audiences.
LANDSCAPE IN THE MIST.  Disturbing, depressing, and occasionally disgusting.
Total yuck!
3. Films I wanted to see but couldn't.....
     TALES FROM THE GIMLI HOSPITAL (Canada, 1988) is described as a likely
"cult" film or "midnight movie" (my favorite kind!).  It is some sort of folk
tale, where the people do such strange things as wash their faces with straw,
use fish oil (squeezed from live fish) as hair ointment, and so on.
     PROJECT A, the 1984 Hong Kong film whose sequel, PROJECT A II (such an
original name!) is extremely good.
     These awards are restricted to non-theatrical film, video, and television,
and are given each year by the San Francisco International Film Festival.  The
awards are prestigious as they are selected in a competition that attracts
hundreds of entries.  The list of awards is lengthy, and I shall only mention
two films that were reviewed in this newsgroup recently.
     In the Film and Video Division, category 1, Short Narrative, the top award
("Best of Category") was given to SUPERSTAR: THE KAREN CARPENTER STORY.  This
film is a docu-drama of the life of pop singer Karen Carpenter, done with a
cast consisting entirely of Barbie dolls!  I reviewed the film (and gave it a
good recommendation) in January in this group.
     In the same Division, category 6, Current Events, a "Special Jury Award"
(translation: 2nd prize) was given to BEIRUT: THE LAST HOME MOVIE, a film that
I reviewed in early March (personally, I think they should rename it "Beirut:
The Last Boring Soap Opera").
     If you do attend a film festival, I give you only one piece of advice:
when choosing the films to see, be adventurous and see some films that you
might not ordinarily go to.  Admittedly you will be disappointed at times, but
you will also discover interesting and enjoyable films this way.  For example,
I had some reservations about seeing TABATABA and THE CITADEL.  However, 
TABATABA was good and THE CITADEL was truly excellent.  You must take risks to
make discoveries!
Reviewer:  Thomas E. Billings, Department of Statistics
           University of California, Berkeley
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Canibais, Os (1988)
Screened at its U.S. premiere at the San Francisco International Film Festival
(March 14, 1989).
Synopsis:
Opera stars turn cannibal in this film, a parody of grand opera, with a savage
(and frequently sick) sense of humor.  Very strange!
Portugal/France (Portuguese with English subtitles), 1988, color, 100 minutes.
Director/Screenplay: Manoel de Oliveira (based on a work by Alvaro Carvalhal)
Producer: Paolo Branco
Principal Cast: Leonor Siveira, Luis Miguel Cintra, Diogo Doria
Print Source: Portuguese Film Institute
     This film is an opera about the romance (and eventual marriage) of a
beautiful lady to a rather morose Viscount, while an intensely jealous rival
suitor (his name is Don Juan) looks on from the sidelines.  On the wedding
night, a series of bizarre and grotesque events occur, after which there is a
controversy over a well-charred roast -- could it be human?
     The first hour of the film is rather tedious, as the Director spoofs all
the conventions of "grand opera" and costume dramas.  The film's narrator
serves as a built-in critic at times, providing literary criticism of the story
as well.  However, the viewer's patience is rewarded, as the sick and savagely
funny events occur in the last half-hour.
     A few points should be noted.  Although the first half is tedious at
times, there is some rather corny humor in it to make it endurable.  Devoted
opera fans may be offended by this film, and the many delightful ways it pokes
fun at (and insults) opera conventions.  Also, note that some of the humor in
the second half is pretty sick.  There were times when half the audience was
laughing, while the other half was gasping in horror.
     Technical merits.  The photography is excellent, the period costumes and
sets (1700's, "grand opera") are superb, and there is careful attention to
detail.  The acting is relatively good, considering that it is "opera style"
(i.e., exaggerated facial gestures).  The production values are very high; this
is not a cheap film!
     My overall evaluation of this film: good to very good.  Is it worth
seeing?  This depends on how you feel about opera, and your sense of humor.
Can you stand to sit through about 1 hour of opera (low volume, very little of
the wailing, shrieking, and bellowing that opera fans call "art") for a half
hour of savagely funny humor?  Of course, if you like opera, you might like the
film's spoofing of opera (i.e., in which case you might like the first hour).
I thought it was pretty funny, but I hate opera so much that I resented having
to wait so long to get to the good parts!  However, this is a film worthy of
serious consideration.
Reviewer: Thomas E. Billings; Department of Statistics
              University of California, Berkeley
Reviewer contact: teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Split (1989)
Synopsis:
In the near future, society is controlled by a totalitarian police force that
relies heavily on computers. A loner, armed with a "doomsday weapon," dares to
fight the system and preach the heresy of individualism.  A fast-paced science
fiction film, filled with computer graphics.
Director/Screenplay: Chris Shaw
Principal cast: Tim Dwight, Joan Bechtel, John Flynn, Chris Shaw
Special Effects: Robert Shaw, Peter Broadwell
     This is the first film by Chris Shaw, a mathematician embarking on a new
career as a film maker.  Shaw is best known for writing textbooks; his works
include "Dynamics: The Geometry of Behavior."  However, his debut as a Director
is impressive, for the film is very fast paced, filled with computer graphics,
     The film is set in the near future, where society is controlled by a
totalitarian police force which uses computers to track and control the 
population.  A weirdo named Starker -  who stands out because there is no file
on him in the huge police database, is pursued by the police.
     It turns out that Starker is a very dangerous man to the system.  In fact,
he is carrying the weapon that can defeat the system: a plastic case filled
with genetically engineered bacteria that infect people with the "disease"
(from the system's viewpoint) of individualism.  Once people become
individuals, they are useless to the system, for they cannot be controlled!
The bacteria also have a side effect which gives the film some of its most
interesting scenes: they produce bizarre, warped hallucinations in infected
persons.
     The police forces are lead by a man (played by Director Chris Shaw) who
progressively changes from human to machine as the movie develops.  Piece by
piece, they replace his human parts with robotics until he becomes a machine.
     On an intellectual level, the film deals with the split between
individualism and conformity to society, and personal freedom versus
totalitarianism.  The repressive "future" world shown in the film looks very
much like the present (it was filmed here in San Francisco and Santa Cruz), and
this raises a number of interesting questions.  The intellectual issues raised
here are worth pondering; our society is filled with "social activists" who
want us to trade our freedom for their "visions" of a better world.  I was very
pleased that the film is on the side of individualism and personal freedom!
     There is a lot to like about the film - plenty of action, interesting
story, and interesting special effects (mostly computer graphics).  However, it
does have some flaws.  Some of the outdoor photography is rather poor and
grainy.  Although the story is interesting, it is hard to follow at times.
Some of the transitions from scene to scene are not so smooth.
     The special effects are interesting and are a major part of the film.
However, the film had a budget of only $300,000, which is tiny compared to the
millions spent on films like the latest STAR TREK.  If you care more about
special effects than plot, or if you require that the special effects be "the
best", i.e., comparable to those in, say, STAR TREK IV: THE VOYAGE HOME, or
ALIENS, then you should not see this film!  Despite this caveat, the effects
are nice - for example, in the opening and closing credits, the names listed
dissolve into points and sweep away in a "star-field" type of effect.
     Overall evaluation: good, despite its low budget and technical flaws.
Recommended for its interesting story.  Special effects fanatics may want to
skip it - perhaps they should watch the big budget summer sequels instead!
Reviewer:  Thomas E. Billings, Department of Statistics
           University of California, Berkeley
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Yume miruyoni nemuritai (1986)
Synopsis:
In 1950s Japan, the daughter of an aging silent film actress is 
kidnapped.  A young detective is hired to find and return the kidnapped
young woman; the trail leads to the (Japanese subsidiary of) M. Pathe &
Co., where the woman is trapped in a 1915 silent film!  A (nearly)
silent film that interweaves reality and dreams so skillfully that they
are indistinguishable.  A challenging but worthwhile film.
Japan (English subtitles), black-and-white, 1986, 81 minutes.
Director/Writer:  Kaizo Hayashi
     This film is a tribute to Japanese silent films, particularly the
films made in the final phase of the silent film industry.  The story
concerns an aging silent film actress, who hires a young private
detective to find and return her daughter, Bellflower, who has
reportedly been kidnapped and is being held for ransom.  The detective
is a strange fellow, who sits around eating hard-boiled eggs in huge
quantities while he analyzes the ransom demand (delivered via tape
recording), to hopefully find and return Bellflower.
     The detective and his young assistant follow a long maze of clues
to find Bellflower, only to eventually learn that she is trapped in a
1915 silent film from M. Pathe & Co., that has no ending!  From here
the story continues, with reality, magic and dreams intermingling so
seam- lessly that it becomes impossible to determine what is reality,
and what is a dream.
     In the synopsis, I describe the film as "challenging but
worthwhile", for a number of reasons.  First, the film is completely
silent except for some sound effects, the taped messages from the
kidnappers, and a brief narration in one scene provided by a benshi, a
person who was hired by Japanese theaters in the silent days to read the
dialog to the audience.  The challenge here is that modern audiences are
used to sound, and may find the silent medium less interesting.
     Another challenge for some is the slow way the story builds.  At
the screening, 3 or 4 people (from a rather small audience) walked out
before the film even reached the midpoint (~40 minutes).  This may have
been due, in part, to the slow pace of plot development.  However, there
are rewards for patience, because the pace of the film increases just
after the midpoint, and the film becomes very interesting.
     The  film accomplishes something that is not very common in cinema:
the interleaving of (relative) reality and fantasy within a single story
line in such a way that it is difficult to tell where the fantasy ends
and reality begins.  Other films where this is done include THE PEDDLER,
an Iranian film I reviewed some months ago, and the last parts of BRAZIL
(also TOTAL RECALL, if you consider the controversy over whether the
adventures really happened, or were just a dream).
     I recommend the film to fans of silent films, and to those
interested in a film that blends reality and dreams.
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Untamagiru (1989)
Synopsis:
A sugar worker in Okinawa learns a terrible secret concerning the
daughter of his boss.  To avoid the wrath of his boss, he flees into the
Untama Forest, a magic place populated by spirits, where people
levitate, and other fantastic things happen.  A modern fantasy/folk
tale, with a very warped sense of humor.  Only of average quality, but
with sufficient humor to hold your interest.
Japan (English subtitles), color, 1989, 120 minutes.
Director/Writer:  Go Takamine
     Set in Okinawa just before it was returned to Japan (late 60's),
this film is the story of Giru, a sugar-mill worker who becomes a folk
hero.  Giru operates a crude sugar press, used to extract the juice from
the sugar cane.  The beautiful daughter of the mill owner takes her
daily siesta near the press, watching the workers while she smokes
(drugs) from a water-pipe.  Giru is quite interested in her and plans to
ask her to a party.
     Next we meet Giru's family: his mother, a compulsive eater who
craves armadillo sashimi, fried tapir, and goat testicle soup, and his
sister, a part-time prostitute who spends most of her time in a drugged
stupor, engaging in her favorite hobby, "animal dream divination"
(dreaming about animals and making an interpretation).
     Giru asks the girl of his dreams to the full-moon party, despite
his sister warning him of evil "pig influences."  Afterwards Giru takes
her to the Untama Forest for romance/sex.  The next day, Giru learns a
terrible secret: the girl of his dreams is actually a pig, appearing in
human form via magic!  The mill boss learns that Giru has stolen his
"daughter's" virginity, and swears revenge.  Since the boss is really
good with a spear, Giru flees for his life to the Untama Forest, a place
where magic is real.  The story continues with Giru learning to use
magic against the boss and the police.
     The overall quality level of this film is roughly that of a made
for television movie (i.e., only average).  However, what makes it worth
seeing is the rather warped, drugged-out sense of humor that pervades
the film.  An example of this is the characterization of the U.S.  High
Commissioner for the island (played by John Sayles), who is shown
receiving blood transfusions from dogs and pigs!  The review printed in
the film festival program compared it to a live-action version of a
Robert Crumb cartoon (i.e., underground comic).  However, I would
compare it more to the work of Gilbert Shelton ("Wonder Warthog," "Zippy
the Pinhead") than R. Crumb.
     The film has a number of drawbacks.  The story is told in a
disjointed fashion, using a bizarre barbershop quartet to provide
narration at times.  The lyrics of their songs are cute, but their
singing is pretty bad (deliberately, no doubt).  Also, there is probably
some important message or lesson in the film.  However, with all the
warped drug humor and magic, it's hard to be certain what the message
is supposed to be (perhaps not to get involved with pigs in human form?
not to cross your boss if he's good with a spear?).
     The film should appeal to those with an offbeat sense of humor.  If
you like underground comics, you will probably like this film.  If
underground comics don't appeal to you, then you probably should see
something else.
Distribution.  Not in general U.S. release at the present time.  Most likely
places to see it are film festivals, societies, or archives.  Print Source:
Parco Co., Ltd., 15-1, Udagoma-cho, Shibuya ku, Tokyo, Japan.
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Tempos Difíceis (1988)
Screened at the San Francisco International Film Festival (March 16, 1989).
Synopsis:
     A modern-dress adaptation of the classic story by Charles Dickens, HARD
TIMES FOR THESE TIMES.  Extremely well done, with (surprise!) occasional doses
of humor.
Portugal (Portuguese with English subtitles), 1988, black & white, 90 minutes.
Director/Producer/Screenplay: Joao Botelho
Principal cast: Henrique Viana, Julia Britton, Ruy Furtado, Isabel de Castro
Print Source: Portuguese Film Institute
     The plot should be familiar to anyone who has read the work by Dickens.
The story centers on a number of characters, the principal one being one Josiah
Bounderby, the wealthy owner of a factory.  Mr. Bounderby marries Louisa
Gradgrind, the daughter of a retired merchant.  Louisa's father works as a
schoolteacher in his retirement.  Their story is interwoven with the story of
Stephen Blackpool, an honest laborer in Mr. Bounderby's factory, who is
wrongly accused of a theft.  Numerous other colorful characters make
appearances, including a Mrs. Sparsit, an incredibly nosy lady who works as a
housekeeper for Mr. Bounderby.
     This is an intriguing, stunning film in many ways.  First, the acting
style seems detached at times, giving the film an unusual style and mood.  It is
shot in black and white, which helps give the film its unique "harsh" tone.  The
imagery is very poetic at times.  Perhaps the best description of the film
style is "minimalist."  Every word, every image counts here -- there is no
superfluous material.
     One difference with the original work -- this film is set in modern times
(Mr. Bounderby owns a luxury car, for example).  However, it is true to the
spirit of the original Dickens story.
     Additionally, there is a surprising amount of humor in this film.  For
example, the character of Mr. Gradgrind (the merchant/teacher) comes across as
a real eccentric (translation: he's loony).  His wife comes across as totally
loony also; together these two provide lots of humor in what might otherwise be
a dreary story.
     This is perhaps the best film adaptation of a Dickens story that I have
ever seen.  Strange, beautiful, and superbly well-done.  Why endure 6 hours of
LITTLE DORRITT (film adaptation of another Dickens work) when you can see this,
and it's only 1/4 the length?
     Overall evaluation: very good.  Strongly recommended to Dickens fans,
others should consider it also.
Reviewer: Thomas E. Billings; Department of Statistics
          University of California, Berkeley
Reviewer contact: teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Li gui chan juan (1989)
Synopsis:
A Chinese ghost story set in present day Hong Kong and Taiwan.  A modern dance
choreographer is possessed by the ghost of a woman who was murdered.  Thus 
possessed, she stalks and takes vengeance on the murderers.  Good film, much
better than most films in this genre, but nothing special.
Taiwan (English subtitles), color, 1989, 98 minutes.
Director/Writer:  Fred Tan
     Ghost stories are fairly common in Chinese cinema, and range from low
budget kung-fu films to sophisticated melodramas and mysteries.  This film,
with its large cast, special effects, and large budget, is fairly
representative of the better films in this genre.  It is very well-made, with
high production values.
     The plot is relatively simple.  A beautiful young woman is brutally 
murdered by her boyfriend and his accomplices.  They trap her in a car, which
is then set on fire (so she is burned alive and conscious).  The precise
reasons for this are not made clear, but black magic rituals are involved.
     During the ritual, mistakes are made which allow the murdered woman's soul
to escape, as a ghost, into this world.  She possesses another young woman, a
modern dance choreographer who recently attempted suicide as the result of a
failed love affair.  After possessing the choreographer, she sets out for
brutal vengeance on her former lover and his accomplices.
     I won't say anything more about the rest of the movie (to avoid spoilers),
other than to say that there is an interesting exorcism scene.  The exorcism
scene may set a new standard in special effects quality (but not in
imagination) for movies of this type.
     Unlike many ghost stories, there is very little humor in this film.  The
humor that is present is mostly satire, of other Chinese ghost films (if you
have never seen such a film, you might not appreciate the very subtle humor).
It's also very black humor, as the funniest scenes are the murders!
     This is the third film by director Fred Tan.  Like his first two films
(described below), it paints a bleak view of women and their role in society.
Women are usually shown as victims in his films, but victims by choice.  This
outlook has made his films very controversial; some hate his films for this
reason, others like them for the same reason.  At the least, they are very
thought provoking, and worth considering for this reason.
Distribution:  Currently in its U.S. theatrical premiere, this film is being
screened at a limited number of art houses.  It is being shown along with two
earlier films by the same director: ROUGE OF THE NORTH (a cold melodrama set in
1910 Shanghai: a young woman accepts an arranged marriage only to learn on her
wedding night that her groom is a blind, invalid asthmatic; as time goes on she
becomes evil and bitter), and DARK NIGHT (an erotic psychological thriller: a
woman trapped in a marriage to a husband that neglects her, seeks out a lover,
only to find that her lover is as bad as her husband; thus she ends up being
enslaved by two men instead of just one!).
Reviewer:  Thomas E. Billings, Department of Statistics
           University of California, Berkeley
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Adventures of Baron Munchausen, The (1988)
Director: Terry Gilliam
Producer: Thomas Schuhly
Screenplay: Terry Gilliam, Charles McKeown
Principal cast: John Neville, Sarah Polley, Eric Idle, Jonathan Pryce,
                Valentina Cortese, Uma Thurman, Oliver Reed, Bill Paterson,
                Alison Steadman
Production Company: Prominent Features/Laura Film
Released by: Columbia Pictures
     This highly publicized movie (set for national release beginning Friday,
March 10) largely lives up to the publicity preceding its release.  The story
deals with Baron Munchausen, one of the most famous liars ("storytellers") in
history, and his fantastic exploits.  The story begins in an unspecified
European city in the late 18th century.  The city is under siege by the Turks,
and is in grave danger of falling.  A traveling theater company is performing
the story of the adventures of Baron Munchausen in the city, when their
performance is interrupted by an old man claiming to be the real Baron
Munchausen.
     The real Baron proceeds to tell his stories, and they are fantastic
indeed.  As the film progresses, the Baron has one adventure after another.  He
wins a treasure in a bet with a Sultan (using the super-powers of his
companions); he goes for a ride on two cannonballs; he goes to the moon on a
hot-air balloon (made exclusively from women's lingerie); he falls into a
volcano, meets Vulcan the god of war, romances his wife (Venus, the god of
love), etc.  These adventures take place at a very fast pace.
     The film is laced with the great sense of humor (warped?) that
characterized the other films of Director Terry Gilliam (TIME BANDITS, BRAZIL).
Some examples: when the Baron first encounters Vulcan the god of war (played by
Oliver Reed in an excellent performance), he is having labor troubles with his
workers, and is negotiating a "work contract" with them.  Vulcan, as portrayed
by Reed, comes across sounding and acting like a harassed British shop
supervisor (the humor is subtle, but very good).  Robin Williams appears as the
King of the Moon, in a manic performance that is -- surprise -- very funny
(Robin Williams is one comedian I generally can't stand.  For me to actually
like his performance is most unusual!).  Oh yes, the King and Queen of the Moon
have detachable heads, which fly around independent of their bodies (which are
off doing "bodily functions").
     On a deeper level, the film deals with the issues of fantasy vs. reality,
truth and fiction, life and death, youth and old age.  Throughout the film the
Baron is pursued by a ghoul-like figure that represents death.  These issues
are dealt with in a layered fashion, and are illustrated to varying degrees in
the fantastic exploits of the Baron.
     From a non-intellectual viewpoint, the film is simply loads of fun.  You
don't need to intellectualize, just sit back and enjoy the Baron's utterly
fantastic adventures!  Stylistically and thematically, the film is closer to
TIME BANDITS than it is to BRAZIL.  It is fairly safe to say that most fans of
either film (TIME BANDITS, BRAZIL) will like THE ADVENTURES OF BARON MUNCHAUSEN.
     Overall evaluation: excellent; worth seeing.
Reviewer: Thomas E. Billings; Department of Statistics
          University of California, Berkeley
Reviewer contact: teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Marquis (1989)
Synopsis:
Costume drama set in France at the time of the revolution (1788-89), centered
on the activities of the Marquis deSade.  Unlike other films on the subject,
all the actors in this film wear animal masks and portray animals!  Raunchy and
very sick, the film is filled with S & M, political humor, and phony
bestiality.  One redeeming social virtue -- it's outrageously funny!
Belgium/France (English subtitles), color, 1989, 83 minutes.
Director/Writer: Henri Xhonneux 
Creature Design/Art Director: Roland Topor
     This film deals with two years in the life of the Marquis, who is
imprisoned in the infamous Bastille for religious crimes.  The Marquis spends
his time in prison writing the dirty S & M fantasy stories for which he is
famous, and talking with his huge (nearly a meter long) phallus, which has a
human face and talks back!.  His phallus has a rather unique and impulsive view
of life, and serves as a literary critic as well.
     The Marquis has the face of a dog, but his other features are human.  The
jailer has the face of a rat, is bisexual, and lusts for the Marquis.  The plot
of the film concerns the political intrigue surrounding the Marquis, who is
blamed for impregnating a "woman" who has the face of a cow (she was really
raped by the King).  Additionally, revolutionaries are plotting the overthrow
of the monarchy, and want to release certain prisoners (they ask for help from
the Marquis in their plot).
     That's all I will reveal of the plot, to avoid any spoilers.  This is
certainly the strangest film I have seen in some time, and also one of the
funniest.  The animal masks & costumes are very well done, and make a strong,
realistic impression on the viewer.  The result is a film that lies between
animation and live-action.  Perhaps it could be described as similar to the
Muppets, but done by someone on drugs with a truly warped sense of humor.
     This is not a film for everyone.  It is very funny, but also very dirty
(sexual humor) at times, and there is plenty of S & M, and some blood/gore.
There is some clay animation in the film, which is used to portray certain of
the more violent fantasies of the Marquis (which might be offensive to some
viewers).
     Because of the subject matter, the film is not suitable for children,
prudes, the squeamish, the humor-impaired, or anyone with an attitude problem.
The film should appeal to those with an offbeat, very raunchy sense of humor.
Note also that despite its sexual nature, there appears to be no genuine
(explicit) sex in it.  However, it is worth seeing, if your tastes include the
bizarre!
Distribution.  U.S. premiere now in progress at the San Francisco Int'l.  Film
Festival.  Next showings: Friday/Saturday 5/11-12 at the AMC Kabuki Theater in
San Francisco.  No information on future release plans.  Print Source:
Constellation Productions, 108 rue des Dames, 75017 Paris, France.
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Taketori monogatari (1987)
Synopsis:
     In feudal Japan, a poor bamboo-cutter finds an abandoned infant girl.  He
raises her as his daughter, and she grows up to be a beautiful young woman.
The nobles at the Emperor's court compete for her hand in marriage, but there
is a problem: she is really from the moon!
Japan (Japanese with English subtitles), color, 1987, 121 minutes.
Director: Kon Ichikawa
Principal cast: Toshiro Mifune, Ayako Wakao, Yasuko Sawaguchi
Print Source: Toho International Ltd.
     This film is based on a popular children's story in Japan, "Taketori 
monogatari" (the tale of the bamboo-cutter).  The story concerns a poor bamboo-
cutter (played by Toshiro Mifune) who finds a child inside a metal container
(that strongly resembles a giant bamboo sprout) in the forest.  It turns out to
be a young girl, and she looks just like his recently deceased infant daughter
Kaya.  The bamboo-cutter and his wife accept the girl as a divine gift, and
raise her as their own daughter (of course they name her Kaya).
     Kaya quickly grows up to become an extremely beautiful young woman, and
three of the nobles in the Emperor's court propose marriage to her.  The nobles
compete with each other in performing incredible feats to win her hand in
marriage.  However, there is a serious problem: she is an extra-terrestrial, and
she must return to the moon, her real home.
     This film is a bit unusual in that there is plenty to both like and 
dislike in it.  Let me deal with the negatives first.  At 121 minutes, it is a
bit too long.  Although it is generally interesting, the story line moves
rather slowly at times.  Portions of the film were out of focus; it is not
clear whether that was a film or projection problem.  Finally, certain parts of
the film are clear imitations of another film, Spielberg's CLOSE ENCOUNTERS OF
THE BORING KIND (obviously I'm not a Spielberg fan!).  Fortunately, this film
is far more interesting than the tedious and pretentious CLOSE ENCOUNTERS.  In
terms of quality, the film is comparable to the very best made for television
movies.
     On the positive side, the film is relatively interesting, and one can
immediately identify with many of the main characters.  Some (but not all) of
the special effects are good.  The film is very sentimental, and will produce a
positive emotional reaction in most viewers.  Thus I expect that, despite its
technical flaws, most viewers will find the film worth seeing.
     Overall evaluation: good.  Worthy of consideration for its sentimental
value; a nice story.
Reviewer:  Thomas E. Billings, Department of Statistics
           University of California, Berkeley
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Water and Power (1989)
Synopsis:
A fusion of nature and city images, interwoven with special effects created by
optical printing, animation, and time-lapse photography.  Sort of a special
effects KOYAANISQATSI, but different in tone and style.
     This non-narrative film evolved over a period of approximately ten years;
it was not planned.  The creator of this unique film, Pat O'Neill, is a Los
Angeles based filmmaker specializing in special effects, especially optical
printing [used extensively in this film].
     The film consists of sequences of images: nature, city, and people.  Most
of the nature scenes were filmed in Mono County, California, where there is a
large lake that was drained by the Los Angeles Department of Water and Power
(source of the title of the film).  The city scenes are from Los Angeles, and
include time-lapse scenes as used in KOYAANISQATSI.  Many of the people scenes
were staged for the film.
     Interspersed among the images are stories, some of which you read, others
you hear, and some are acted out.  Optical printing is used to overlay one
image on another, one story on another.  Animation and computer graphics are
also used, and are interfaced with optically printed images for some
interesting and striking effects.
     Much of the filming was done with a computer-controlled camera, "animation
style" (in the words of the Director).  This has a number of side effects.
Some scenes are really striking; others are so fast as to nearly overwhelm the
viewer!
     Some of the stories, and some of the animation, reflect a subtle sense of
humor.  The film also includes (in optical printing overlays) sections of old
silent films.  It's strange, but somehow they don't seem out of place amidst
all the special effects.
     Despite the lack of a narrative, the film holds your interest well.  It's
all a bit weird, and non-commercial, but worth seeing if you have any interest
in special effects.  Also, if you liked KOYAANISQATSI or CHRONOS (two non-
narrative films), you will probably find this to be interesting.
Distribution:  This film is currently in its world theatrical premiere.  Next
theatrical showing is 9/21 at the Roxie Cinema in San Francisco.  It has been
selected for the New York Film Festival (next month), and the Berlin Film
Festival (Feb. 1990).
Reviewer:  Thomas E. Billings, Department of Statistics
           University of California, Berkeley
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Telesm (1988)
Synopsis:
A young couple accept an arranged marriage to stop the fighting between
their respective clans.  On the way home from their wedding, they get
lost in a dark forest on a stormy night.  They take refuge in an eerie
mansion, inhabited by an old man obsessed with the past, and his creepy
servant.  As the night progresses, they learn the terrible secrets
hidden in the house.  Similar to many other films in this genre, with a
few interesting plot turns.
Iran (English subtitles), color, 1987, 90 minutes.
Director/Writer:  Dariush Farhang
     The film is set in Iran, during the Quajar dynasty.  I don't know 
precisely when that was, but given the level of technology that appears
in the film: horse drawn wagons, single-shot pistols, and a crude
phonograph, it appears to be late 1800's or early 1900's (historical
inaccuracies/criticisms, if any, should be blamed on the Director).
     The story is centered on an attractive young couple.  The film
begins with their wedding, an arranged marriage designed to end the
fighting between the clans of the bride and groom.  After the wedding,
the bride and groom return to the groom's home by wagon.  Their wagon
runs off the road late that night, in a storm in a dark forest.  They go
into the forest, and are chased by "wolves" (that look more like dogs
than wolves).  They come to a forbidding mansion in the woods, and seek
refuge from the wolves.
     In the mansion they meet the only residents: a wealthy, older
gentleman, and his (rather creepy) servant.  The owner believes that the
house is "spellbound" (haunted), because his lovely bride vanished
without a trace, on his wedding night five years ago.  He is very morose
and somber, and is obsessed with her memory.
     The young man falls ill (or was he drugged?); the servant gives him
a sleeping potion.  His bride goes down to the "hall of mirrors" room in
the mansion, where she vanishes without a trace, just like the bride of
the owner five years ago.  The story continues as the young man accuses
the mansion owner of foul play, and searches for his missing bride...
     Evaluating this film is difficult, for it has strong positive and
negative points.  The positive points include a dose of witty,
sarcastic, "battle of the sexes" humor.  The marriage was arranged, and
the couple don't like each other at first.  The woman tells her husband:
"I shall hate the children I bear you."  The custom that the bride
cannot speak to anyone but her husband for 1 year after marriage is
emphasized (and heavily criticized) in the film.  For example, the bride
is told that, until she bears a child, she is not even a person!  Other
points include a convoluted plot, with interesting twists and turns.
     The negative points include pacing (the film really drags in two
parts), "wolves" that look like reddish dogs, and the fact that the film
doesn't break any new ground in the "haunted house" genre of films.
Some viewers may find the mansion itself to be too clean, i.e., not
creepy enough for a film of this type.
     Overall, I liked the movie for its witty humor and interesting
plot.   However, many viewers will likely be turned off by its very slow
pace and technical flaws.
Distribution.  Part of a film series, "Iranian Film Now," coordinated by
The Film Center, Chicago on behalf of the Farabi Cinema Foundation.
Screened at the Pacific Film Archive, University of California,
Berkeley.  This film may be available on video, if you can find a source
for Iranian videos.
Reviewer contact: teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Ju Dou (1990)
Synopsis:
In 1920s China, an old man, the owner of a dye factory, buys a beautiful
young wife.  He beats her every night because she has not produced 
children, an heir.  Meanwhile, his young wife and his (adopted) son have
an affair, which results in the birth of a child.  A tale of adultery,
revenge, and murder.  Even though it has superb photography and
excellent acting, the story falls flat and the film is primarily a
mediocre melodrama.
China (English subtitles), color, 1990, 94 minutes.
Director:  Zhang Yi-mou
     This film has received considerable publicity recently because the
Chinese government has repressed the film in China (the film is banned
there).  Also, the film has been nominated for a (U.S.) Academy Award
in the "Best Foreign Language Film" category.  The Chinese government
asked that the film be withdrawn from Academy Award consideration on the
grounds that it has not been screened in its country of origin, a point
of considerable controversy.
     The film is set in a dye factory in 1920s China.  The factory is
owned by a cruel old man, whose only laborer is his adopted son.  The
old man buys a beautiful young bride, Ju Dou, his third wife (he beat to
death the first two wives).  The old man is apparently impotent; every
night he savagely beats Ju Dou because she is not yet pregnant.  In one
scene, Ju Dou is tied up while the old man is beating her; he tells her
"when I buy an animal, I treat it as I wish, and you're no better than
an animal".
     Ju Dou and Tian-qing, the adopted son of the mill owner, are
attracted to each other.  One day when the old man is away, the pair
become lovers, with Ju Dou actively seducing Tian-qing.  Soon she is
pregnant with Tian-qing's child.  Shortly thereafter the old-man is 
crippled in an accident, and confined to a crude wheelchair.  The story
continues with the birth of the child, and the two lovers confronting
the social limits on their relationship (adultery being punishable by
death).
     The film is excellent in many respects.  The photography is
beautiful, the set design is very colorful, with shards of dyed cloth
hanging from the rafters of the dye factory.  The acting is generally
excellent, with a superb performance by Li Wei as the cruel, sadistic
factory owner who thinks he can make his wives pregnant by beating them.
The film Direction is good also (Director Zhang Yi-mou's earlier works
include RED SORGHUM).  Some of the writing is very good also.
     However, despite having so much going for it, the film quickly
turns into a predictable melodrama.  Because the story weakens so much
in the second half, the film is not as good as, for example, A GIRL FROM
HUNAN, or the soap-opera-ish THE REINCARNATION OF GOLDEN LOTUS.
     Although it is not as good as some other Chinese films (whether
from China, Taiwan, Hong Kong), the film suggests that the stagnation in
the film industry of China may be ending.  (The events in Tienamen
Square, and the crackdown afterward, seriously disrupted the film 
industry in China.)  I recommend the film to fans of melodrama, and to
anyone that appreciates Chinese films.
Distribution.  In its first U.S. release; currently (3/15) showing in
the San Francisco area (San Francisco: Gateway Cinema).  May be 
available in other areas also, showing primarily in "arthouse" type
theaters.  The U.S. distributor for the film is Miramax Films.
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Reflecting Skin, The (1990)
Synopsis:
In the 1950s, in the Midwest wheat fields, a young boy struggles to
understand the strange world of adults.  One day a black car filled with
strangers arrives in town, and shortly afterward, a series of mysterious
murders begins.  A warped mystery, with some deadpan humor.  Not very
good, though it may appeal to fans of David Lynch.
     Seth Dove is a seven-year-old boy who lives with his parents in the
Midwest (U.S.), in the middle of wheat fields.  The time is the early
1950s, and Seth and his friends amuse themselves by abusing animals,
engaging in vandalism, and various other childish pursuits.  His major
worry is that the woman next door is really a vampire, and will come at
night and suck out all his blood, killing him.
     One day a black car, with four strangers in it, arrives in town.
Seth is the first to encounter them when they stop at his Father's gas
station.  Shortly thereafter one of Seth's friends, another young boy,
vanishes.  Later the boy is found dead in Seth's yard, and the story
continues with the police suspecting Seth's Father of murder...
     This film is full of weird, warped characters and strange events.
The Sheriff is very colorful, with an eyepatch, deformed ear, and
artificial hand.  He's also cranky and not concerned about the rights of
the accused.  The woman next door tells Seth that she is 200 years old
(part of the reason he think's she's a vampire), and gives Seth the tip
of a whale harpoon.  The parents of Seth's friend are religious
fanatics, totally obsessed with the idea of sin and sinful thoughts.
Seth's Father is an alcoholic, and Seth's Mother rants and raves about
the gasoline smell that pervades their home.
     Some of the dialogue is quite warped; some of the dialogue is
funny, although some fails in its attempt to be funny.  The presence of
so much weirdness, with insufficient humor to mitigate it, really
undermines the film.  It makes it seem so self-conscious about its own
weirdness.  You may start to wonder what the next weirdness will be,
rather than what the next major development in the plot will be.
     Many of the events that occur in the film will strain your
credibility, and add to the weirdness.  Some viewers will consider the
weirdness to be stylish, and the film has been compared to David Lynch's
BLUE VELVET and "Twin Peaks."  I frequently like really weird films.
However this film did not hold my attention; it is weird but not funny
enough to make the weirdness rewarding.
     I don't recommend the film to a general audience; it's too strange
and not done very well.  However, some fans of David Lynch might like
it.  If you really want to see a weird film, I would suggest instead (a
radically different film), TALES FROM THE GIMLI HOSPITAL.
Distribution.  The U.S. distributor is Miramax Films; release is
planned for early summer in the U.S.  Note also that BBC Films is listed
in the production credits; this suggests possible television broadcast
in England.
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for ĄÁtame! (1990)
Synopsis:
Shortly after being released from a mental hospital, a young man kidnaps
the woman of his dreams -- a beautiful porno actress who is also a drug
addict.  He ties her up and beats her until she falls in love with him!
A "romantic comedy" that is neither romantic nor funny.  Instead, it's
rather boring!
Spain (English subtitles), color, 1990, approx. 100 minutes.  Director:
Pedro Almodovar
     This is the latest film from Spanish director Pedro Almodovar, who
is best known in the U.S. for two earlier films: MATADOR (1986), and
WOMEN ON THE VERGE OF A NERVOUS BREAKDOWN (1988).  The film has
generated considerable controversy, and plenty of free publicity for
its content (bondage), and the fact that it received the dreaded "X"
rating from the MPAA, which caused the distributor to release the film
as unrated instead.
     The storyline is fairly simple.  Ricky is a mental patient, a
compulsive thief, and a real stud.  He is released from a mental
hospital in the beginning of the film.  Next we meet Marina, a porno
actress and junkie, who is making her first "serious" film, a
second-rate horror film directed by a lecher who lusts after Marina.
     Ricky locates Marina, and stalks her for a while.  A suitable
opportunity arises, he kidnaps her and holds her prisoner.  To make
certain that she doesn't escape, he ties and gags her frequently.  The
rest of the movie consists of him alternately expressing his undying
love for her (he wants to have children by her), beating/threatening
her, and keeping her in bondage while he goes out to buy drugs for her.
As the film continues, Marina slowly starts to fall in love with her
captor.
     The production values of this film are, at best, only average.  The
"steamy" sex scene that supposedly earned the film an X rating seems
very over-rated; indeed, the scene is really ridiculous.  Even worse,
the scene is not funny either!
     The big problem with the film is that it simply doesn't work.  As a
comedy, it produces very few laughs; there was very little laughter in
the theater when I saw it, so I am not the only one who found the film
blase.  As a romance, we need to believe that Marina can actually fall
in love with the man who threatens, beats, and regularly abuses her!
For this to happen, Marina needs to be as crazy as Ricky, and that
impression is not conveyed in the film.
     I believe that the film doesn't work because the director is
playing it straight, i.e., conventional humor and romance.  The
situation of this film, a woman held in bondage against her will, could
be used to full advantage in a warped, black comedy (much as S&M was
used in the outrageously funny MARQUIS, reviewed previously).  However,
by being conventional, the result is a rather boring film.  Further, the
message of the film will likely offend some people; said message being
that the way for a man to win a woman's love is to kidnap her and beat
her to submission!
     This film is really not worth seeing, even at matinee prices.
Instead, go see THE COOK, THE THIEF, HIS WIFE, AND HER LOVER, or some
other movie.
Distribution.  In its first U.S. theatrical release, now showing at 3 
different theaters in the San Francisco-Berkeley area. Should be available
in other areas as well.
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Abandoned Field: Free Fire Zone, The (1979)
Synopsis:
A young Vietcong couple, with their infant son, live an idyllic life in a
swamp.  They are relentlessly pursued by U. S. Air Force helicopters, which
they frequently hide from.  An amateurish propaganda film; this stinker is so
bad it's good!
Vietnam (English subtitles), black and white, 1979, 90 minutes.
Director:  Nguyen Hong Sen
     The film begins with scenes of the young couple climbing trees, singing
silly songs to each other that are a mixture of romance and propaganda.  We
soon learn that they are Vietcong, living with their infant son in a swamp, an
abandoned rice field (the "abandoned field" of the title) that is located in a
free-fire zone in the Mekong Delta.
     There follows various scenes of domestic tranquility, interspersed with
scenes of the helicopters searching for them.  The couple seem to be skilled at
hiding whenever the helicopters come near.  The man and his Vietcong comrades
occasionally go on forays, which seem to turn into exercises in group hiding.
     The U. S. forces, from aerial photos, determine that there are people
still living in the free-fire zone.  They then set out to clear the zone of the
Vietcong.  This sets the situation for a climactic battle between the Vietcong
and the U. S. helicopters.
     I was surprised and disappointed by the film.  The program notes described
it as "...unnerving and compelling in its subjective camera-eye view of
war...."  After seeing it, I would describe it as alternately boring and
laughable!
     The film has very serious technical flaws.  Subtitles are frequently
missing or displayed too fast, too early, or way too late.  The photography is
out of focus far too often.  Also, the infant steals the show in a number of
scenes by staring at the camera and making faces.  This is natural for a baby,
but hasn't the Director ever heard of retakes?  [Sarcasm alert: perhaps the
Director wants to emulate "one shot" Edward Wood, Director of PLAN 9 FROM OUTER
SPACE.  Should this be called PLAN 9 FROM VIETNAM?]
     Additionally, much of the editing is choppy and severe.  Even worse, in
the major "battle" scenes, the two opposing groups appear to be operating
alone, in separate areas, and the film spliced together.  Needless to say, the
editing is very amateurish indeed.
     Much of the dialogue is unrealistic; some of it is quite ridiculous.  The
portrayal of U. S. Air Force officers (by Vietnamese actors) is stereotypical,
thoroughly stupid, unbelievable, and (unintentionally) frequently funny!  The
U. S. Air Force is portrayed as a bunch of drunken, philandering deviants and
cowards who shoot their helicopter guns at random.
     The film is openly propagandistic in every way.  Such a film could be very
offensive, if cleverly done.  However, this film is so ridiculous and poorly
done, that the only thing that might offend you is the film's own stupidity!
The audience frequently laughed at the film, though probably not where the
Director might expect laughter.  Overall evaluation: gives PLAN 9 FROM OUTER
SPACE some competition in the worst film category.  Fans of trash movies might
want to check it out.
     Remark: this film is in limited distribution as part of "The Vietnam Film
Project," a touring exhibition organized by the UCLA Film and Television
Archive, with assistance from The Asia Society (New York) and the East-West
Center (Hawaii).
Reviewer:  Thomas E. Billings, Department of Statistics
           University of California, Berkeley
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Sinnui yauman II (1990)
Synopsis:
The continuing adventures of a young debt collector in ancient China who
has a real talent for getting into trouble.  This time he encounters
guerillas, a monk who travels underground like a mole, and he fights
monsters and demons using magic.  Wild and very entertaining, though
it's not as good as part I.
Hong Kong (English subtitles), color, 1990, 104 minutes.
Director: Ching Siu-tung.
Producer: Tsui Hark.
     Before discussing part II, it is appropriate to mention part I.  A
CHINESE GHOST STORY (part I) is the story of a young debt collector in
ancient China who stays overnight at a haunted temple.  There he meets
and falls in love with a beautiful vampire ghost.  He battles monsters,
demons and ghosts to give her a chance at reincarnation.  Part I is a
fast-paced horror and adventure film with a strong dose of humor.  It
was relatively popular, and introduced many people to the exciting films
that are being made in Hong Kong.
     Part II begins where part I left off (for people who haven't seen
it, part I is recapped in brief highlights at the beginning of part II).
The debt collector is arrested by the police, on grounds that he may be
an escaped convict.  He is put into a prison cell with an old man, a
scholar, whose dietary preferences include cockroaches.  Just before he
is to be executed, he escapes.
     After escaping, he meets a monk who travels underground by
burrowing like a mole.  They encounter a band of guerillas, one of whom,
Windy, looks exactly like the beautiful vampire ghost he was in love
with in part I.  Together they fight political corruption, monsters, and
demons using magic and martial arts.
     Part II is very much like part I; it is a fast-paced horror and
adventure film.  There are a few differences, though.  In part I, the
emphasis was on ghosts, most of whom were in human form,  whereas in
part II the ghosts and demons that appear are primarily in the form of
monsters.  There is a large "corpse monster", similar to the smaller
ones in part I, and the fight against it is outrageously funny.  Also
appearing is a monster in the form of a large golden Buddha, and a
gigantic flying centipede.
     The special effects are generally very good, though the giant
centipede is clearly a model.  The same actors and actresses appear in
both parts, so there is continuity in the roles.  The major differences
in the two films is that part I has more humor (which I really
appreciate), and part I has a tighter, better story line.
     Although part II is recapped at the beginning of part II, I suggest
that you see part I before part II.  First, the recap is far too brief.
Second, part I is incredibly good, and it is certainly worth seeing!
Thus I suggest seeing both parts, I and II, if you have the opportunity;
very entertaining and enjoyable!
Print Source: Gordon's Films International Inc.; 8 Chatham Square, Room
805; New York, NY 10038.  (Currently in its initial theatrical release
in the U.S.).
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for V gorakh moye serdtse (1967)
Synopsis:
A tribute to silent movies, this 1967 Soviet film, silent except for sparse
(Russian) narration, has the look and feel of a 1920s era silent film.  Very
creative and visually inventive.  Should interest fans of silent films.
U.S.S.R. (Russian voice-over, no subtitles), black and white, 1967, 40 minutes.
Director:  Rustam Hamdamov
     Perhaps I should start off by saying that I am not a real fan of silent
films, and have seen only a few of them.  However, one of my favorite films is
KOYAANISQATSI, a modern film with no dialogue.  Thus, at least, I appreciate
the fact that spoken dialogue is not a strict requirement in films.
     The story here concerns a young boy, Scarecrow, and his family: his father
the poet, and his mother, a "great woman" who has great difficulty  fitting
into her corset.  One day a famous actor comes by for lunch, which initiates a
sequence of interesting and visually inventive images and events.
     Examples of the visual inventiveness here include: scenes shot from a high
vertical angle, so we are looking down on the actors; and interfacing close-ups
of oil paintings with live-action shots, similar to current usages of matte
paintings in special effects shots.  The overall effect of these images is to
satirize the characters.
     Although made in 1967, the film very much looks like it was done in the
1920s.  The film is grainy, in poor focus at times.  The acting: body and
facial gestures are exaggerated as is the silent movie style.  The costumes and
props are from the 1920s or before.  The "text screens" look like they were
copied from some old silent science fiction film.
     Because silent films are not popular nowadays, I cannot recommend this
film for a general audience.  However, fans of silent films may find it of
interest.
     Distribution.  The print source was Goskino; it appears that current
distribution is very limited.
Reviewer:  Thomas E. Billings, Department of Statistics
           University of California, Berkeley
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Yuki Yukite shingun (1987)
Director: Kazuo Hara.
Documentary; Japan (Japanese w/ English subtitles), 1987, color, 16mm,
122 minutes.
Released by: Kino International Corp, 333 W. 39th St, New York, NY 10018,
phone (212)-629-6880.
     Meet Kenzo Okuzaki, a man on a mission from God.  Okuzaki served in the
Japanese Army, 32nd Engineering Corps, garrisoned at Wewak, New Guinea during
World War II.  Okuzaki is obsessed with the war, and holds Emperor Hirohito
responsible for the suffering it caused.
     Okuzaki became famous in Japan in 1969, when he used a slingshot to fire
four pachinko balls (lead pellets) at the Emperor, then passed out pamphlets
which depicted Emperor Hirohito engaging in pornographic sex acts, at a
downtown Tokyo Department store!  For these crimes he served time in prison.
     In this film, we get to follow Kenzo Okuzaki as he investigates the
mysterious deaths of fellow soldiers in the 32nd Corps after the end of the
war.  Rather than surrender, the 32nd Corps scattered into the jungles of New
Guinea.  Out of more than 1000 soldiers, only about thirty survived.
     The investigative style used by Okuzaki is unique.  With camera crew in
tow, he arrives unannounced at the homes of his former 32nd Corps alumni, and
interrogates them.  If they don't cooperate, he doesn't hesitate to beat the
information out of them!  Okuzaki is not afraid to suffer the consequences of
his actions, and he even offers to call the police after beating up the person
he interrogated.
     The net result of his investigation is the revelation of some very
disturbing facts.  After the end of the war, a Japanese soldier was murdered
for food, i.e., he was cannibalized by his fellow soldiers!  Two other soldiers
were officially executed, so that their commanding officers could cannibalize
them!  There is a chilling conversation with an alumnus of the 32nd Corps, who
calmly discusses the prevalence and practice of cannibalism at the end of the
war.  He refers to "black pork" (cannibalizing the New Guinea natives) and
"white pork" (cannibalizing other Japanese soldiers or white prisoners of war),
and reports that the consumption of these kinds of "pork" was commonplace.
     This is a unique and extraordinary film.  It invokes a wide range of
emotions.  At times it is funny, at times very chilling.  Okuzaki comes across
as a man obsessed, a man driven by a mission from God -- to save Japan from
future wars by exposing the horror of the last war.  In effect, Okuzaki is a
"militant" anti-war crusader.
     Okuzaki is also a study in contradictions.  He denounces families as an
artificial creation, a violation of divine law.  Yet he is, of course, married.
He is opposed to war (because of its nature as violence), yet will not hesitate
to use violence to achieve his divine goals.  Finally, he is, in his own words,
"against the establishment," yet he tolerates the police and their intrusions
(they follow him around all the time).
     This film is very well made.  The 16mm film and ambient lighting give it a
"gritty" feel that enhances the action.  Although a bit slow in the beginning,
the pace picks up quickly and the film holds your attention and interest.
     This is a very thought-provoking film.  Okuzaki is a Japanese fanatic, but
we have plenty of people like him here (oops -- the polite word is "political
activist").  In this film, you can readily see that Okuzaki is interested only
in the end result of his crusade -- the means used to achieve said end being
irrelevant.  However, unlike most political activists here, Okuzaki is willing
(in fact, proud) to accept the consequences of his actions.
     Overall evaluation: very good; definitely worth seeing (and discussing
with friends afterward).
Reviewer: Thomas E.  Billings; Department of Statistics
University of California, Berkeley
Reviewer contact: teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Dr. Caligari (1989)
Synopsis:
The granddaughter of Dr. Caligari (THE CABINET OF DR. CALIGARI) runs a
fashionable psychiatric clinic.  There she conducts experiments on her
patients, which include a nymphomaniac and a cannibalistic mass-murderer.  At
times surrealistic, at times relatively funny, this is a generally very poor
midnight movie.
     First, note that this is a new U.S. film, and it is not a sequel to the
famous 1919 German silent film, THE CABINET OF DR. CALIGARI.  The only thing
it shares with the German film is the name of Dr. Caligari.  Instead, this is
a very low budget film that tries to be a cult film (and could succeed).  The
film is by Stephen Sayadian, the Director of CAFE FLESH.
     The plot line is fairly simple.  Dr. Caligari works at the Caligari
Insane Asylum (referred to in the film as the "CIA").  There she is continuing
her grandfather's research on the hypothalmus gland, a part of the brain that 
controls all "primal" urges, including sex (her special interest).
     Her patients include a nymphomaniac housewife, and a cannibalistic
mass-murderer who enjoys shock therapy.  The daughter and son-in-law of the
clinic director also work at the clinic, and oppose Caligari's plans and her
use of patients as experimental subjects.  Together they try to stop
Dr. Caligari.
     All of the action in the film takes place in a neon, day-glow sort of
fantasy world.  That is to say that the set designs are fairly imaginative.
The problem is that they also look very cheap, i.e.  extremely low budget.  The
dialogue is pretty poor, a deliberate attempt at campiness that frequently
fails.  The acting is strange, for the actors make deliberate stylistic
movements and exaggerated gestures while speaking.
     Although the film has its funny moments, there are very few of them.  Thus
the film fails to be funny, something that is required of midnight movies.
Given the other limitations of the film, I would not recommend seeing it.
Distribution.  Being screened at a limited number of theaters in the U.S.  Here
in Berkeley it is shown weekly, as a midnight movie.
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Da Taijian Li Lianying (1991)
Synopsis:
The story of Tzu-hsi, the Dowager Empress of China, and her relationship
with Li Lianying, her lead eunuch.  A historical drama, filled with
palace intrigue and conflict.  Very well made, the film should appeal to
fans of historical Chinese films.
China/Hong Kong (English and German subtitles), color, 1991, 110 minutes.
Director/Writer: Tian Zhuangzhuang.
     The story is told through flashbacks, as the elderly Li Lianying
recounts his adventures as the lead eunuch to the Dowager Empress.  The
stories span a period of 40 years, and include various palace intrigues,
such as Li Lianying being accused of bribery and impersonating a Prince;
Li Lianying trying to get his niece married to the Emperor; and the
romance between the Emperor and his favorite consort, Pearl Blossom.
Also dramatized is the Empress fleeing the Forbidden City just before it
is captured by "foreign devils" (the British), and her later return to
power.
     Li Lianying and the Dowager Empress are frequently portrayed in
extremely unsympathetic terms.  In particular, Li Lianying is generally
considered to have been very evil.  This film presents them in a
slightly more sympathetic light.  Li Lianying is a complex character,
somewhat scheming and cunning but not openly evil.  The evil things that
he does are on the direct orders of the Dowager Empress.  The Dowager is
portrayed as a cunning, domineering and manipulative woman, but who can
be nice, at least to Li Lianying.  Much of the emphasis in the film is
on the relationship between Li Lianying and the Empress.
     The film is well-made; lavish sets were made and portions of the
film were actually made in the Forbidden City.  The photography is
excellent, and the story is well-written.  However, the film is rather
slow-moving, and this may bother some viewers.  Some knowledge of
Chinese history during the reign of the Dowager Empress will increase
your appreciation for the film, but it is not absolutely necessary.
     Because the film is somewhat slow-moving and on a topic of limited
interest, I would not recommend it to a general audience.  However, if
you are interested in Chinese history, or enjoy Chinese "historical
films", then you will probably find it worthwhile.
Print Source: Skai Film Production Ltd.; Flat B, 10/F, Kee Shing
Commercial Bldg.; 80, Kimberly Road; Kowloon, Hong Kong.
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Bal poussičre (1988)
Synopsis:
A wealthy pineapple farmer in a rural village in the Ivory Coast adds a sixth
wife to his harem.  The end result is trouble, for his newest wife is young and
beautiful but also independent and strong willed.  A lighthearted comedy that
pokes fun at the practice of polygamy.  Above average as comedies go, but
nothing special.
Ivory Coast (English subtitles), color, 1989, 95 minutes.
Director/Producer/Writer:  Henri Duparc
     The film is set in the present day, in the Ivory Coast.  The action
centers around Alcaly, a wealthy pineapple farmer in a rural village who is
referred to as Demi-Dieu (Demi-God, or "half-God," because, after God, he is #1
in his village), and Binta, a beautiful, young, and very independent woman.
     As the film begins, Binta is in the capital city (Abidjan), where she is
attending college and living with her Uncle and his family.  Binta is in love
with a musician, and spends her time dancing at a club.  Soon her money runs
out, and she is forced to return home to her rural village.
     There she comes to the attention of Alcaly, and he decides to add her to
his harem.  His logic is simple; with six wives, he can have a different wife
each night Monday-Saturday, with Sunday reserved for the "best"!  After some
effort, Alcaly gets permission from Binta's parents for the wedding.  At first
Binta resists, but she eventually agrees to the marriage.  The story continues
with Binta joining the harem and causing numerous problems with her "Western"
habits and ways (such as wearing dresses and swimming topless).
     On one level, the film presents strong criticism of the practice of
polygamy, which still exists in Africa and many other places.  The film can be
viewed as a statement about the exploitation and degradation of women in
Africa.  On another level, it is a lighthearted, sometimes risque, comedy on
the foibles of human nature and male-female relations.
     However, the film does have certain weaknesses.  As is typical of African
films, the pace of action is very slow, something that may deter some viewers.
The photography (color) is grainy in some shots; whether that is deliberate or
accidental is unknown to me.
     I would recommend the film to people interested in this sort of comedy.
The only negative comment I would make is that I saw this film after seeing
MARQUIS, a deliriously warped and funny film (reviewed previously).  Compared
to MARQUIS, the sexual humor in this film comes across as quite bland.  
However, the film has its charms and should appeal to a broad audience.
Distribution.  Not in general U.S. release at the present time.  Most likely
places to see it are film festivals, societies, or archives.  Print Source:
Imperial Distribution, 6, rue Lincoln, 75008 Paris, France.
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Non, ou a Vă Glória de Mandar (1990)
Synopsis:
A group of Portuguese soldiers are on their way to the front at the war
in Angola, in 1974.  On the way, they discuss patriotism, nationalism,
and colonialism in the context of Portuguese history.  Flashbacks are
used to illustrate Portugal's history.  Although parts of this film are
interesting, much of it is dry and even tedious.  Rather disappointing;
not as good as Manoel de Oliveira's last film.
Portugal (English subtitles), color, 1990, 110 minutes.
Director/Writer: Manoel de Oliveira
     The plot is very simple.  A group of Portuguese soldiers are in
Angola, in 1974.  They are in the back of a truck which is driving them
to the front lines, where they will join the battle against the
guerillas fighting for an independent Angola.  On the way, they have
long discussions about Portugal's ancient history, its colonial period,
and how nationalism and patriotism relate to colonialism and their
history.
     Flashbacks are used frequently to illustrate the Portuguese history
the soldiers are discussing.  Some of the flashbacks include: tribal
chieftain Viriato, in Roman times; King Afonso and the dream of a
combined Iberian Empire with Spain (12th Century); battles with the
Moors in Africa.  Most of the discussion centers on wars and colonial
conquests, and the utter futility of it all, the "vain glory of
command," of the film's title.
     The story continues as the soldiers arrive in a staging area, where
they await orders for field operations.  The discussion and flashbacks
continue, as the soldiers prepare for battle....
     Although the film does convey a message -- the futility of
colonialism and foreign military adventures, it does so in a dry,
rambling, and slightly incoherent way.  This was surprising and
disappointing to me, as my expectations were rather high for this film.
The last film by the Director, Manoel de Oliveira, was much better (THE
CANNIBALS, a black humor parody of opera, in which a bunch of stuffy,
pretentious opera singers accidentally engage in cannibalism).
     Although the film was disappointing, it does have some good
moments.  Although some of the historical flashbacks are quite dry,
there is one (far too brief) battle scene that looks like it was done by
the Three Stooges.  Also, one of the flashbacks deals with a visit of
Portuguese explorers to an island populated with beautiful, naked nymphs
and little cupids.  That flashback is quite silly and illustrates Manoel
de Oliveira's delightful (and slightly warped) sense of humor.  My
complaint is that there isn't enough of his wonderful humor in the film!
Also, part of the soldier's discussion is interesting, though I suspect
many viewers will find little of interest in their discussion.
     Manoel de Olivieira, who is 83 years young, is currently working on
his next film.  I look forward to his next film with interest (to be
released next year?).  As for the current film, I think it might appeal
to those with an interest in Portuguese history and/or modern
perceptions of colonialism.  I don't recommend it to a general audience
-- instead, see if you can find de Olivieira's film THE CANNIBALS on
video instead.
Print Source: Portuguese Film Institute; R.S. Pedro de Alcantara 45, 1;
1200 Lisbon; Portugal

Title
Review for Archangel (1990)
Synopsis:
A one-legged Canadian soldier is sent to the Russian Arctic town of
Archangel in World War I.  There he gets involved in a love triangle
with the wife of his landlord and Veronkha, a beautiful married woman
who could pass as a twin for Iris, his (now deceased) former lover.  An
experimental film done in a style similar to silent films.  Although the
film has plenty of warped humor, the film is ultimately unsatisfying
because the plot is so circular and repetitive.
Canada, black-and-white, 1990, 90 minutes.
Director/Co-writer: Guy Maddin
     This is the latest film from Canada's Guy Maddin, who is perhaps
best known (in the U.S.) for the weird and wonderful film, TALES FROM
THE GIMLI HOSPITAL.  His newest film, ARCHANGEL, is another experimental
black-and-white film that, like GIMLI HOSPITAL, is very strange indeed.
The film is done in a style reminiscent of silent films (although the
film is not silent; it has plenty of spoken dialog).  A few scenes even
have the characteristic marks (something like stains) that are found in
old silent films that are in very bad condition.  However, given the
film's weirdness, and the fact that Maddin again creates a unique world
(the town of Archangel), I would say that characterizing the film as
purely a satire or parody of silent films is an incomplete description.
     The film centers on Lt. John Boles, a Canadian Army officer who
has one wooden leg, who is sent to the Russian Arctic town of Archangel
in World War I.  He is sent there to assist the Russians in their fight
against Bolsheviks and Huns.  However, his lover Iris recently died, and
he pines for her; she is the center of his thoughts.
     In Archangel he is billeted with a peasant family where both the
husband and wife are soldiers in the Russian Army.  Soon he meets
Veronkha, a beautiful married woman who is physically identical in
appearance to Boles' beloved former lover, Iris.  Needless to say, Boles
wants Veronkha very badly.  Veronkha's husband returns, but his memory
is damaged by mustard gas and he keeps forgetting he's married to
Veronkha (he's forgetful, and has a very vague life, as the film tells
us).  Meanwhile, Boles' landlady is falling in love with him.  The
result is a strange love triangle, with Boles pursuing the mysterious
Veronkha while his landlady longs for him....
     The film showcases Maddin's weird sense of humor.  When a boy
faints, he is revived by brushing his stomach with horsehair brushes (a
scene reminiscent of the one in GIMLI HOSPITAL where plague sufferers
were massaged with dead seagulls).  Early in the film the wife of the
landlord offers Boles a fancy wooden leg to replace his peg-leg; we are
told "it was her father's leg; I think she wants you to have it."
Later, in the trenches, an attack by Huns is preceded by a large number
of cute, white bunny rabbits (attack rabbits?) running into the
trenches.
     The film has a unique appearance and style.  It has some nicely
warped humor.  However, I found the film lacking on a number of points.
First, there wasn't enough humor in it to make it really appealing.
Second, the plot is iterative (as you will discover if you see the
film).  Certain scenes are reused many times.  Because of the cycling of
the plot, you might eventually lose interest in the film.  At times I
looked at my watch to see how much longer the film had to run.
     I should mention that the film has received very mixed reviews.
Two local papers gave it very good reviews.  However, word-of-mouth
advance reviews from various sources indicated that it was pretty bad.
(Some of the negative reviews came from fans of GIMLI HOSPITAL.)
     As for a recommendation on the film, I would begin by noting that
it is much too strange for a general audience.  If you are a fan of
silent films, you might find the film of interest for its technical
aspects, namely the imitation of silent film techniques.  If you are a
fan of GIMLI HOSPITAL, and you might like a film of similar character
(but with less humor), the film is worth considering (understanding that
perhaps you might not like it).  I found the film to be interesting for
its technical aspects and unique character, but it was not very
enjoyable (the plot cycling was just too repetitive).
Distribution: Now in limited theatrical release in the U.S.  In San
Francisco, it is currently (until 10/2) showing at the Red Vic.

Title
Review for Skrivánci na niti (1990)
Synopsis:
In Czechoslovakia in the early 1950's, a group of "bourgeois" men are
sent to work in a metal scrapyard for "reeducation".  There they meet a
group of women prisoners.  A witty, funny film that contrasts the
people's desire for freedom with the tyranny of the socialist state they
live in; an extremely sarcastic satire of socialism.  A very good but
slow-moving film.
Czechoslovakia (English subtitles), color, 1969, banned by Czech
government censors, released 1990, 95 minutes.
Director: Jiri Menzel.
     In Czechoslovakia in the early 1950's (at the time of the Korean
war), a group of upper and middle class men have been sent to a steel
mill for "reeducation", i.e., to learn to love the Communist party that
oppresses and enslaves their nation.  The men work in the scrapyard,
sorting scrap which is to be melted down into new steel products.  They
work next to a group of women prisoners, "defectors", who are guilty of
the crime of attempting to leave the socialist "worker's paradise".
     Although the men and women work in different parts of the
scrapyard, and the women are guarded, they get together as often as
possible.  The basic plot of the film concerns the men interacting with
a hypocritical party official and the threat of the ever-present secret
police, and two romances.  One of the romances is between a man in the
reeducation group and a woman prisoner; the other major romance is that
of the man who guards the women; he is a newlywed.
     The film portrays the Communist government as hypocritical and
extremely totalitarian; dissent is prohibited.  Simply questioning the
rulers on their commands, or reminding them of their own slogans, can
result in your being sent to prison for political "crimes".  The Party
officials who rule the "worker's paradise" are depicted as drunks,
fools, liars, and even worse (I won't explain the "even worse" part, as
that might spoil part of the film; see it and you will find out!).
Given the negative (but probably generally accurate) portrayal of Party
officials in the film, it is not surprising that the (Party) censors
suppressed the film by banning it.
     The subtle (and sometimes not-so-subtle) struggle of the men for
freedom and their human dignity and rights provides many opportunities
for sarcastic political humor.  The romances give the director a way to
poke fun at general human nature, a sort of counterpoint to the
political humor.  I suppose the general message of the film is that the
human spirit can triumph over both the evil tyranny of socialism, and
the smaller problems of everyday life.
     This film won the Grand Prize at the 1990 Berlin Film Festival.  I
liked the film, especially its witty, sarcastic humor, and its strong
anti-socialist message.  However, it is very slow-moving, and you might
wonder at times if the film has a plot, or is "going anywhere".  There
is quite a bit of character development, but not much action in the
film.
     The film is too slow-moving to recommend to a general audience.
However, if you appreciate a witty, funny film laced with social and
political satire, it is worth considering.
Distribution:  In its first U.S. theatrical release, and showing
currently (6/10) in San Francisco (Opera Plaza Cinema). Probably
available elsewhere also; New York and/or Los Angeles perhaps?
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Manifesto (1988)
Synopsis:
Set in an undisclosed country in Central Europe in 1920, the film follows the
adventures of a beautiful, but oversexed, young woman.  Together with her 
bumbling friends, she is involved in a plot to kill the King.  A sophisticated
and very sly comedy, which pokes fun at socialism and revolutionaries.  Very
good, but I suspect that much of the humor will be missed by most viewers.
Yugoslavia (in English, not dubbed!), color, 1988, 94 minutes.
Director/Writer:  Dusan Makavejev
     This is the latest work by Dusan Makavejev, who is best known in the U.S.
for a previous film, THE COCA-COLA KID.  The current film is a lighthearted
farce, a kind of parody of socialism and revolutionaries.  The plot is rather
thin at times, but it is funny enough that boredom is unlikely.
     The story follows Svetlana, a very beautiful young woman who returns, in
1920, to the small town in Central Europe she was born and raised in.  Based on
her behavior, one gets the impression that she is afflicted with nymphomania,
for she proceeds immediately to rekindle old passions and start new ones.
     Svetlana's motivations for returning home are soon made clear.  The King
is soon to visit her hometown, and Svetlana is involved in a group of clumsy,
inept and incompetent revolutionaries who are plotting to murder the King!
What makes things more interesting is that "the King" who visits is actually a
fake; the real King is already in the town, working with the police (also
clumsy and incompetent) to try to uncover the revolutionaries.  Even more
interesting, the real King is oversexed and has a foot fetish!
     The result of this ridiculous situation is a real comedy of errors, which
are made in great abundance by all the characters here.  Much of the humor is a
pointed satire of socialism, as the police are ridiculed often.  The police
literally hide in practically every closet in this film!  Another example, more
subtle, is the scene where a political prisoner is put in an insane asylum by
the police.  There he is locked in a large circular wheel.  The prisoner loves
to run in place in the wheel, expending great effort, and shouting pro-
socialist slogans all the time.  The irony of this scene is very nice; the man
in the wheel works very hard, yet produces nothing but political rhetoric.  Can
you think of a better parody of socialism?
     Although I enjoyed the film very much, particularly its nice satire of
socialism and revolutionaries, much of the humor is rather subtle.  Thus I
wonder how much of the humor will be effectively lost on a general audience.
As to technical aspects, the photography (much of which was shot on location)
is beautiful, and the acting is really very good.
     Thus I make a conditional recommendation for the movie, i.e., worth 
seeing if you appreciate subtle satire, much of it political.  Also, in case
anyone is curious as to why a Yugoslavian film would be made in English,  the
film is a Cannon/Golan-Globus Production, made specifically for the
international market.
Distribution.  Now in its initial U.S. run, showing at a limited number of
theaters (probably the art houses).
Reviewer:  Thomas E. Billings, Department of Statistics
           University of California, Berkeley

Title
Review for Cabeza de Vaca (1991)
Synopsis:
The story of Cabeza de Vaca, a Spanish explorer shipwrecked off the
coast of Florida in 1528, who performed the incredible feat of
traveling (by foot) from Florida to the Pacific coast of Mexico, an
eight year journey of hardship and adventure.  The director put more
emphasis on ethnographic details than on story-telling, and the film
reflects this.  An interesting film nonetheless.
Mexico (English subtitles), color, 1990, 112 minutes.
Director/Writer: Nicolas Echeverria.
Screenplay based on the book "Naufragios" by Alvar Nunez.
     In 1528, Alvar Nunez Cabeza de Vaca, the treasurer on a Spanish
expedition to the New World, was shipwrecked on the coast of Florida,
with several other men from the expedition.  This began an eight-year
journey, on foot (no horses in those days; horses were introduced later)
across the new land of America, to the Pacific coast of Mexico.  It's an
incredible (true) story, although the film appears to have quite a bit
of fiction mixed in with the facts.
     The film begins with Cabeza de Vaca arriving in a Spanish
settlement in Mexico.  Then, thru a long flashback, the story unfolds.
It begins with the shipwreck in Florida.  The shipwrecked men find
wooden trunks from their ship, amidst evidence of cannibalism.  The men
are attacked by Native American tribesmen, and Cabeza de Vaca becomes a
slave to a shaman/sorcerer.  Cabeza de Vaca views his fate in spiritual
terms, and becomes something of a shaman himself.  The shaman recognizes
his spiritual power of healing, and sets Cabeza de Vaca free.  The story
continues as he heads west alone....
     This is the first feature film by director Nicolas Echeverria, who
is an ethnologist and has done a number of documentaries.  His knowledge
of Native American culture shows in the detailed, interesting view it
provides of the Native American tribes that Cabeza de Vaca encounters.
These are not the "Hollywood Indians" of old westerns, nor do these
cultures resemble the DANCES WITH WOLVES images.  Rather, it is a view
of Native Americans before the influx of the white man.  So, there are
no horses (as horses were introduced by Europeans), and the Native
Americans live in primitive hunting and gathering societies that are
very close to the stone age in terms of technology.
     I think the film is worth seeing for the view it gives of early
Native American culture.  However, the film has a number of flaws, some
of which detract from the story.  The film is the story of the outward
journey of Cabeza de Vaca, and his inward journey as he becomes a faith
healer of sorts.  His interaction with Native American shamanism is the
driving force in the story, and the story is not told very well.  Some
of the editing is abrupt, and there are huge gaps in the story.  In one
scene, Cabeza de Vaca is being set free in Florida; in the next scene he
is walking in a snowstorm in what appears to be the West.  Further, we
see only 3 different tribes in his long journey across America.
     One serious technical error deserves mention.  In the scenes that
are supposedly taking place in Florida, there are mountains in the
background!  As one who grew up in Florida, I can guarantee that there
are positively no mountains in Florida.  (The Florida scenes were filmed
in a mangrove swamp, possibly in Yucatan).
     Although the abrupt editing and faith healing subplot detract from
the film, it is still worth seeing for the view of early (before the
arrival of the Europeans) Native American cultures.  The film is rather
interesting, though I didn't find it to be very entertaining.
Distribution: The production credits for the film list a number of
financial sources which suggest that the film will get wide
distribution.  These include American Playhouse Theatrical Films,
implying an "art house" run in the U.S., possibly followed (2 years
after theatrical release) by broadcast on PBS television stations in the
U.S.; Channel 4 Television (England; possible television broadcast),
Television Espana (Spain television), etc.
Print Source: Ventana Films; 2021 Rosilla Place; Los Angeles, CA 90046.

Title
Review for Gungun hongchen (1990)
Synopsis:
The story of two women and their romantic affairs in China during the
period 1938-1949.  A romantic drama set against the history of China
during the period: the Japanese occupation of World War II, and the
Nationalist-Communist civil war.  Extremely well made, the film is an
excellent romantic melodrama.
Hong Kong (English subtitles), color, 1990, 94 minutes.
Director/Writer: Yim Ho
     The film centers on a beautiful writer, Shen Shaohua, who falls in
love with one of her readers, Zhang Nengcai.  The time is 1938; they are
in a part of China that is occupied by Japanese forces.  Nengcai works
for the Japanese-controlled occupation government, so he is seen as a
traitor and collaborator by many Chinese.
     Soon Shaohua's best friend, Yuefeng, returns for a visit.  Yuefeng
is in a romantic relationship with a resistance fighter, hence she is
harshly critical of Nengcai, even though he affirms that "There is no
blood on my hands," i.e., he is not involved in the atrocities and
cruelties of the Japanese occupation force.  However, social disapproval
doesn't deter Shaohua, for she is in love.  The two women maintain their
friendship through the political complications and turmoil of the time.
     The film flashes forward to 1945, the eve of Japan's surrender in
World War II.  Nengcai must go into hiding to avoid retribution after
the fall of the occupation government.  The story continues with the
separation of the lovers....
     This film manages to neatly blend the story of Shaohua's romance,
Yuefeng's romance, and a dramatization of one of Shaohua's stories (the
romance of two peasants, Jade Flower and Spring Hope), with the historic
events of the period: the Japanese occupation during World War II, and
their eventual defeat; the economic collapse of the Nationalist
government in 1947; the civil war, and the eventual Communist victory in
1949.  The result is a "classy," very well made romantic melodrama.
     The photography is superb and the acting is excellent.  Elaborate
sets and location scenes (including mass crowd scenes) reflect a large
budget for the film.  The story moves slowly at first, then picks up in
the middle of the film as the plot is moved along by the historical
events of the period.
     As I was watching the film, I was concerned for a while that it was
just another soap opera.  Alas, the slow pace of the first half of the
film seemed to confirm this.  However, be patient -- the second half of
the film is extremely dramatic and will definitely hold your attention.
Indeed, the second half can be accurately described as riveting and
compelling!
     I must admit that I am not much of a fan of romantic melodrama.
However, this film succeeds both as romantic melodrama and as standard
drama.  It is certainly one of the best romantic melodramas that I have
ever seen!  Because of this, I strongly recommend the film to fans of
melodrama, and it is also worth seeing by a general audience.  Overall,
the film rates in the excellent/very good range.
Print Source: Creative Workshop; Flat F, 18/F; Tonnochy Tower A; 272
Jaffe Road; Wanchai, Hong Kong
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Dun-Huang (1988)
Synopsis:
Set in China during the Sung dynasty (11th Century), the film depicts
the adventures of a young scholar who gets drafted to fight in several
battles.  The ultimate goal of the film is to provide a (fictional)
explanation for an archeological mystery: the discovery of a large
library of 11th century scrolls, found in Dun-Huang in 1899.  A
historical drama set in China, that is similar in style to a Japanese
samurai story.  Not as good as most Chinese "art" films; not
recommended.
Japan/China (English subtitles), color, 1991, 120 minutes.
Director: Junya Sato. 
Based on a novel by Yasushi Inoue.
     Because this new film has the same name as another recent program,
it is appropriate that I clarify the situation.  In 1980 (date
approximate), NHK, the Japanese television firm, broadcast a documentary
called "Silk Road."  The "Silk Road" documentary is probably best known
in the United States for its soundtrack by Kitaro, a (very) popular
Japanese "New Age" musician.  I mention this because I want readers to
be fully aware that the film SILK ROAD is new and different; it is not
the documentary, and the soundtrack is not by Kitaro.  (As a side note,
I would mention to fans of Kitaro that the "Silk Road" documentary is
now available on videotape in the U.S.; I believe Time-Life is the U.S.
distributor.)
     The story centers on a young scholar, Zhao Xingde, and is set in
China during the Sung dynasty; most of the action occurs in the years
1026 and 1028.  The film begins with the young scholar being questioned
by elder scholars.  He fails the exam because he does not know much
about Xixia, a nearby country.  Shortly afterward he joins with two
other young scholars, and leaves for Dun-Huang, the crossroads city on
the "silk road," the overland route  between China and the Mideast and
Europe.  (Dun-Huang is in northwestern China.)  His caravan is captured
by soldiers, and Zhao and his friends find themselves immediately
drafted into the Chinese unit of the Xixian army!
     Their unit is later involved in a few battles, and they eventually
find themselves at the gates of the capital city of Uighur (another
country).  Zhao goes ahead to scout the city, and discovers the daughter
of the king of Uighur.  He hides her and tries to protect her.  A few
days later he leaves the city, under orders to go to another city, and
smuggles the princess out of the city.  The story continues as they get
lost in the desert...
     I was somewhat disappointed by this film, for reasons that will be
discussed shortly.  First, you should know that although the film is a
(fictitious) historical drama set in China, it is very much a Japanese
film.  The director, most actors, writer, and some of the production
staff, are Japanese.  Except for a brief narration at the beginning and
ending of the film (the narration is in English), all dialog in the film
is in Japanese.  The film has subtitles, in English only (no Chinese
subtitles in the version I saw).  The film was co-produced by a number
of Chinese organizations, including the Chinese Army.
     Now, in saying it is a Japanese film, I am really referring more to
its style, tone, and pacing rather than the ethnic origin of its cast or
production crew.  In these matters, the film  is very similar to a
Japanese feudal period or samurai film, except it happens to be set in
ancient China instead of feudal Japan.  I happen to enjoy both Japanese
historical dramas and Chinese historical dramas.  However, I found
watching a Chinese drama, done in the style of a Japanese drama, to be
somewhat incongruous.
     The film has more problems than simply a style that differed from
my expectations.  First, the film provides very little character
development and then quickly jumps to action (battle scenes).  As an
example, the film begins with a short scene of Zhao being questioned.  A
few scenes later, he is in the desert, and his caravan is being attacked
by soldiers.  The 2 or 3 minutes between introducing the character and
the first battle does not provide time to get involved in or care about
what happens to the character.  This same problem appears later in the
film when the Uighuri princess quickly falls in love with Zhao.  Of
course he helps her, but why does she fall in love with him, other than
the script calling for love at first sight?
     Next, the editing is rather abrupt at times, making the film hard
to follow.  I had the impression that the film was edited down from a
much longer film -- a TV miniseries perhaps?  (Note that this is pure
conjecture on my part).  The battle scenes often involved large numbers
of men on horseback in the dry and very dusty desert.  These epic battle
scenes often turned into large clouds of dust!  Also, the camera would
scan to show the huge cast assembled for the battle scenes.
Unfortunately, these scenes were often out of focus in the film print I
viewed.
     Because of the film's technical flaws and poor story development, I
would not recommend it to a general audience, and would recommend that
fans of Chinese historical dramas avoid it.  I also wouldn't recommend
it to fans of Japanese historical dramas, as there are many excellent
Japanese historical films available on video.
U.S. Distribution: presently in its first U.S. theatrical release.
The film opens in San Francisco at the AMC Kabuki Theater on Friday, 31
January, 1992.  The U.S. distributor is Trimark Pictures.

Title
Review for Yari no gonza (1986)
Synopsis:
     In Japan in the 1700's, a young samurai warrior and the wife of a noble
are accused of committing adultery.  Under the prevailing social code, the
noble must kill his wife to avenge his honor.  The samurai and the woman flee,
and are pursued by her husband.  A tragic story of jealousy and honor, laced
with a dose of lust.
Japan (Japanese with English subtitles), color, 1988, 126 minutes.
Director: Masahiro Shinoda
Principal cast: Hiromi Go, Shima Iwashita, Shohei Hino
Print Source: Schochiku Films of America
     The rather clumsy title of this film is a literal translation of the title
of the play on which it is based, Yari no Gonza.  The play was written by
Monzaemon Chikamatsu, the "Shakespeare of Japan."  The resulting film is well
made and interesting; perhaps the word "elegant" might apply.
     The story centers on Gonza, an ambitious young samurai warrior.  Gonza is
very handsome, and is favored by women.  In order to advance in the service of
his clan, Gonza must learn and practice the tea ceremony, an elaborate social
ritual.  Gonza competes with another man for the privilege of performing the
tea ceremony for the clan leader.  To make things more complicated, the man
Gonza competes with is the brother of the woman he is engaged to.
     Since Gonza is to perform the tea ceremony on behalf of Ichinoshin, a
noble who is in Edo (feudal Tokyo), he asks to see the family tea scrolls.
This is normally permitted only for family members.  Ichinoshin's wife, Osai,
agrees on the condition that Gonza agrees to marry her 15-year old daughter,
thereby joining the family.  Despite his engagement to another, Gonza agrees to
the marriage.
     Gonza comes late at night to examine the scrolls.  He is observed by his
rival, who runs through town proclaiming that Gonza and Osai have committed
adultery.  To avoid the wrath of Ichinoshin, who by social custom must kill
both Osai and Gonza to preserve his honor, they flee and hide.  Ichinoshin
follows and searches for them.
     This is a tragic melodrama dealing with honor, social duty, love, lust,
and jealousy.  Although the first hour drags on at times with a slow moving and
rather convoluted plot, the second hour will definitely hold your attention!
It is not the best "samurai melodrama" that I have seen, but, overall, it is
really very good.
     Now comes the tricky question: is it recommended for a general audience?
First of all, if you are looking for a samurai action film like, for example,
YOJIMBO, then you are cautioned that this is not that sort of film.  This is a
melodrama, it is not the samurai equivalent of a kung-fu movie!  Second, the
film is an adaptation of a stage play, with all the inherent limitations
therein.  The overall quality of the film is good, but it is not one of the
"best of the year" or even "best of its class."
     Third, to fully understand and appreciate the film, it is helpful to have
some knowledge of Japanese history and customs in the period.  Melodramas like
this are standard fare on Japanese television.  Having spent considerable time
in Japan, I am acquainted with the material, and acquired a taste for it.
Despite the universal themes addressed in the story, I wonder whether a general
audience will fully appreciate the unique social background that drives the
tragedy.
     Overall evaluation: good.  Recommended to those with some knowledge of the
period, and adventuresome viewers willing to take a risk on a "samurai
melodrama."
Reviewer:  Thomas E. Billings, Department of Statistics
           University of California, Berkeley
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Asfour Stah (1990)
Synopsis:
A kind-hearted story of the coming-of-age of a 12-year-old boy in modern
Tunisia.  Provides a rare look into sensuality and sexuality in modern
Arab societies.  Charming, frequently witty and funny, and very
entertaining.
Tunisia/France (English subtitles), color, 1990, 98 minutes.
Director/Writer: Ferid Boughedir
     The story centers on Noura, a 12 year old boy who is small for his
age.  Because of his size and appearance, he is still permitted to
accompany his mother to the women's bathhouse.  Inasmuch as Noura is
feeling the first desires associated with puberty, the baths are centers
of eroticism to him, as they are full of naked/partially naked women.
(I wonder whether the film was screened uncensored, i.e., including
nudity, in Tunisia?)
     However, Noura is growing up, and he will soon be banished from the
women's baths, and the society of women, into the much harsher society
of men.  The story line centers on Noura's exploits as he explores his
new and growing sexual desires.  Typical of "hormone comedies," he has
(two) male friends who are a bad influence on him, and encourage him to
engage in various types of mischief.  Noura's entry into the world of
men is helped by two women: his mother's cousin, and a beautiful young
woman hired as a maid in Noura's household.
     Because of religious sensitivities, films from Arab countries
usually cannot be as frank about sexuality and sensuality as Western
films.  In some ways that can be good, because it can force the
filmmakers to use humor or wit to compensate.  An example is the film
THE CITADEL, an extremely funny and witty film about polygamy and the
effects of uncontrolled sexual desire.  What makes HALFAOUINE
interesting is the direct view it provides of sexuality and sensuality
in an Arab culture.  The view is generally kind-hearted, and relatively
upbeat.
     In an interview published in the San Francisco International Film
Festival Program Guide, the director, Ferid Boughedir explains his
treatment of sexuality: "It has always fascinated me how everyday
sensuality has always belied the inflexibility of official dogma....  At
a time when cliches about the Arab culture are becoming as arbitrary as
ever, I am tempted to talk about a Mediterranean society that can still
be experienced today, a society that is luxuriant and tender, where
humor and eroticism are always prevalent together with tolerance -- a
word rather difficult to brandish about today."
     The film has been compared to MY LIFE AS A DOG, another story of a
young boy's coming-of-age.  However, HALFAOUINE is more upbeat, and does
not have the melancholy spirit of MY LIFE AS A DOG.  Of the two films, I
strongly prefer HALFAOUINE, for its pleasant humor and wit.
     Because of its pleasant humor and wit, I recommend the film to a
general audience.  Overall, the movie rates in the very good/excellent
range.
Print Source: Ervin, Cohen & Jessup; 9401 Wilshire Blvd; 9th Floor;
Beverly Hills, CA 90064. (Note: a screening is scheduled for 5/9/91, at
the Aquarius Twin Cinema, in Palo Alto, CA).
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Da hong deng long gao gao gua (1991)
Synopsis:
In northern China during the 1920s, a beautiful college student becomes
the fourth wife of an older and very wealthy man.  The four wives
compete with each other for the attention of their husband, "The
Master."  A slow-moving drama centered on the wives and their plots
against each other.  Although the film does make the appropriate social
comment, it does so in a ponderous, rather depressing fashion.
China  (English subtitles), color, 1991, 125 minutes.
Director: Zhang Yimou
     This is the newest film by Zhang Yimou to be released in the U.S.;
his previous films include RED SORGHUM and JU DOU.  Like JU DOU, it is
the story of a young woman married to an older man, and the social and
personal oppression she must face.  The story centers on Songlian, a
beautiful 19-year-old college student (played by Gong Li, who had the
title role in JU DOU) who accepts a marriage offer from an older, very
wealthy man.  The film is set in the 1920s in northern China, a society
where tradition, or perhaps more specifically conformance to tradition,
is extremely important.
     Songlian arrives at the household and is assigned a maid, Yan'er,
who is resentful because she wanted to be chosen as the "Fourth
Mistress."  Each of the wives lives in a separate courtyard.  The
husband, referred to as "The Master" by everyone in the household,
including his wives, is a very wealthy middle-aged man.  The "First
Mistress" is now an old woman; she has produced a son ("Young Master"),
and is no longer of sexual interest to The Master.  The "Second
Mistress" is a jealous, power hungry woman who wants to produce a son
for The Master; she is upset because all she has done is produce a
"useless" daughter.  The "Third Mistress" is a former opera singer.
     The household is ruled by traditions and custom.  Each night the
wives stand at the entry to their courtyard, and The Master chooses
which one he will sleep with that night.  A red lantern, on a tripod, is
set in front of the chosen wife.  The red lanterns in the courtyard
belonging to the chosen wife are then lit.  The film's plot consists
largely of the wives competing against each other for The Master's
attention.  The women plot against each other, and use servants to spy
on each other.
     On the positive side, this film has beautiful photography and sets,
excellent acting, and a good social message.  The problem is that
virtually none of the characters make a measurable emotional connection
with the audience.  Also, the story is very slow-moving and rather
depressing.  Since there is no emotional connection, it is hard to care
what happens to the main characters.
     The film's social message centers on the oppression of women, and
the terrible oppression of social tradition, in "old" China.  Because
the character of The Master is not explored, he is seen as an aloof,
capricious, selfish  totalitarian -- an allusion, perhaps, to China's
present leadership?
     I would not recommend the film to a general audience, as it is too
slow-moving and depressing.  Instead, JU DOU is available on videotape
in the U.S., and is a good alternate.  Fans of Chinese historical films
might find the film acceptable.
U.S. Distribution: currently in its first general theatrical release.
The distributor is Orion Classics, and the film will probably be shown
primarily in "art house" theaters.

Title
Review for Man Without a World, The (1991)
Synopsis:
Self-described as a rediscovered classic silent film by (fictitious)
Soviet director Yevgeny Antinov, this is really a parody of silent
films.  Set in a shtetl, a small Jewish village in Eastern Europe in
1928, the story centers on the romance between a young, handsome and
incompetent poet (incredibly bad poetry!), and the beautiful daughter of
a village merchant.  Outrageously melodramatic at times, silly, corny,
and containing plenty of Jewish jokes, it is also a pleasant, witty,
funny, and good-humored film.  Very good!
U.S.A., black-and-white, 1991, 95 min., silent.
Director: Eleanor Antin.
     This new film by Eleanor Antin is an enjoyable, witty parody of
silent films.  The film is silent; although there is no spoken dialogue
(inter-titles are used for dialogue, standard practice for silent
films), the film does have a soundtrack, consisting only of background
organ music.  The film has the look of silent films from the 1920's,
using many of the same special effects, and the exaggerated acting of
the era.
     However, the film's sense of humor is quite contemporary, and
slightly sarcastic, but in a good-humored way.  The film's characters
spend a lot of time discussing (and poking fun at) Jewish traditions and
customs.  The script is excellent, and satirizes social and political
movements of the time (1920's), especially socialists and anarchists.
One of my favorite lines from the film: "...a good anarchist follows
orders..."!  The film is more than funny; it is witty.  There are plenty
of funny films around, but truly witty films are rare.
     An example of the film's humor and wit.  The biblical story of
Jonah, who was swallowed by a large fish/whale is told in a skit.
Picture a small boat, in a storm, with rain and wind.  Two men are on
the boat; one says (paraphrasing, can't provide an exact quote) "we're
in a bad storm ... there must be a Jew on board!"  The men search the
boat, and find Jonah.  They throw him overboard, where he is swallowed
by a whale.  Immediately the wind ceases, the rain stops, and the sun
comes out.  Clearly, throwing Jonah overboard has ended the storm!
     The film is set in a shtetl, a small rural Jewish village in
Eastern Europe (Poland or Russia) in 1928.  The story rambles somewhat,
but is mostly concerned with the romance between a handsome young man who
writes amazingly bad poetry, and the beautiful daughter of the village
tailor.  The poet has joined a traveling group of actors, and he is
trying to be an actor also.  Unfortunately, he writes his own lines for
the "plays" the group performs, and his plays are as bad as his poetry!
The poet's Mother dies, leaving the poet to care for his young, and
insane sister.
     The poet abandons his sister, who decides to live under a bridge
haunted by a dybbuk, a ghost.  This prompts the village's religious
elders to capture the poet's sister.  The story continues as she is the
subject of an exorcism ceremony performed by a dancing rabbi!
     Although this is a nice, funny film, it is not perfect.  The story
drags in a number of places.  The film is silent, and in grainy black-
and-white (it is in 16mm); obviously you shouldn't see it if you dislike
silent films.  Also, the film's self-consciously poking fun at Jewish
traditions and customs may offend (rather than entertain) some sensitive
viewers.
     This is an "artsy," low-key movie that probably won't get wide
distribution because it is silent.  Your best chance to see it is at a
film festival or film society screening.  If you can enjoy a witty,
funny, low-key silent movie, it is certainly worth seeing.
Print Source: Eleanor Antin, P. O. Box 1147, Del Mar, CA 92014, U.S.A.

Title
Review for Killer Klowns from Outer Space (1988)
Synopsis:
     They came from outer space, in a spaceship that looks like ... a circus
tent!  They're aliens who look like circus clowns, and they're here to kill.
They dispatch their victims  with imagination, style, and circus magic!  An
imaginative, offbeat, black comedy; a very good midnight movie.
     A shooting star blazes across the sky above a lover's lane, landing
nearby.  A young couple investigates, only to find what appears to be a circus
tent.  They discover that it is a spaceship, run by aliens that look like
circus clowns.  By good luck (and running very fast) the couple escape the
clutches of the killer clowns, and go to town to report their discovery to the
police.  The clowns follow them into the town, and begin a night of terror and
murder.
     Will the killer clowns take over the earth?  Will the young couple
triumph?  Can humanity be saved?  See the film & find out.
     Despite the ridiculous premise, or perhaps because of it, this is a very
funny film, albeit with a savage sense of humor.  The "stars" of the film are a
bunch of unknowns, and the acting of the people in the film is rather poor.
However, the clowns are very well done.  It is clear that the Director chose to
spend his budget on make-up and special effects.  This is for the good, because
it is the clowns that make this movie worth seeing!
     The clowns are very large and look like ordinary clowns, except for their
sharp, fanged teeth and large ears.  There are a few dwarf clowns also, and
there is a savagely funny scene where a dwarf killer clown on a clown bicycle
terrorizes an entire motorcycle gang!
     Given that the humor here concerns murders, the film is definitely a black
comedy.  If it is a parody or take-off on anything, it is more a parody of
slasher films than science-fiction.  Rather than someone in a hockey mask
(FRIDAY THE 13TH series) or Freddie Krueger, we have a bunch of clowns
committing the murders.  However, the methods the clowns use to dispatch their
victims are imaginative, inventive, and outrageously funny!  I won't say
anymore on this point to avoid spoiling anything.  The Chiodo brothers
(writers, producers, and director) deserve high marks for the originality and
imagination shown in this film.
     An examination of the production values of this film indicates that it is
definitely a "B-movie."  The acting (of the people, but not the clowns) is
poor, the script occasionally weak; only the outrageous clowns & their equally
outrageous antics save the movie.  The clowns are so silly that, when you see
them, it is hard not to laugh!
     Despite the limitations of the film, it is worth watching (assuming you
have the properly warped sense of humor) just to see the clowns and their
antics.  If you like "midnight movies," this is definitely worth seeing!  If
you don't like "midnight movies" then perhaps you shouldn't see it.
Overall evaluation: very good for a "midnight movie."
P.S.  This film is now available on video.  You might consider viewing it, late
at night, with a group of people who like this kind of humor.
Reviewer:  Thomas E. Billings;  Department of Statistics
           University of California, Berkeley
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Refrigerator, The (1991)
     The 1991 Mill Valley Film Festival took place October 3-10.  Mill
Valley is an affluent, suburban community in Marin County, California.
Marin County is the county just north of San Francisco, and is connected
to San Francisco by the Golden Gate Bridge.  The Mill Valley Film
Festival is the "second" major film festival held in the (San Francisco)
bay area, the "first" being the San Francisco International Film
Festival.
     As in previous years, the Sequoia Theatre in Mill Valley was the
principal film venue, though there were two screenings at the Regency
Theater in San Rafael.  The festival includes a wide variety of foreign
and domestic films.  One of the films screened at the festival,
DELICATESSEN, was reviewed separately.  Below are short reviews of other
films I saw at the festival, followed by brief general comments.
THE REFRIGERATOR 
U.S.A., 1991, 86 mins; Director/Writer: Nicholas A.E. Jacobs.
     The director appeared at the screening, which was the U.S.
premiere, and described the film as 25% horror, 50% melodrama, and 25%
weirdness.  After seeing it, I'd say that is a reasonable assessment.
The story concerns a young newlywed couple, the Batemans, who move from
Chagrin Falls, Ohio, to New York City.  They get a $200/month apartment
on Avenue D (D as in diablo or devil), which has a clunky old 1963 Norge
brand refrigerator in it.  What the Batemans don't know is that the
refrigerator is (1) a gateway to hell, and (2) a carnivorous monster
that can move around, attack, and eat people!  Yes, it's literally the
refrigerator from hell!
     The plot concerns the Batemans trying to adjust to life in New York
City, which is depicted as a hostile place populated with weirdos, while
the refrigerator eats both their dreams and their houseguests.  The
refrigerator as monster is pretty silly, as it growls, slides around,
and opens its door (with a red light indicating it is hungry & on the
prowl).  There is a very bloody scene where the refrigerator eats
someone, during which the audience was howling in laughter instead of
being shocked or frightened.
     Although the film has its funny moments, the film appears to have
been done on a rather low budget.  The special effects are often corny,
and the script is very weak in places.  Some of the humor is based on
stereotypes.  Overall, it's not a very good movie.  However, some parts
of it are so bad that they're good!  This would make a reasonable
midnight movie.
TEN YEARS WITHOUT THE RIGHT TO CORRESPOND 
also known as BURN THE KREMLIN
U.S.S.R., 1991, 96 mins., Director/Producer: Vladimir Naumov.
     In 1937 Moscow, the dreaded knock on the door at night occurs, and
the resident is taken away by the KGB, charged with treason.  Before
leaving, he gives his young son Misha a  photo.  The man is sentenced to
"ten years without the right to correspond," which is not ten years in
isolation, but a euphemism for execution.  The son blames the local KGB
man for slandering his father, and tries to kill him by dropping a
toilet on him.
     Several years later, after the war, the little boy is now a young
man, a veteran, and wants (legal) revenge on the man who slandered his
father.  He meets Kolko, his childhood friend, who is also a veteran,
and  married to a beautiful woman who has a reputation as a
nymphomaniac.  Here the story starts to ramble somewhat.  Misha's plans
for revenge finally crystallize after Kolko's wife is kidnapped by the
KGB (to serve as a prostitute for KGB Chief Beria)...
     This film can be described as a political thriller, of average
quality, that is interesting and exciting in the beginning and end, but
that rambles badly in the middle.  It also provides an interesting look
at life under the incredibly oppressive regime of Stalin.  A good film,
but nothing great.
THE TALE OF THE UNEXTINGUISHED MOON 
U.S.S.R., 1991, 84 mins., Director: Evgueni Tsymbal.
     This film is based on a novel by Boris Pilnyak (Pilnyak was
executed for treason immediately on publication of the novel!).  The
basic story of the film is the death of Defense Commissar Mikhail Frunze
in 1925, the number two man in the Soviet hierarchy (Stalin being the
number one man).  The film shows Stalin arranging Frunze's death via
medical operation.  Having Frunze die as a result of an operation
protected Stalin from suspicion in the matter.
     The film moves at an agonizingly slow pace, with very few
surprises.  The film may interest viewers with an interest in Soviet
history (though there is no proof available of the basic allegation made
in the film).  However, most other viewers will be bored by the glacial
pace of the film.
     This is the newest film from Chen Kaige, whose previous films
include YELLOW EARTH, THE BIG PARADE, KING OF THE CHILDREN.  Set in old
China, the film is the story of a blind master musician, who believes
that his eyesight will be restored when he breaks (accidentally) the
1000th banjo string.  By the time he reaches 998 broken strings, he is
an old man, and wonders whether he will live to the 1000th string.  He
travels with a young blind man, his disciple.
     Much of the film deals with how the blind men relate to the world
around them.  The old man is revered as a saint by the local people,
while his assistant falls in love with a beautiful local girl.
Ultimately the film has a good moral about accepting disabilities,
and/or accepting yourself for what you are rather than what you will be.
The major potential drawback to the film is the musician himself; he can
be quite cranky at times.  If you dislike him, you probably won't want
to spend a lot of time watching him.  A nice folk tale, but probably
won't appeal to a general audience.
     Finally, in the category of "didn't see, but wanted to," is the
film by Jiri Menzel (Czechoslovakia, 1991), THE BEGGAR'S OPERA.
According to the festival description, it is a gentle satire of
totalitarianism and corruption.  That description could fit his earlier
film LARKS ON A STRING, which was recently released in the U.S.

Title
Review for Xiangnu xiaoxiao (1986)
Synopsis:
In pre-revolutionary China, a 12 year old girl is married to a 2 year old boy,
following the ancient tradition of child marriage.  Four years later the girl
is a young woman, experiencing her sexual awakening.  She has an affair and
gets pregnant.  This is very serious, for the penalty for adultery is death -
by drowning.  An interesting and surprisingly funny film.
China (English subtitles), color, 1986 (released in US: 1988), 110 minutes.
Directors: Xie Fei, U Lan
     Set in the recent past in pre-revolutionary China, this is the story of
Xiao Xiao, a young woman who is married, at age twelve, to a two year old boy.
This is the ancient tradition of (arranged) child marriage.  Both Xiao Xiao and
her husband are peasants, and live with her husband's family in a rural 
village, where they are farmers.  Xiao Xiao's husband, as he grows up, refers 
to her as "sister"!
     Four years later, she is maturing and awakening sexually.  Xiao Xiao's
mother-in-law is critical of her, for being lazy, and, even worse, for not
binding her feet and breasts (a common practice of the day).
     Shortly thereafter, Xiao Xiao is raped by a neighbor.  Rather than report
it, she takes the man as a lover, for it seems that she really likes sex.  Soon
she realizes that she is pregnant, and she starts gaining weight.
     The next day a couple in the village are caught in adultery.  As
punishment they injure the man and drown the woman.  This terrifies Xiao Xiao
and her lover.  Soon, her lover flees, leaving Xiao Xiao to face her fate
alone.  Is she drowned, the standard punishment for adulterous women?  What is
her fate?  See the film to find out.
     This is a very interesting film.  It illustrates some of the customs of
old China: arranged child marriages, infanticide of female infants, and the low
status of women (lower than cattle, it seems) in that society.  Although a bit
slow at times, it holds your interest very well.
     One surprising thing about this film is its humor.  I don't think any of
it is intended to be funny, but there are many times when you cannot help but
laugh.  For instance, at Xiao Xiao's wedding, her husband (being only 2 years
old) decides it's a great time to cry.  Later, Xiao Xiao's "uncle" (father-in-
law) reports seeing "girl students" on a trip to the city.  These people find
it funny and strange; what do women need education for?  Besides that, the
"girl students" are shameless, exposing their arms and part of their legs for
all to see!
     There is one quote from the film that neatly summarizes it.  At a critical
time, an older woman tells Xiao Xiao that "women are born to suffer."  This
film perfectly illustrates their suffering in old China.  It is interesting and
reasonably well made.  Overall, a very good film - definitely worth seeing.
Distribution.  No information available; suspect that you might find it
screened at repertory theaters and/or art houses.  Print Source: New Yorker
Films.
Reviewer:  Thomas E. Billings, Department of Statistics
           University of California, Berkeley
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Baxter (1988)
Synopsis:
The story of a dog, a bull terrier, who goes through a succession of
owners in search of an authoritarian master.  A black comedy/satire that
explores the strange things that people do.  The film is
thought-provoking, but not very entertaining.
France (English subtitles), color, 1991, 82 minutes.
Director:  Jerome Boivin
     The screenplay for this film was written by the Director and
Jacques Audiard, and is based on the novel "Hell Hound", by Ken
Greenhall.  (I haven't read the book, so cannot comment on how the film
relates to the book).  The film is the story of Baxter, a dog, a bull
terrier.  Perhaps I should identify the bull terrier breed; the dog in
the beer ads, "Spuds McKenzie, Party Animal", is a bull terrier.
     The story is told from Baxter's viewpoint, with extra scenes added
that Baxter does not appear in, to complete the story.  Some scenes are
shot from Baxter's point of view, i.e., close to the ground.  The story
is narrated by Baxter, who relates his thoughts and plans.
     The story begins as Baxter is taken from a breeding kennel and
given to an old woman.  Baxter quickly tires of living with the old
woman, because he wants discipline; he wants to obey, and the old woman
will not discipline him.  Baxter looks across the street at the young
couple moving in; their liveliness and strong smells excite him.
     The old woman suffers from two mysterious accidents (were they
arranged by Baxter?), and Baxter is given to the young couple.  That
arrangement does not last, and Baxter is given to a new, perhaps ideal
owner: a young teenage boy with a Nazi fetish!  The story continues as
Baxter is disciplined by his new owner, who constructs a replica of
Hitler's bunker in the junkyard that he plays in.
     The film has some black comedy in it, and at times becomes a sharp
satire on human relations and customs.  Unfortunately, the film is not
very entertaining; there is not much humor.  Indeed, one local newspaper
mini-review described it as a horror film (in some ways it is).
     However, the film gives a rich insight into the personality of
Baxter, and the craziness of humanity.  There are layers of social
commentary present, in allegorical form, to analyze.  Inasmuch as Baxter
is searching for someone to obey, his relationship with people can be
seen as an allegory of the "fatal attraction" humanity has with
totalitarianism.  An alternate view is that Baxter, with his strong need
to be controlled, is the "ideal citizen" for whom social and political
activists are only too happy to provide control.
     Because the film is not very entertaining, I would not suggest it
to a general audience.  If you want a film to analyze for its layers of
social comment, it is worth considering.
Distribution. Now in its first U.S. theatrical run. Playing in the San
Francisco area; should be available in other areas also.
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Earth Girls Are Easy (1989)
Screened at its U.S. premiere, March 10, 1989, at the San Francisco
International Film Festival (Kabuki Theatre, San Francisco).
     Synopsis: Space aliens visit earth, and while they're here, decide to have
a good time with ... human girlfriends!  An outrageously funny and delightful
comedy/satire.
Director: Julien Temple
Producer: Tony Garnet
Screenplay: Julie Brown, Charlie Coffey, Terrence E. McNally
Principal cast: Geena Davis, Jeff Goldblum, Julie Brown, Charles Rocket,
                Jim Carrey, Damon Wayans
Released by: Vestron Pictures
     Director Julien Temple scores a bullseye with this light & warm hearted
film that manages to satirize just about everything, including consumerism, Los
Angeles-style pop culture, modern romance, and science fiction films.  The
satire is very well done, without the hard edges or cynicism that is so common
nowadays.
     The film begins by showing us the inside of an alien space ship, which is
piloted by three furry humanoid creatures.  They are frustrated and lonely, as
they are on a long journey without female companions.  The only female
companionship available to them is to play holographic projections of (alien)
females.  The film then shifts to earth, where we meet Valerie (Geena Davis),
an air-headed manicurist who works at the Curl Up & Dye hair salon.  It seems
that Valerie is engaged to a young Doctor, who is chasing every skirt in town
but hers, and she is disturbed by this.  Anyway, the alien space ship is
passing earth, and they decide to do a little girl-watching.  They happen to
zoom in on Valerie's home, and they see her sunbathing by the pool.  When
Valerie removes her "breast protective device" (the top of her bikini), one of
the aliens gets so excited that it leads to the alien ship crash-landing in her
pool!
     This sets in motion a sequence of truly unique and hilarious events, as
the aliens suffer real "culture shock" in LA.  Valerie takes the aliens to the
beauty salon for a make-over, so that they are presentable in society.  They
then go out for a night on the town.  There is a truly hilarious scene in a bar
where one of the aliens is drinking out of a tall glass.  He sticks his long
(several inches) tongue into the glass, whereupon the four beautiful girls he
is with start openly fighting among themselves to see which girl gets to go
home with him that night!  I won't give away any more of the film to avoid
spoiling anything.  Rest assured that there is a *lot* more humor in the film!
     This film is a real delight.  It is outrageously funny, but also
warm-hearted.  It is very fast-paced, and includes send-ups of, among other
things, science fiction films, beach blanket films, television, and Jerry Lewis.
Audience reaction at the premiere was enthusiastic, to say the least.  Oh yes,
it is also a romance film, and those aspects of the film also receive the comic
touch.
     There are a few other points that should be mentioned.  Director Julien
Temple is best known for music videos (although he has directed other films:
ABSOLUTE BEGINNERS, THE GREAT ROCK AND ROLL SWINDLE), and this film does
include a few sequences that are essentially music videos.  Although the music
is nothing special, these "videos" are funny and fit well into the movie.
Also, the special effects of the alien spaceship (except for the holographic
alien females) are really cheesy.  The alien costumes are also rather obvious.
However, this does *not* detract from the film; the appeal of this film is its
satire and comedy, not special effects.  [Note: the holographic alien females
effect is nicely done.]
     I really enjoyed this film, and I think most people will too.  The only
danger in viewing it is that you will be overwhelmed by the humor, which comes
at a frantic pace.  I am also quite certain that this film will be a very *big*
hit when it is released this summer!  In summary, I would describe this film as
the funniest full-length film I have seen in a very long time.  [Remark: it is
funnier than THE ADVENTURES OF BARON MUNCHAUSEN, though the films are not
directly comparable.  MUNCHAUSEN is primarily an adventure film, which
coincidentally has plenty of humor in it.  EARTH GIRLS is pure comedy.]
     Overall evaluation: highest rating possible; a must-see.
Reviewer: Thomas E. Billings; Department of Statistics
          University of California, Berkeley
Reviewer contact: teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Vecher na kanune Ivana Kupaly (1968)
Synopsis:
A poor peasant makes a pact with an evil spirit to gain possession of the
beautiful daughter of a rich man.  Although based on a folk tale, the film's
treatment of the story is quite unusual, being a fast-paced sequence of 
surrealistic, imaginative, and often weird images.  Very strange indeed!
U.S.S.R. (English subtitles), color, 1968, shelved by Soviet censors until
1988, when it was finally released; 71 minutes.  Director/Writer:  Yuri Ilyenko
     This film is based on peasant mythology, but it is not like any folk tale.
In particular, it is not corny, and there is very little singing or dancing in
it.  Instead, the film proceeds as a fast-paced sequence of events and images.
The story is loose at times, and the action so fast (and symbology so obscure)
that it is difficult to follow the story at times.
     The images depicted include some that are surrealistic (indeed, some are
self-consciously so), some that are very beautiful, and many that are just
plain weird.  Just a few of them include: a couple riding a large hog, to which
they have attached a saddle; cows, painted light blue, in a field; crayfish
crawling around with lighted candles on their backs.  In one scene, the people
are standing at a 45-degree angle; in another the young couple are floating in
air, horizontally.
     The plot is fairly simple, and is set in old (pre-revolution) Russia.  A
rich man agrees to give away (via marriage) his beautiful daughter to an friend
of his.  However, the girl and a young peasant are in love.  Preparations for
the wedding are underway, when the young man makes a pact with an evil spirit
for the woman he loves.
     The evil spirit will help him gain the woman he loves, by making him
incredibly rich, provided the man performs a ritual sacrifice of a young child.
Initially, the man resists the request.  Finally, he performs the deed.
However, when his sword strikes the child, the child is turned immediately into
a tree bearing gold coins.
     The remainder of the film deals with the subject of greed, both from a
pagan and religious (Christian) viewpoint.  There is extensive religious 
symbology in the film, and this may be the reason it was shelved by the Soviet
censors.  (Of course, they may have shelved it simply because it's so weird; I
don't know their reasons.  Besides, censorship for any reason is bad!)
     The film does have some humor in it, mostly slapstick, reminiscent of the
Three Stooges (but not as physical).  The combination of slapstick humor with
surrealism is very unusual.
     Overall, this film is so strange that I would not recommend it for general
audiences.  However, the film is worth considering if you are into  surrealism.
     Distribution.  Currently in limited distribution as part of "The Cutting
Edge", a touring set of six films that have received international acclaim but
are considered "too risky" for general commercial release.  Presented by the
International Film Circuit.
Reviewer:  Thomas E. Billings, Department of Statistics
           University of California, Berkeley
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Hakachu no torima (1966)
Synopsis:
After the collapse of a collective farm in Japan in the 1960s, one of
the collective members becomes a thief, murderer, and serial rapist who
terrorizes the nation.  He is protected from the police by two women,
who have complex relationships with the rapist and each other.  An
interesting psychological crime story.
Japan (English subtitles), black-and-white, 1966, 100 minutes.
Director: Nagisa Oshima.
     This is a stylish film from Nagisa Oshima, who later became famous
(or should I say infamous?) for the films IN THE REALM OF THE SENSES
and EMPIRE OF PASSION.  The story concerns Eisuke, a member of a farming
collective that went bankrupt.  It begins when he visits a young woman,
another former collective member, who is working in a city.  He rapes
her, and kills her employer (also a woman).  The police arrive and
interrogate the surviving woman.  She deliberately misleads them while
she contacts the rapist's wife, who is another former collective member.
     The story of the events at the collective farm, and the somewhat
sordid relationships that existed between Eisuke (the rapist), Genji
(the collective leader), and the two women is told in flashbacks that
are interwoven with current events.  The woman who was raped wants to
talk with the rapist's wife before turning him in to the police.
However, the wife does not answer the letters of inquiry.  The story
continues as the police learn a little about Eisuke, but don't yet have
his full name or photo....
     This is a well-written story, and is relatively interesting.  It is
also quite stylish in some respects.  The editing is extremely good and
very smooth.  One aspect that is interesting at first, then becomes a
distraction in the film, is the use of extreme close-up scenes.
Frankly, close-ups of sweating eyebrows and chins lose their "novelty"
very quickly!
     The primary focus in the film is on the relationships between the
two women and the two men who were in the collective.  They are rather
sordid relationships; there is much talk of suicide when the collective
fails, and one must wonder why the rapist's wife loves him so, even
though he treats her very badly.  It is interesting that both women
protect the rapist from the police, even though they were jealous rivals
in the past, and they both consider him to be a beast.  The film
ultimately makes some interesting comments on the nature of compulsive
criminals, and their motivation, though I cannot say more on that
without revealing the ending.
     Comparing this film to IN THE REALM OF THE SENSES, it is clear that
both films focus on compulsion.  VIOLENCE deals with compulsive criminal
behavior, REALM with compulsive sexual behavior.
     The film is well-made, and will generally hold your interest.  Fans
of crime drama, particularly those with a psychological slant, will find
the film worth considering.  Also, fans of the director's later films
might find it interesting too.
Distribution: Screened at the Pacific Film Archive in Berkeley, CA.  The
print was from the Archive's collection of Japanese films.  The owner of
the film copyright is Kino International.
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Life Is Cheap... But Toilet Paper Is Expensive (1990)
Synopsis:
A Japanese/Chinese/American "cowboy" (actually, a stable boy) is sent to
Hong Kong as a courier to deliver a briefcase to a gangster boss.  There
he falls in love with the gangster's mistress, and experiences the
sleazy side of Hong Kong.  A rather unsympathetic look at Chinese
culture, done with deadpan humor.  However, the humor fails to rescue
the weak plot; a very forgettable film.  Released with a self-issued "A"
rating.
Hong Kong (Cantonese and English; subtitled for US distribution), color,
1990, 89 minutes.
     Before discussing specific details of the film, it is worth noting
that this film is making history by being the first film released with a
self-designated "A" ("adult") rating, after receiving an "X" rating
from the MPAA.  The newspaper ads for the film contain the following
note: "A This film contains adult themes or images that may not be
appropriate for viewers under 18 years of age.  [following, in small
print:] This film does not carry a rating issued by the MPAA.  Many
leading filmmakers believe the MPAA's current  rating system promotes
censorship and does not serve the best interests of the viewing public."
If you can't convince the MPAA to adopt an "A" rating, this case shows
that you can easily "go around" them with a self-rating system.
     This is the latest film from Wayne Wang, whose previous films
include CHAN IS MISSING and EAT A BOWL OF TEA.  Here Wang returns to his
native Hong Kong (he is a U.S. citizen/resident) to create a low-budget
film that appears to be a personal statement (and a critical, sarcastic
statement at that) about Hong Kong and Chinese culture.
     The story concerns a Japanese/Chinese/American, a stable boy at a
racetrack in the San Francisco area, who is hired to be a courier and
deliver a briefcase (which is handcuffed to his wrist) to a Hong Kong
gangster boss.  When he tries to deliver the briefcase, the boss is sick
or away (can't tell which), so he decides to see Hong Kong while he
waits.
     Our hero goes sightseeing, where he meets some very strange
characters.  Then he is invited to a party at the gangster's house,
where the gangster announces the planned wedding of his beautiful
daughter.  There is a funny scene where the daughter talks about
astrology and the stars bringing them together, while her groom explains
that he is a Ph.D. anthropologist, studying the history of the Chinese
workers who built the railroads in America, by digging up the fishbones
they dropped along the way.
     The courier (who is, it seems, a "man with no name" as in the
famous Italian westerns of years ago) goes sightseeing again.  Two
thieves steal the briefcase from him, and the story continues from
there.
     Although the film has some deadpan, black humor in it, there isn't
enough to make up for the very weak plot and other faults.  It is
clearly a low budget film; there is a long chase scene filmed using a
shoulder-mounted camera that is so shaky you can't stand to watch it.
The style of the film is similar to a documentary; talking heads
speaking directly to the camera, with added narration from the hero.
The result is a disjointed, nearly incoherent way of developing the
plot.
     The film is likely to offend many viewers.  There are violent
scenes, including one where live ducks are hung up and their throats
slit.  The camera lingers on them as they bleed and die; clearly this
film is not for the squeamish.  As for the "A"/"X" rating,  there is no
explicit sex in the movie.  Rather the film is aimed lower -- at
excretory processes rather than sexual.  Frankly, after seeing the
movie, I thought it should have a self-rating of "GR" for "gross-out" or
"D" for "disgusting."  The grossness is apparently deliberate, as the
Director uses it to criticize the concept of saving face.
     Having a taste for unusual, offbeat movies, I am willing to put up
with some "poor taste" elements in a film if the film is otherwise
entertaining.  However, the poor taste overwhelms what little humor
there is in this film, and I don't recommend it.
Distribution.  In its initial US release, the film is currently showing
at two theaters in the local (San Francisco) area.
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Spy Smasher Returns (1966) (TV)
Synopsis:
Originally released as a serial in 1942, this film presents the adventures of
Spy Smasher, a hero who runs around wearing a cape and goggles, fighting enemy
villains and spies.  Loaded with action, but very short on plot, it is both
ridiculous and funny.  Good for its time, but not up to modern standards for
action/thriller films.
U.S.A., black-and-white, 1942, re-released 1966, 100 minutes.
Director:  William Witney
     This film was originally released as a 12-part serial in 1942, by Republic
Pictures.  It was directed by William Witney, who directed a number of other
serials, including "Dick Tracy," "The Lone Ranger," and "Daredevils of the Red
Circle."  In 1966, the "Spy Smasher" serials were re-edited to produce this 100
minute movie.  (Similarly, the 15-part "Dick Tracy" serial was re-edited to
produce the movie DICK TRACY'S G-MEN).
     The Spy Smasher character came from a comic book, "Whiz Comics," issued in
the period 1940-42.  An interesting thing about the serial is that it was
already in production at the time the U.S. entered World War II in December,
1941.  Production was completed in February, 1942, making this the first of the
patriotic (propagandistic?) serials released during the war.
     This film has lots of action but very little plot.  The story revolves
around a man referred to as Spy Smasher, who runs around wearing a cape, boots,
and motorcycle goggles.  He works for the U.S., though he is not an official
government employee, fighting enemies and spies.  The enemy he is fighting
against is some guy called "The Mask," who wears a sheet over his face.  (At
times, the Mask reminded me of the "unknown comic" from the old "Gong Show,"
who used to wear a bag over his head!)
     Anyway, the Mask is a German agent who leads a ring of spies in the U.S.
He operates from a submarine somewhere in the ocean (which ocean is not made
clear).  He communicates with his agents via live television link-up (rather
fancy for 1942).  He and his agents are involved in various sabotage plans.
Among the things they attempt are to shoot down bombers with an electric ray
gun, steal bombsights, hijack a gold shipment, attack a refinery, and so on.
Spy Smasher is after them (or ahead of them) the whole time.  The result is a
movie that consists mostly of chases and fights.
     This film should be of interest to film buffs, as it represents a genre --
serials -- that no longer exist in this form.  Today's serials are usually
television programs, or feature length movies.  As I was watching this film, I
was impressed with the similarity in style to RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK, the
first Indiana Jones film.  Both films were full of fights and chases, both had
Nazis as villains, there were submarines in both films, etc.  Of course, SPY
SMASHER was done in 1942, so the stunts, special effects, and production
values cannot compare with RAIDERS.  However, I suspect that this serial (or
ones like it) may have been part of the inspiration for George Lucas when he
developed RAIDERS.
     Because of the low production values and thin plot, I would not recommend
it to general audiences.  However, I strongly recommend it to film buffs and
those with an interest in "old time" serials.
Distribution.  Print source was the collection of Willam K. Everson (New York
University).  Serials are occasionally shown at repertory theaters, and on
television.  However, I have no information on whether prints of this film are
available for screening.
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Dastforoush (1987)
Synopsis:
A trilogy of unusual stories set in the slums of modern Tehran, that
provide a bleak look at the harshness and cruelty of life.  Reminiscent
of the films by noted Greek Director Theo Angelopolous, this is an
interesting, but also disturbing film.  Some viewers will be fascinated,
many others repelled by this film.
Iran (English subtitles), color, 1987, 95 minutes.
Director/Writer:  Mohsen Makhmalbaf
     The first story in the trilogy concerns an impoverished married
couple; they are cousins and live in the remnants of an old bus in the
slums of Tehran.  She is pregnant with her fifth (fourth?) child; her
previous children are all severely deformed and handicapped.  The couple
fears that the new child will also be handicapped.  They resolve to
abandon the child so it can receive better care.  The story concerns the
difficulties they face in this effort.
     The second story concerns a mentally incompetent young man who
lives in a run-down apartment, where he takes care of his elderly,
invalid mother.  The third story shows the last few hours of the life of
a peddler, who is suspected of betraying his suppliers (who are
criminals).  This part of the story is told from the point of view of
the peddler, who has vivid fantasies of his impending death.
     The film is a strange mixture -- although it is primarily a gritty,
bleak look at life, it also includes elements of fantasy that make it
resemble a horror movie at times.  The result is a real-life horror
film, full of deformed people, crazy people, and brutal criminals.
     A comparison to the films of Theo Angelopolous is appropriate here.
However, the present film is not as pretentious, nor is it as 
depressing as, for example, Angelopolous' LANDSCAPE IN THE MIST.  The
style though, is very similar to Angelopolous.
     The film can be interpreted as a sharp criticism of the state of
Iranian society at present.  However, the major thrust seems to be a
criticism of human nature and its failings: the indecision of the
parents trying to abandon their child, the way the young man mistreats
his mother, and the paranoia of the peddler.
     Certain cautions are in order here.  The film includes scenes that
will offend many viewers: a sheep is killed in a butcher shop; its
throat is cut & it bleeds to death; there are also scenes of apparent
cruelty to a dairy cow.
     Because of the general negative tone of the film, I would not
recommend it to a general audience.  However, fans of the films of Theo
Angelopolous will find it worth considering.
Distribution.  Part of a film series, "Iranian Film Now," coordinated by
The Film Center, Chicago on behalf of the Farabi Cinema Foundation.
Screened at the Pacific Film Archive,  University of California,
Berkeley.  This film may be available on video, if you can find a source
for Iranian videos.
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Reise der Hoffnung (1990)
Synopsis:
A low-income Turkish family leaves Turkey for a better life in
Switzerland.  Unfortunately, they are illegal immigrants and are preyed
on by smugglers and other criminals on their trip.  Their "journey of
hope" turns into a desperate struggle for survival when they are
abandoned in the Alps by a smuggler.  A good story, but not told very
well -- a generally mediocre film.
Switzerland (Turkish/German with English subtitles), color, 1990, 105 min.
Director: Xavier Koller
     The story is centered on a poor farmer in Turkey, and his family.
He has received a postcard from a relative who emigrated to Switzerland,
telling him that Switzerland is sort of a "paradise over the mountain"
(paraphrased).  He is determined to go to Switzerland, to find a better
life, at any cost.  To this end, he sells his cattle, sheep, and land to
get the money he needs for false passports and to pay the smugglers.
     However, his wife insists on taking the children (they have seven).
Reluctantly, the husband agrees to take only one child, the youngest.
The rest will remain in Turkey with his parents.  They begin their
journey, and things go smoothly at first.  However, problems arise when
they get to Istanbul -- there are no tickets or passport for the child.
The story continues as the smugglers hide the family in a cargo
container for the journey to Milan, next stop on their journey.
     This film won the Academy Award for best foreign language film,
competing with such films as JU DOU and CYRANO DE BERGERAC.  Although I
feel that the film industry grants so many awards that most are
meaningless, I really hoped that this film would be better than average.
Unfortunately, the film is very ordinary, and did not live up to
expectations.
     The last part of the film is relatively exciting, and many viewers
will react to it emotionally.  However, the problem with the film is the
first part, which you must endure to get to the last part.  In the first
part, you see the farmer behaving in a completely irrational way.  He is
not wealthy, but he is able to support seven children from his small farm.
Unfortunately, he is primarily interested in money; he and his wife
argue on this point when he tells her they must leave the children
behind, for an indefinite period.  Where is his fatherly concern for his
children?  Is going to Switzerland worth the destruction of a family of
nine?
     The problem with the film is that there is insufficient
characterization, particularly for the farmer whose actions drive the
film.  You see his mistakes and (frequent) irrational behavior, but the
motives for his actions have not been sufficiently established.  Because
of this, you might not be fully sympathetic with the characters when
they get into trouble.
     I think that people will react to this film in one of two ways --
the "mind" approach given above, in which case you might view the film
as a case study in irresponsible behavior, or the "heart" approach.  By
"heart", I mean that you will fully identify with the characters, in
which case you might think the film is pretty good.
     Even though it is mediocre/average, the film does illustrate the
refugee and illegal immigration issues that are major political topics
of the day.  Some might consider the film worth seeing simply because it
dramatizes those issues.
     Overall, I think the film is definitely over-rated, and is only
average (first part is below average, second part above average).  Your
reaction to the film may vary according to your interpretation of the
(rationality of the) farmer's actions.
Distribution.  General U.S. release occurs this month (May). The U.S.
distributor is Miramax Films.
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Collier perdu de la colombe, Le (1991)
Synopsis:
In Moslem Andalusia, during the Eleventh Century, a young man who is an
apprentice calligrapher, searches for love and a fabled princess.  A
folktale with fantasy elements, and a coming of age story.  A good
story, relatively well done.  However, its leisurely pace and indirect
approach will not appeal to some viewers.
France/Tunisia (English subtitles), color, 1991, 90 minutes.
Director/Writer: Nacer Khemir
     Hassan is a young, single man in the prime of his life.  He is an
apprentice to a master calligrapher.  Hassan is also somewhat obsessed
with love; he wants to learn all the different Arabic words for love in
its different forms.  Also, he is very interested in the beautiful
daughter of his employer, the master calligrapher.
     Using a "middle man," a young child who lives in the street, Hassan
tries to tell the calligrapher's daughter of his love for her.  Soon he
encounters someone burning books; he salvages a scrap of the book and
reads of Aziz, Princess of Samarkand.  He resolves to leave, and search
for the fabled Princess he is sure he loves.  The story continues with
his adventures as he begins his search.
     This film is a pleasant folktale, that tells of a young man's
search for love, and for the fabled Princess of Samarkand in her garden.
It has good production values, though the viewer is warned that  the
budget appears to be modest; the film is definitely not a high budget
epic!  It is also, in a certain sense,  a coming of age story, though it
is decidedly different from the teenage "hormone comedies" that come
from Hollywood.
     Although the film is generally quite good, there are a few aspects
of it that might deter some viewers.  Some of the dialog is very poetic
and flowery, and some viewers might find that aspect strange.  Also, the
last half of the film seems to be a bit disorganized.  There are scenes
that appear to be pure fantasy, mixed with scenes that may be real.
This raises questions of what is real in the last half of the film.
Additionally, the first half of the film develops at a very slow pace
(too slow for some viewers).
     If you enjoy folktales, the film is worth considering.  It is
unclear whether it is appropriate for a general audience, due to its
slow pace and disjointed approach to storytelling.
U.S. Distribution: currently on the film festival circuit.  Print
source is: Carthago Films, 6 Avenue Hache, 75008 Paris, France.  No
information available on future U.S. theatrical release.

Title
Review for Bao gio cho den thang muoi (1984)
Synopsis:
A young woman, living with her in-laws, tries to conceal the fact that her
soldier husband was killed in the (Vietnam) war.  She has the local
schoolmaster write counterfeit letters to the family (presumably from her
husband), thereby concealing the news of his death.  The schoolmaster begins to
fall in love with her, and complications develop.
Vietnam (English subtitles), black and white, 1984, 90 minutes.
Director/Writer:  Dang Nhat Minh
     A young woman journeys to the front, presumably to visit her husband.
Instead she learns that he has been dead for nearly a year.  She decides to
conceal the news from her in-laws, with whom she lives.
     To carry out the deception (the precise motivation for which is not made
clear in the film), the woman enlists the aid of the village school teacher,
who writes counterfeit letters to the family in the name of her dead husband.
The letters, though phony, have a strong emotional impact on her, and make her
long for her husband.
     Meanwhile, the school teacher is slowly falling in love with her, and she
starts to have feelings (though restrained) for him.  Their association, in the
small village they are living in, results in gossip and problems when the local
(Communist) Party officials investigate.  As a result of the Party
investigation, numerous complications arise, and the story continues from
there.
     This film is clearly a melodrama, as it deals primarily with the topics of
grief, family association, and passion.  It could be considered to be a soap
opera, as it centers on the suffering of a young woman (a very common theme in
modern soap operas), though it takes a very restrained approach to the emotions
of the subjects.  Certainly restraint is not very common in modern soap operas!
     Technically, the film has some rather bothersome flaws.  At times the
editing is very choppy.  Also, there is a lot of dialogue that is not subtitled
(which, of course, makes it more difficult to understand if you don't speak
Vietnamese).  Finally, the photography is grainy at times.
     Making a recommendation on this film is difficult.  In evaluating a
melodrama, the issue of emotional development and/or attachment arises.  Do you
"feel" for the characters?  Does the story hold your interest?
     I didn't "feel" much for the characters, though I found the story to be,
overall, reasonably interesting.  The deception aspect was interesting; however
it was treated as an assumption of the story.  Instead, the story centered on
the (less interesting aspects, in my view) grief and restrained passion between
the two main characters.  Fans of melodrama may find the film to be of
interest.
Remark: this film is in limited distribution as part of "The Vietnam Film
Project," a touring exhibition organized by the UCLA Film and Television
Archive, with assistance from The Asia Society (New York) and the East-West
Center (Hawaii).
Reviewer:  Thomas E. Billings, Department of Statistics
           University of California, Berkeley
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Antarjali jatra (1987)
Screened at its U.S. premiere, March 11, 1989, at the San Francisco
International Film Festival.
Synopsis:
     In 1830 in India, a young girl is married to an old man on his deathbed,
with the understanding that she is to commit suttee at his funeral, i.e., she
is to commit suicide by throwing herself on her husband's (burning) funeral
pyre. Only the pyre builder, an untouchable, tries to stop her.
India (Bengali with English subtitles), 1987, color, 130 minutes.
Director/Screenplay: Gautam Ghose
Producers: Ravi Malik, Debashiah Majumdar
Principal cast: Shatrughan Sinha, Promode Ganguli, Shampa Ghosh
     This film is based on a classic of Bengali literature by Kamal Majumdar.
The action of the film takes place in the state of Bengal, in India, in 1830 --
approximately ten years after the British had outlawed the practice of suttee
(widows committing suicide by throwing themselves onto their husband's burning
funeral pyre).
     An old man, a high-caste Hindu (a Brahmin, to be precise) is on his
deathbed, and has been brought to the burning grounds on the banks of the
Ganges river.  There his astrologer predicts that he cannot die alone -- he must
have a mate in death.  Since the man is a widower, he must have a new wife, a
virgin, who will join him in death via suttee.  The astrologer convinces his
Uncle to get rid of his "terrible burden" (his unmarried daughter) by marrying
her off to the old man, with the understanding that she will commit suicide via
suttee.  The motives of the astrologer in this matter are very dubious; it
appears that he wants a suttee because it is, effectively, an act of defiance
against the "infidel rulers" (the British).
     The pyre builder, a member of the lowest caste (untouchables), tries to
convince the girl's father to refuse to give his daughter up for suttee, but is
not successful.  The girl is brought to the burning grounds and the marriage
performed.
     While the girl sits by her husband's side awaiting his (and her own)
death, the pyre builder visits and tries to convince her to run away from
suttee.  He tells her: "...when your golden body burns, the sky will glow
crimson, and I can't stand to see it...."  It is obvious that the young girl
and the pyre builder are attracted to each other.  The story continues on,
dealing with the issues of love and jealousy, versus duty to authority (parents
and religious authority).  Does she commit suicide or run away?  See the film
and find out.
     The slow pace of this film, and the unique subject matter, indicate that
this is a film for a specific audience, not a general audience.  What then, is
the audience for this film?  I think that people with some knowledge of Indian
history/customs, and/or an interest in the practice of suttee (or the treatment
of women in 1830's India) comprise the logical audience for this film.  Other
viewers may find it boring (due to slow pace of story development) or strange
(customs and practices unfamiliar to viewer).  I enjoyed the film, but I
suspect that many viewers will not relate to the story.
Reviewer: Thomas E. Billings; Department of Statistics
          University of California, Berkeley
Reviewer contact: teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Nosferatu: Phantom der Nacht (1979)
* Sometimes listed as NOSFERATU THE VAMPIRE
Synopsis:
     Very classy and stylish version of the Dracula story. A remake of the
classic 1927 film by F.W. Murnau, NOSFERATU. Of interest to fans of vampire
movies.
Germany (German with English subtitles), color, 1979.
Director: Werner Herzog
Principal cast: Klaus Kinski, Isabelle Adjani, Bruno Ganz
     There is no need to detail the plot of this film, other than to say that
it is a very well made version of the classic novel, DRACULA, by Bram Stoker.
Klaus Kinski stars as the evil ghoul, Count Dracula.  Kinski's Dracula has a
shaved head, and he wears white make-up for a distinct "ghoulish" appearance.
     According to the information available to me, the film follows the
original novel storyline very closely.  As such, it may interest individuals
who liked the book, but not the numerous film versions that modify the story
("rewrite" might be a more accurate description for many of the Dracula films).
The film has a "gothic feel," and is very well done.  There is very careful
attention to detail, and the film was shot on location in Eastern Europe.
     One attraction of the film is its music, done by the German group Popol
Vuh (Florian Fricke, Daniel Fichelser).  Their music falls into the category
that is now called "new age," although Popol Vuh began in 1971 as part of the
early German electronic music scene.
     The acting is excellent, although it may be a bit understated.  Kinski's
Dracula comes across as a very strange recluse, rather than the flamboyant,
arrogant persona evident in other Dracula films.  This makes the story more
"believable."
     This film is a staple at many repertory theatres.  Some theaters screen it
several times a year, usually pairing it with more recent vampire films.  When
I last checked (Fall 1988), it was not available on video, although the 1927
silent version is available on video.
     Overall evaluation: very good.  Recommended if you want to see a "quality"
Dracula film.
Reviewer:  Thomas E. Billings, Department of Statistics
           University of California, Berkeley
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Abschied vom falschen Paradies (1989)
Synopsis:
A Turkish woman is sentenced to six years in a West German prison for murdering
her abusive husband.  She slowly adapts to prison life, learns to speak German,
and looks forward to her future life.  However, problems arise -- she is to be
deported to Turkey, where she will be retried, and faces a probable death 
sentence.  An emotional portrait of a suffering woman, rather slow moving at
times.
West Germany (English subtitles), color, 1988, 92 minutes.
Director/Writer: Tevfik Baser; based on the novel
    "Women Who Died Without Having Lived", by Salina Scheinhardt.
     This film is a sequel to Tevfik Baser's first film, 40 SQUARE METERS IN
GERMANY, in which a young Turkish woman is kept as a prisoner in a small 
Hamburg apartment by her abusive, paranoid husband (who is also Turkish).  The
current film takes up where the first one ends.  Elif has murdered her husband,
and is relocated from her "apartment prison" to a women's prison, courtesy of
the West German federal government.
     Elif is placed in pre-trial detention, sort of a solitary confinement,
where she suffers severe emotional trauma.  There are flashbacks to her past,
and she thinks often of her children.  She doesn't speak German, and this
isolates her even more.
     Eventually she is tried and sentenced to six years.  She is moved into a
regular cell, and she slowly starts to adapt.  She begins to learn German, and
makes friends.  There are two other Turkish women in the prison, but they shun
Elif, so Elif's friends are all German.  She even finds a man, a Turkish 
prisoner from the men's side of the prison, who sees her through the window at
night.
     Things start looking up for Elif; she starts to think of the future, of
starting over with a new life in Germany, with her children.  Then she learns
that she is to be deported to Turkey, where she will be tried again, with a
death sentence as the likely outcome.  The story continues from this point.
     On the positive side, the emotionalism underlying this film is very
strong, and the performance by actress Zuhal Olcay as Elif is extremely good.
On the negative side, the photography is poor: dark, and somewhat fuzzy at
times.  The emotions here are also a negative point.  Sure Elif's husband was a
lout, but this does not justify murder!  She could have run away, or divorced
him, or found some other solution.
     The basic attitude of the film is a bit troubling.  Here we have a woman
who chose to murder her husband, and she is portrayed as a heroine!  Even
worse, she never shows regret or remorse of any kind for killing her husband.
The picture of Elif that emerges is of a very troubled woman, one who has made
wrong choices and is bearing the (severe) consequences.  The problem is that
this fact may not be noticed because the emphasis is on her suffering.
     Finally, the film is very, very slow moving, especially the last half.
Thus I would not recommend it to a general audience.  Fans of melodrama might
find it worthwhile though, particularly if you remember that the suffering she
endures is the result of actions she chose to take.
Distribution: Part of "New Cinema from West Germany", a collection of recent
German films, being presented in conjunction with The Museum of Modern Art, New
York, and the Export Union des Deutschen Films, Munich [print source].
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Biruma no tategoto (1956)
Synopsis:
In Burma at the end of World War II, a harp-playing scout from a
captured Japanese battalion is sent by the British to persuade a group
of Japanese soldiers who are still fighting, to surrender.  The results
of this, and the horror of war cause a spiritual crisis; he wants to
stay in Burma to bury the dead, yet he has promised to return to Japan
with his friends.  An anti-war film with a great message that contrasts
the horror of war with the incredible beauty of music.
Japan (English subtitles), black-and-white, 1956, 116 mins.
Director: Kon Ichikawa.
     The story centers on Mizushima, a scout in a Japanese battalion
whose captain graduated from a Music Conservatory.  Mizushima acquired a
Burmese harp earlier, and became an expert (self-taught) harpist.  He
plays his harp for his friends, and they sing beautiful songs in choral
style.  One day on a visit to a village, his unit is surrounded by
British troops.  In am amazing scene, the men tensely prepare for
battle, and possible death, while singing (in Japanese) an incredibly
beautiful and moving version of the song "There's No Place Like Home".
As the British troops close in, they begin to sing along, in English.
The beauty and peacefulness of their singing is a sharp contrast to the
preparation for war.
     Later, after Mizushima's unit surrenders, he is sent on a mission
to convince a group of Japanese soldiers who are still fighting, to
surrender because the war is over.  The horrifying results of this
matter, and the other war horrors he witness cause a profound spiritual
crisis.  He feels a duty to bury the war dead and pray for them.
However, he has promised to return to Japan with his friends.  The story
continues as he begins to wander, trying to decide what to do....
     This is an interesting film, with a number of worthwhile messages.
First, it contrasts the beauty of the human spirit as reflected in great
music and choral singing, with the insanity and horrors of war.  It is a
very powerful anti-war film.  Another topic it addresses is friendship.
Mizushima wants to keep his promise to his friends to return to Japan
with them.  However, there are many war dead in Burma, many of whom are
not buried.  He feels a need to bury the dead, to honor them, and to
atone for his and their sins.  The decision that Mizushima faces, to
stay in Burma and honor the dead, thereby breaking his promise to
return, or to leave and ignore his dead comrades, is literally a choice
between spiritual and material pursuits.
     There is another important message in the film, one that is largely
the result of cultural changes in the nearly forty years since the film
was made.  The message deals with activism, and the nature thereof.  In
this film, Mizushima witnesses horror and injustice.  His reaction,
which can be viewed as a type of activism, is dramatically different
from modern Western activism.  The path Mizushima ponders is to become a
renunciate and to begin a life of serving others, never forcing himself
on others.  This is brought home in a scene where he starts to bury some
dead Japanese soldiers, while a few Burmese peasants watch.  Although he
doesn't have a shovel, only a stick, he works to exhaustion trying to
bury them.  He never asks for help; the peasants are impressed by his
actions and, without being asked, join in and help him bury the dead.
     So Mizushima's path is to try to improve himself, and to freely
serve others without consideration of rewards.  This is what activism
should be, and is a sharp contrast to modern Western activism.  Modern
Western activism appears to be concerned with power, specifically with
taking it from the people and using it to achieve the goals of the
activist.  The goal of modern activism appears to be to continually
expand the power of government, which by its nature is coercive power (a
form of violence), and to use it to achieve their goals, i.e.  to force
society to conform to the demands of the activists.  In contrast,
Mizushima's approach does not call for government force (the very same
force he witnessed in war).  His approach is genuinely non-violent, and
respects individual freedom.
     This is an interesting and very thought-provoking film.  I
recommend it to a general audience; it is definitely worth seeing if you
have the opportunity.
Distribution: Screened at the Pacific Film Archive in Berkeley, CA.  The
print was from the Archive's collection of Japanese films.  The owner of
the film copyright is Kino International.
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Topio stin omichli (1988)
Screened at the San Francisco International Film Festival (March 12, 1989).
Synopsis:
     Two young Greek children set off on an odyssey to find their Father.
Their voyage takes them through a world dominated by adults, a strange, surreal,
and savage world.  A depressing, disturbing film.
Greece (Greek with English subtitles), 1988, color, 127 minutes.
Director/Producer: Theo Angelopoulos
Screenplay: Theo Angelopoulos, Tonino Guerra, Thanassis Valtinos
Principal Cast: Michalis Zeke, Tania Palaiologou, Stratos Tzortzoglou
     The time is the present, the place: Greece.  Two young children, Alexander
(6 years old) and his sister Voula (11 years old) go to the Athens train
station every night to await the return of their Father, a man they have never
met or even seen pictures of.  Their Father never arrives, and the children,
desperate to find him, jump on a train to go to far-off Germany, where they
believe their Father is to be found.
     Thus begins the children's odyssey in the world of adults, as seen through
their eyes.  It isn't long before they are discovered by the train Conductor,
and turned over to the Police.  They tell the Police that they are on their way
to visit their Uncle.  When delivered to their Uncle, he repudiates them,
telling the Police that he doesn't want to get involved, for the children are
illegitimate.  This is overheard by the girl, and she is very angry.  The
children are then taken to the Police station.  At this point it starts to
snow, which causes all the Police to go outside and stand like statues
(literally) watching it snow.  This allows the children to make a convenient
escape, and continue their travels.
     The children stubbornly continue their journey to Germany, and are
alternately befriended, exploited, and brutalized by adults along the way.  A
member of a traveling theatre company helps them in their trip to the "border."
     The adult world, as seen through the children's eyes, is a strange place
indeed.  For some reason, these adults are in the habit of standing as still as
statues whenever the Director thinks it is convenient.  Although this tends to
give the picture a "surreal" feel, it is also quite ridiculous!
     The picture of the adult world that this picture paints is bleak and
despairing, cruel and savage.  Be warned that there are some shocking scenes in
this picture.  In particular, there is a scene where a live horse is dragged on
its side, down the road by a tractor.  The rope breaks and the horse dies
(apparently in great pain) in front of the children.  As the horse dies, a
wedding party emerges from a building in the background; they are celebrating a
joyous wedding.  The Director may have been trying to produce a great contrast
here; all he succeeded in doing was disgusting me.
     This film makes a very large emotional impact on the viewer.
Unfortunately, the emotions it raises are: despair, depression, shock, and
anger.  It has been a long time since I have seen such a depressing film!  In a
certain sense, it is reasonable to describe this as a "real life horror film."
     If you go to the movies to wallow in depression, then this is the movie
for you!  If you go to enjoy yourself, than avoid the pain by avoiding this
film!
Reviewer: Thomas E. Billings; Department of Statistics
          University of California, Berkeley
Reviewer contact: teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Thi Tran Yen Tinh (1986)
Synopsis:
On the way to a wedding in a rural area, an important government official, a
Minister, is injured when his car hits a slow-moving wagon.  However, all the
passengers of the car are unconscious - which one is the Minister?  Two
counties vie for the honor of giving medical treatment to such an important
official, and a comedy of errors ensues.  An extremely funny satire of the
bureaucracy that controls the smallest details of life in Vietnam.
Vietnam (English subtitles), black and white, 1986, 90 minutes.
Director: Le Duc Tien
     It is a Sunday; an important wedding is to take place in a rural county in
Vietnam.  The bride is related to the previous County (Communist) Party 
Committee Chairman, and the groom is related to the present County Party 
Chairman.  An important government Minister has been invited to the
festivities; he is coming (by car) from Hanoi.
     Enroute his car has an accident, and all persons are thrown out of the car
in the accident.  Two ambulances arrive, one from each of two neighboring (and
rival) counties.  They remove the injured to their respective County  Medical
Clinics.  From here on, action is centered in one of the Counties.
     It turns out that Government regulations prevent the Clinic from operating
on their patient; their facilities are not the correct "class" (Ministers,
being high officials in the "classless" socialist society that Vietnam is,
receive, by law, a much higher class of medical service than do the ordinary
peasants.)
     The previous and present County Party Chairs seize the opportunity to try
to "save" the Minister.  They plot and scheme to try to coerce the Director of
the County Clinic into operating on the Minister, thereby "saving" him.  They
want to exploit the affair to promote their County and also gain favors with
corrupt Hanoi officials.
     Meanwhile the young bride waits for her groom to appear.  However, he is
busy helping the current County Party Chairman with his plans for the 
Minister.  The crazy farce continues, with many interesting twists.
     All in all, this is an excellent film, and a biting satire of the
corruption and mindless bureaucracy that controls the smallest details of life
in Vietnam.  There is an interesting scene where two men who have just been
discharged from the Medical Clinic are complaining that they are still sick.
As they walk out, they encounter the Clinic's ambulance driver, who explains
that the Clinic meets its production quota for diagnoses and treatments by
discharging and readmitting the same patient multiple times!  He then reassures
the men that they are surely good for at least 3 discharges and readmissions;
he tells them to come back the next day!
     It is a very pleasant surprise that such a wickedly funny satire (with a
decided anti-government slant) was made in Vietnam.  As such, this is one of
the first examples of liberalization in Vietnamese cinema.  Compared to the two
Vietnamese films previously reviewed (WHEN THE TENTH MONTH COMES, THE 
ABANDONED FIELD), this film is vastly superior.  Overall, an excellent film;
definitely worth seeing.
     Distribution.  This film is in limited distribution as part of "The 
Vietnam Film Project," a touring exhibition organized by the UCLA Film and
Television Archive, with assistance from The Asia Society (New York) and the
East-West Center (Hawaii).
Reviewer:  Thomas E. Billings, Department of Statistics
           University of California, Berkeley
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Pan Jin Lian zhi qian shi jin sheng (1989)
Synopsis:
Golden Lotus, the "#1 slut in ancient Chinese history," is reincarnated in
modern day China/Hong Kong to seek revenge on the reincarnations of those who
mistreated her.  The story of a woman who suffers because of her incredible
beauty.  Loaded with violence and sex, the film is a trashy melodrama.
However, it's good trash!
Hong Kong (English subtitles), color, 1989, approx 100 minutes.
Director: Clara Law
     The story begins in the afterlife; Lotus is preparing to return to the
material world, to be reincarnated.  All she can think of is getting revenge on
the man who murdered her.  She is born in Shanghai in the 1950's, and grows
into an extremely beautiful young woman.
     While a student, Lotus studies ballet.  The school principal notices her
beauty and rapes her.  When she protests, she is branded a slut and a counter-
revolutionary, and sent to work in a factory.  She develops a crush on a 
handsome worker there, Wu-Long, and gives him a pair of shoes.  For this, she 
is again branded a slut and sent away.
     Lotus is reduced to scraping out a living selling fruit to tourists
visiting Guangdong province.  A short, somewhat comical man from Hong Kong
notices her.  They eventually marry, although Lotus does not love him, and she
moves to Hong Kong.  It turns out that her husband is very, very wealthy.
     All this time Lotus has been troubled by visions from her past; the film
uses flashbacks to tell the story of the original Golden Lotus, which parallels
that of the modern-day Lotus (the same actors are used for present and past
scenes).  Things take an interesting turn; Wu-Long, the man Lotus was in love
with, works for her husband as a driver!  Lotus tries to seduce him, but fails,
for Wu-Long refuses to betray his boss, who is like a brother to him.  Lotus
eventually begins an affair with a designer, Simon Siu, who likes life in the
fast lane (his interests include drugs and bondage), and the story  continues
from there.
     At heart, this film is basically a melodrama, though laced with more
violence than is usual in melodrama.  The principal focus is on Lotus, who
suffers because of her great beauty (aside: Lotus is played by Joi Wong, who
appeared in A CHINESE GHOST STORY).  She is repeatedly falsely accused of being
a slut, and is even beaten for it.  I suppose that one should be upset by the
accusations; however, the audience reacted with laughter (good black humor).
The picture of Lotus that develops is that of a persecuted woman, an outcast.
     The other major theme of the movie is that of compulsion.  Lotus feels
compelled to try to seduce Wu-Long; she feels compelled to have an affair with
the designer.  Further, she is troubled by the visions from the past, which she
slowly begins to understand as the movie progresses.  Lotus tries, but is
unable to control herself.  She feels compelled to behave like a slut.
     The film is very well made, with high production values and good special
effects.  Acting and camera work are all first rate.  The film progresses at a
slow (by Hong Kong standards) pace; however, it should hold your interest.  As
melodramas go, it is quite good; recommended to fans of melodrama.
Distribution.  In limited distribution; recently showing in San Francisco. May
be available elsewhere also.
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU

Title
Review for Wan Zhong (1986)
Screened at its U.S. premiere at the San Francisco International Film Festival
(March 18, 1989).
Synopsis:
     In China, shortly after Japan surrendered at the end of World War II, a
small group of Chinese soldiers encounter a large group of starving Japanese
soldiers hiding in a remote cave. The Japanese don't know that the war is
over, and a standoff ensues. Very intense war drama.
China (Mandarin with English subtitles), 1987  (released 1989), color, 90
minutes
     This rather intense film was produced in 1987, but it was not released
until this year, as it was initially banned by the Chinese government for its
"sympathetic" treatment of China's "enemies".  The film was extensively edited
to produce the current released version. The director's third film, DOVE TREE,
which deals with the China-Vietnam war, is still banned for its "sympathetic"
treatment of the Vietnamese!
     What is meant by "sympathetic" treatment is that this film portrays
Japanese soldiers as human beings, not monsters. However, the horror of war is
amply illustrated in this film, which includes a lot of extreme violence.
     The film opens with the mass suicide of a large group of Japanese soldiers
(they are committing suicide because Japan was defeated in the war).  This sets
the tone for this very tense film.  The film moves on to show a group of five
weary Chinese soldiers searching a devastated (bombed) rural area.  They move
from one horror to the next: piles of dead Japanese soldiers, then stop to
disarm a bomb found by a farmer, and so on.
     They encounter an injured Japanese soldier while searching some ruins.
After they give him food and water, he leads them to a remote cave in the
mountains where there are 32 starving Japanese soldiers.  However, there are
some complications.  The cave is a well-defended armory, and they have
unlimited weapons (they have guns but no food).  Also, they were cut off from
outside contact, and do not know that the war is over.  There follows a tense
standoff, as the Chinese soldiers try to convince the Japanese to surrender.
     The film depicts both sides as human beings; no propaganda or cliches
here.  It makes the point that despite the insanity of war, the warring parties
can rise above the horror and treat each other as people rather than shooting
targets.
     The photography is excellent here, and includes much of the beautiful
landscape photography that characterized another recent film from China, FAR
FROM WAR.  The acting is very good; you can see them struggle with the tension
of the situation they are in.
     Overall evaluation: very good. Note however, the film is very intense and
includes considerable violence.
Reviewer:  Thomas E. Billings;  Department of Statistics
           University of California, Berkeley
Reviewer contact:  teb@stat.Berkeley.EDU
